Video like this? RT Why would you let her take a pic of you in your briefs? Why send her a video?  
Briefs like these? RT Why would you let her take a pic of you in your briefs? Why send her a video?  
Bruh get to "The Webster" ASAP.... right up your alley my dude... 
I'm ready when you are... Loving it... 
Those that dare to be different when it comes to fashion go see my homegirl at "The Webster" #southbeach  
Yes or no on the #RobGarcia En/Noir leather shirt? Rocking it either way just wanted your opinion  
Loving these leather slouchy track pants and cathedral style shirt....  
Not line but Rob Garcia's.. Mr. West was the 1st to rock it and now my weird ass will be adding my own spice to his line/brand 
A few leather pieces from line En/Noir ... pants, shirts, vests... really cool shit, gotta fly to the cold  
Damn grammatical errors typing fast... Proof read you must young jedi... 😡 
The same business i put out to the masses, nothing new you haven't seen or heard RT the blogs r telling ur bizness, Ocho. 
She's purring... RT how the Lamborghini? 
Embraced it for 15 years, look at who's talking shit RT not sure how u put up with all this negative shit #Ineedalessonplease 
Sale them though? it's "sell" illiterate ass, i ain't paying till u get it right RT sale them and pay child support 
Left to right, Ostrich... Suede Croc... Stingray, my shoe game is always on point, "Walk with me" follow  
Chilling with Matthew Chevallard owner of Picking out some awesome designs I doubt any 1 else would rock  
Advil RT how do you deal with heartache? How you holdin up? 
They aren't mean just confused that's all... RT people are kind of mean to :( I think he's hilarious. 
I've experienced an abduction but they were cool as hell... RT How does an intellectual cat like u feel about aliens and ufos? 
I swear there is, tweet and ask RT Why do you tease!? There's no ochoharmony? #foreveralone 
Good stuff boss RT Progress, Live,Learn, and Lift! Good luck to you bro would love to see you back playing ball on sundays again 
Holla at he runs my dating site? you single huh? RT what's up with  
To live life as i've been doing since 1978, what's your plans? RT what's your plans for 2013 Chad? 
Don't fret my friend, they are balling RT I really feel like could have balled out and helped Miami this season. 
Talking that baby talk... RT luuuuuv da kids  
Having lunch with the homie 2nd time meeting him this time with a new angel 🙏  
The day people are able to figure me out i'll be 6 feet under... RT you confuse me. 
Dude 1st time being home with my family in 12 years, gonna pig out man RT what are your Thanksgiving plans dude? 
Dude that one closed it's on 11th Flinestone RT och0 is it the one on 16th?? 
Ran into a fan from Boston and despite my short comings in that awesome place he still loves me... he is  
Just ran into the brain behind out in the middle of MARS...  
Why 7 years? RT I would see my mother which I haven't seen in 7 years!!! 
#Followers If you found out you were dying and could do one last thing on earth what would it be? 
Ride another bull RT if you found out you were dying and could do one last thing what would it be? 
You son of batch they are my favorite pecker head RT STFU Toms are not your favorite pair of kicks, you're a damned liar 
Any pair of my Toms RT I see you stuntin a lot of different kicks, what's your absolute favorite pair you own? 
Spewing an abundance of love amongst my positive and negative followers and those on the fence as well RT sup big bruh 
I love you to 😘 RT Well, you have a good day, be kind to people & remember, your friends, your family, & me. We love you! 😘 
Moma, child you about back slide... relax, i'll see u tomorrow RT I'm trying to be a Christian ... Dfwms !!!!!! 
I'm relaxing Ms Cheryl, starting from scratch RT Hi Chad, another beautiful day in the neighborhood! What's up for you today? 
Call me back my radio was loud compadre... RT Pupilo what up? Call me to ask ya something. 
I'm not crazy grasshopper, for i've a weird mindset to say the least RT you're crazy man. I like you... but you're crazy 
Be here for 9 hours until i crash H&M RT How long will you be there. I'm off with my son. So I can pass bye and you can meet him. 
Don't kill my vibe...  
You're late, i been here since noon... RT Chad r u going to David's Cafe today? 
Dead 😂 RT I don't ever tweet, but when I do, its to Chad Johnson (ochocinco) 
I left a word out in the previous one RT why wld u tweet tht twice?? 
Where there's smoke there's fire... when you're the one with the match you control both... 
Monmie who you trying to talk to? you didn't them... lmao 😂RT why you all up in his.... Get u some Bizness 
Sad is your dumb ass believing everything u read RT He flossing in all his designer cloths but has no $$ 4 support that's sad!! 
Damn right, why wouldn't i be boss? RT Wassup man? I hope you alright. 
Straight like that... love you... my many adventures in 1 photo RT Early Christmas ugly man  
30 laps to go, even after the invite to party with I must take my arse to bed, loved my first experience, Goodnight world 😜 
Tough break for Engine is screwed, believe has won the championship regardless to what place he finishes, I think 
After jumping 7 points ahead of is running with a missing lug nut? This shit is exciting... 
267 today RT so how many laps total are there 
Nah just the initial sound itself i meant RT those donks aren't throwing down around 850 HP with open exhaust tho 
60+ laps to go n I still have chills every time they come off turn 4 down the straight away, as night falls the paint jobs are glowing #Wax 
Funny shit, wait let me look around... RT are u the only black dude spectating lol 
Hell no.... engines sound the same as 71-75 Chevy's Donks at home, just 43 at one time RT You got earplugs? 
Bobby i thought the same thing until i came today, i'm locked n 174 laps in RT niggas going in a circle that shit is not exciting 
This shit is epic on all levels... NASCAR definitely has a new fan... check this restart, can you hear how loud?  
Watching in the pit during the caution flag...  
Damn debris on the track again, lap 142 and just ran a 33 on his last lap, restart is the best from my short experience thus far 
My bad here is the correct twitter for either way I'm asking for his and car after the race. 
The paint job on #24 car is awesome, or would it be called strategically placed product endorsement sticker job? 
It's the same boss, let me get my personal life together, i'll be back RT come back in the nfl. Football isn't the same man 
Lap 100 and is in 8th place... just said he's gonna chill he's being to hard on his tires... I don't understand what that means? 
Watch AJ Green, Victor Cruz, there's excitement RT bra get your Ass back in the league these cats boring 
I love you RT wow chad you could've at least given me my credit for that lol :) 
Listening to and his spotter, the strategy that goes into racing is beyond amazing, when to pass, pit, etc.  
imagine 43 Chevy's with heavy engine work going 200 mph, I still got chills from the sound, no ear plugs, loving this shit... 
Just met at Nascar, cars are on lap 7, the sound at full tilt is unreal, eyes watering and I've butterflies  
Never been to a NASCAR race but the sound of all 43 engines is equivalent to 43 Donks that've had engine work done 👍  
The legend Richard Petty...  
Just met at the race... NASCAR fans are cool as hell  
The man himself... telling me some awesome stories about NASCAR...  
Just met great guy... loving this NASCAR experience so far...  
Chopping it up with sister about racing and growing up in Detroit... cool folks  
Chilling with gonna go up and spot with him the first 50 laps  
Oh I almost forget... dear followers I luv you as well... 
Everything is fine Ms Cheryl, just going to relax and hear a little music RT What's going on Chad? Is everything ok? 
Saturday night... headed to hear a little live jazz... nice cigar bar on the inside as well... 2 torpedo Montecristo 520 limited edition 👍 
Beautiful night... 🌌 
#Swerve RT Act like u know ;-) RT Those are dope, what designer? RT do u like these?  
Those are dope, what designer? RT do u like these?  
Bathroom Vixen for the 2013 huh? #Swerve 
She said fuck the mirror I'm gone 1 up everybody else and take a picture in the bathroom stall... #Swerve 
Nevermind who i play for, are you in the bathroom stall in your pic? fuck the mirror huh? RT WHO U PLAY FOR?? 
Cool, we gotta meet man RT Dude, I would love to. But I'm conflicted. Tomorrow is my momma's b-day and I got her a nice present. 
I'd make u lay in your piss.. RT If i saw your tent out in front of my store id piss on your tent and then knock it over 
Lmao, you want to come to the one in Homestead tomorrow? RT I've never been to an event, but I love turning left. 
Child my surgeon does wonders? Garth Fisher is brilliant... RT Why is soooo fine!?  
Okay hold up... RT post a video since ya bored. They make me laugh! 
Dude you like nascar? RT The pleasure was mine, man. Keep on keepin' on, and all the luck in the world to you 
Being I've nothing else to do I might as well be the 3rd tent to camp out for "Black Friday" talk about being early 👍  
Can't go wrong here... should hold me for the entire day... will save the rest of my allowance for "Black Friday"  
Perusing the aisles of Best Buy looking to update my DVD collection with new releases n classics which I haven't seen in a while... 
Enjoying lunch n the bahamian steel drum at Bahama Breeze, seems like a difficult instrument 2 learn, fascinating sound  
dude that was really awesome man, that was some deep stuff man, like literally, I appreciate the honesty. 
Holy shit what a great read, love u man RT A little jount I wrote yesterday about loving Chad Johnson.  (CC: 
Youtube "The Birds" to get her started RT which Mississippi Mass Gospel Choir song should I use to introduce my family? 
Exactly.. Love it RT no doubt...your edge and humor is part of your brand identity. Any other way would be faking the funk. 
can I still maintain my edge and be funny along with that growth? 
That's a good sign RT reading your timeline is like watching a mature growth evolution of your brand. #powerful #growth 
You fight tonight as well big bruh? RT u coming to the fight tonight bro in AC 
I love you RT After following you and reading your tweets I realize your not an ass! Your a very brave, driven, strong young man 
Thank you but that plastic surgery is a bitch... 👍 RT is just too damn Fine!! 😍😍😍😍💋 
I'm doing good man, the mirror never lies and i'm the sperm that won RT Ocho man how are you doing this morning? 
Watching from afar as few try n throw shade, regardless of your valiant efforts n attempts I will win, your time is up move on. ⌚ 
Someone who didn't walk away like most do 🙏 RT I'm absolutely blessed to say fought for both...AND WON! #GodBeTheGlory 
Advocate = coaches/teachers 🙏 RT i fight for my inner city kids who have a ton of heart but just need some direction! 
That's a really good one.. keep at it RT To lose 97 pounds and get a better grasp on my health and well being. 
🙏 RT cancer. My new personal battle. #Livestrong 
I need more work in this department as well... RT A better relationship with my kids!!!! 
Good one... RT Freedom. Navy veteran. 
What was the last thing you fought for that you actually believed in or felt you needed? 
Just finishing... RT chad what's going on man. Early workout? 
I hate walking in foot prints... even at the beach I create my own trail... never know where you'll end up leading 🙏 
Headed to the movies... y'all be cool like y'all be cool...I love you 
Send me a permission slip for my probation officer RT Would you do me the honor in being my date for my sorority's date night? 
No fuck you RT Unfollowing , fuck you 
Yes, taking them to watch sunday RT you kidnapping the kids again this weekend? 
The key is to get a chick that gives you an allowance = shoe money or whatever u like RT I swear you have every shoe available 
Well duh, i'm not working RT I feel like answers back to everyone who writes to him lol, how does he have all that time 
I learned that lesson in anger management wipeass... RT NOT PHYSICSLLY HURTING THE OTHER ASSWIPE..... 
Was that a low key jab though? 😢 RT I use to spend all my time in liberty city until I got a job 
Can you please clarify "Love" there are so many different meanings for such a powerful word RT I love you 
Gonna make it a movie night solo... gonna catch " Flight" and "Lincoln" Daniel Day Lewis and Denzel Washington movies = epic friday night 
It's dark outside though? RT sitting on the curb and just seen At the flea market....fine as fuck....... 
You trying to race... i'll spot you 5 meters RT hey dog what's up I really need to talk to you hit me on DM. Mo Greene 
I can fly... RT yo whats new? 
Shit make me famous, Larry Flynt will help me, good friend RT already worked on the business model, no joke... 
Crazy right... let's do it RT imagine licensing college logos and placing them on there... Pretty big distribution. #Pun 
Lmao.... RT do you have extra small? 
How do I get these into production, equipped with measurement chart so women know ahead of time 😜  
I remember having to take a sobriety test even though i don't drink, not only did i touch my nose i totally nailed the rest of the macarena. 
In the 40's what's good... RT yoo what's good!! 
"Liberty City"  
No better pure route runner to learn from... RT stick and break  #ochocinco  
You can't even use the word twitter with 6 followers RT My twitter feed is crippled by .... kinda annoying. 
3 months n counting... 😩 RT when's the last time u got sum ?? 
You like these adidas Jeremy Scott... RT always got a CRAZY shoe game  
Shit i'm on it now sis... RT what would be your all time dream vacation?? 
Car? that's a chick magnet RT cute car in your pic 
Never owned a 64 impala but could use one for today's music selection...  
"Ain't Nobody Business" 👀 
What time boss? i've a curfew RT ha Yes, c'mon by, beers after tonight's qualifying. My Madden game will be ready. 
Just so you know how I feel about you whether you're a fan or not...  
Small pit stop (nascar reference) at Pollo Tropical to eat... 
Most wont and can't relate... Music at its best... my favorite line... "god made you" 👀  
I'm driving to Homestead Motor Speedway to watch these practice runs before I go to the movies... 
Go to any bar and they'll give you Red Bull/Cranberry juice mixed, lime n alcohol glass RT what's an Ocho Cinco drink 
Awesome RT must admit. I know nothing of your personal life. Just by your twitter, I find you to be highly intelligent! 
Can everybody tweet and see if him and I can chill today... Miller Lite for him and Ocho Cinco drink for me... 
Speaking of winning over 👀 RT He wins you over, his personality and truthfulness are contagious! 
I know I was saying its rare being 1 mistake then all else is overlooked... I appreciate the love... you are 1 of the few 👍 
To buy McDonalds? cool RT how good is the feeling to be able to go out each n everyday with the financial means to do what you want 
what about my mistakes n flaws? You're not gonna hold them over my head like most of those that live in glass houses supposedly? 
Why thank u RT I used to think athletes were just dumb jocks until came along. He has broken the stereotype for me! 
Not scary... anything that happens = cause n effect RT i just watched first 48 last night bout liberty city...scary place 
No but looking back i was able to defeat the odds with grandma and help RT was that your ultimate goal? 
I made it out of Liberty City without ever really leaving in a sense RT What's your greatest accomplishment? 
at some point RT What's for lunch big bro 
Famu/Bethune... without the Marching 100 it's not much of a classic RT you hittin the Florida Classic? 
No boss, i'm in Miami but i can be in Austin if necessary RT are you in Austin Bro? 
Trent I grabbed it....  
Society Rebel RT Such a fashionista..... Is there a word for a male diva??@ochocinco 
It's that time... 🙏  
Lol... RT As is unemployed at the minute I think he should sign for us! My MVP of twitter! Change of sport??? 
👍 RT Your TL has been on point this morning man, didn't think it was possible to learn so much from Twitter 
You can't rate Gods work, dude is a blessing RT on a scale of 0 to 10 how will u rate 👉 as a 👫 coach? 
I wanted substance and i got it this a.m. RT I just might join u in the partaking in that book, ur TL has peaked my interest 
No i don't like you, love is a better word to use RT I think doesn't like me or something I tweet him so often? 
Climbing RT substance comes in many forms to benefit many different things.where is your deepest focus this morning? 
Not a huge fan of reading material unless its or It seems more interesting when you know the writer personally... 
Nippy outside this morning... headed to Starbucks inside Barnes n Noble to find that book "Outliers" by Malcolm Gladwell... 
Your buddy is a douche RT my buddy in Florida said that the smart car is all show, and you have multiple expensive fancy cars 
cool, good stuff this morning, bright dude man, continued success on all your endeavors grasshopper. 
Never, this is all new to me... RT Rock drew the curve. Have you ever read Outliers by Malcolm Gladwell? 
Me n you both honestly... interesting stuff RT what I've learned on your TL today can make me pass a history exam. 
so basically Rockefeller was ahead of the curve... 
what's this "Monoply" that Rockefeller was able to create to gain such wealth and why is his method illegal today? 
Cool stuff right sis? RT I feel like I need to make a cup of tea and follow the conversation on TL. Very interesting! 
Politician? RT his wealth was defined by his power. He didn't have to have a dime but he convinced a nation he was 'the answer' 
Interesting morning... wealthy business men and dictators... was Adolf Hitler one of extreme wealth as well when he was in power? #billions 
Uh oh.. RT there's no way mansa was worth 400 billion when the world gdp in that era was barely over 30 billion 
Horrible as in Mummar Ghaddafi type of ruler or worse? RT mansa musa was a horrible person and ruler 
How though? RT mansa musa king around 1300s worth $400 billion but his family together was worth $4.3 trillion now that's paper 
How though? RT mansa musa king around 1300s worth $400 billion but his family together was worth $4.3 trillion now that's paper 
Arturo how are compadre, tell Carlos Slim we must catch Mansa Musa n Rockefeller, lol, I'll text you my new number boss 
Carlos Slim, cool guy... RT What does Carlos Slim make? Isn't he the richest man in the world? 
Educate me on Mansa Musa? RT don't believe that chad, Mansa Musa was the richest man to have ever lived, a black man 
Anyone close living? RT The richest man ever lived John D. Rockefeller had a fortune of $663,400,000,000 in today's money. 
Gracias mi amigo RT Didn't expect Macro Economics reference from Ochocinco this morning, well played! 
Gunz and Butta... 
Interesting morning, needing something of substance, but what? 
Flavor Racist = preferably liking a certain flavor RT flavor racist tho! Haha nah never that! but its slim Pickens n Cincinnati 
Stop being flavor racist... RT I was never really attracted to darkskin guys but is really handsome. 
baby I hate to use you as the messenger but try to get my allowance rolling again... use a soft voice n cry if necessary 😢 
Throw the ball to Stevie Johnson... throw the ball to Hartline... 
Speaking of allowance... damn the little things i lost... 😡 RT can't afford nfl network on my allowance... 
You'd be the one to hang on to every word as if I was serious... smh... RT Why would you put that on twitter? 
Crazy shit I changed the lock on the meter boxes at the house, power company gone be mad as hell trying to cut that dead bolt lock, past due 
dude you had in all the palm of your hands and fucked it up... 
I feel like hacking someone's twitter to get more followers but due to the circumstances... 😡 
Anybody else watching the Dolphins/Bills game? 
#VivaMexico 1 of my best celebrations in support of Mexico RT #thebest  
I can't believe you guys forgot about me... watching the #LatinGrammy If you see tell her PePe says hello 
Listening to Yellowcard album "Ocean Avenue going crazy in my Smart Car jamming the song Life of a Salesman... 
9 times outta 10 you gone end up pastor mase #King 
King los aint bout no bread he cheeze toast, Diddy got that boy dancin on the east coast, But Diddy main concern is ass & waist 
The clouds have to clear up first RT you are a walking marketing tool use it to your advantage and get paid son 
I've a few of my own ventures but i'd much rather be playing 🏈, i'm such a imbecile 😔RT you should create you're own job. Duh 
#Fact..... RT Things to do when your pissed off: read through tweets to cheer you up... 
Child Please... daddy got this RT You could come work with me.. 
Straight up bruh... 1 love #111th RT lol you a fool 
Listening to the big homie album "Revenge of the Barracuda with my twitter battle face on... I need a job shit 😡 
4:00 140 characters RT wants twitter war we can do that too but that's the EASY way out bro ... IM WIT WHATEVA THO! 
Excuses huh? RT that's too easy I don't write ANYTHING My mind processes words faster than Mac products Let's go live 
here's the deal, at 4:00 tweet 140 character bar of your good shit and ill fire back as a warm up so you understand I'm better 
I've a disturbingly weird/diverse taste in all genres RT What is your favorite kind of music? Or, do you have a favorite? 
Let's battle, i'm the best non rapper RT Yeah I got u the homie, No gassin but I might be best "off da dome" in rap 
Music is no different than ur heart, without it u'd be dead, sets the tone each day RT Chad, why is music so important to you? 
Those are LV line i forgot the name RT what kinda shoes are those? I just got all red low air forces... Nice kicks! 
Fool let me know when it drops... 1 man promo team... i got u RT Thanx yeah bro my mixtape is in the works right now 
dude I just heard you spit/rhyme/freestyle which ever is fitting but that was awesome, album coming? 
Speaking of lyricist, please mind my ignorance for I'm a fan of everyone's body of work but who can spit like I'll wait ⌚ 
Okay that sums it up, both are fucking awesome RT is conscious intelligence while is conscious street 
Two different styles between and I don't know the correct definitive word on their styles... Little help on that? 
I've giving my review on album and its camel droppings awesome, will help solidify the west coast resurgence period. 
I'm waiting on album to drop... anybody know a release date? "Jesus Piece" will resurrect the west coast? Anybody disagree? 
Better introduction song to their album... "no introduction" or "dreams and nightmares" both are awesome cant decide... 
You're sure u want to stand out instead of conforming to what society says is acceptable RT i wish i could dress like 
There you go... cool picture boss... enjoy Miami and don't leave without going to King of Diamonds RT I've got one now. 
Just chopped it up with he doesn't have a picture on his profile but this is him... Cool dude  
Best feet/routes period RT sneak peek  get In The breaks at  
Good luck Sunday boss, look forward to meeting you... 
You're gonna have all you want... Hold tight... 
Dave I just saw your car transport trailer on the freeway... I'm Chad, I'm best friends with but I love you 2. 👍 
Not sure who drives the #34 NASCAR but they're in Miami... can't wait till Sunday  
👀 
I had to use the bathroom... heating up some wash cloths to lay on the toilet seat RT I can't believe u r still up!!! 
Well most of you only relate to rap so... RT And to the young ones? 
Goodnight... for my grown folk...  
Dude that's rude... apologize RT lmfao she looks like a Dorito chip with that orange ass ran 
Chocolate? pumper nickle satin blue RT lmao he a fool man....but something bout those eyes and smile smh #Chocolate 
Shiiiid here you go #85 RT yooooo needa give me the digits. shiiiiid 
how long you gone run from me on Black Ops 2.... 
Women... RT men & women? 
Already in the works sis... wait till u see this clothing line 💃 RT cheetah face..with a pink band! That's the look!👍 
Starting with "Big Face" bubble gum pink for women RT u got watches ⌚for the female fans too  
I'm frugal and i appreciate the observation RT you know ur not cheap!!! But i I will say ur black a** is fine!!! 
My point exactly... RT shops at Claire's for CZ's & has no cell phone minutes. You know his watches will be affordable too 
It's suppose to look pricey... looking good doesn't have to be expensive RT idk looks pricey 
My black ass is cheap so you know anything i do will be affordable RT some of us can't afford that stuff!! but it is gorgeous!! 
I can't wait to wear my own "Rose Gold" 55 millimeter... who rocking with me...  
Just saw #oomf bio and it said "Nevermind Income Spoil Me With Loyalty" cool shit 
Tell us why u mad RT fake boobs are disgusting mutilations somehow deemed attractive by society. Savage humanity 
Fake boobs are like numbers on a clock, unnecessary but nice to see, require at least a glance, and should have 2 hands on or between them. 
Does it count as self control if there was only one Pringle left? 
Cool case....  
Only on south beach will you see this type of fuckery...  
i meant NOW... I haven't tweeted all day, excuse the grammatical error... happens from time to time 
I know pronounce you (you know the rest) RT 1 hour!! Ocho don't mess it up! 
If fashion had sense we'd all look the same RT what the hell are you wearing?! Thought you had better fashion sense than that 
Caught up with my dawg  
Everybody has gotten into #BlackOps2 even my little Despicable Me Minion #AMFX  
Damn it's only 4 o'clock... y'all think y'all all that cause you got jobs and shit huh? 
This is ridiculous... Where is the competition online in Black Ops 2 
Yo me equivoque, he sido humilde, he pedido perdon, el dia que pueda contactarte denuevo, espero dios este contigo... 
Learning to speak that love language... only way to communicate... words fall on deaf ears... 
That is out as well? not into driving games maybe i'll rent it... RT you fucks with the new need for speed most wanted ? 
A shake is sufficient, i don't want to get to emotional... 😢 Lol RT Let's hug it out. 
Totally random but I had to pull out my dictionary twice during presidential type debate with Skip.... TV at its best... 
Is there another analyst like with such n extensive vocabulary, it's one thing having it but using it in arguments is awesome 
dammit Jeff I love you man, don't mind me yesterday I love everybody regardless of my rants... see you at the tweet up 👍 
Mommie you balling over there i see... RT steak & lobster from Outback Steakhouse with my co-workers. Yummyyyyyy!!!! 
Small break from Black Ops 2 to consume numerous amounts of jerk chicken pasta from Bahama Breeze, what did you eat for lunch today? 
Absolutely not mommie 😁 RT leave my mother alone. Let her get her rock on!!!!! 
It's okay to read but at the age of 80+ that type of material is read in private, not sitting on the front porch in ya rocking chair... 
I found it very inappropriate and disturbing to find my grandmother reading Fifty Shades of Grey when I stopped by with my kids yesterday 😔 
Is Halo good? Don't hear much about it? RT Real men play Halo. 
Anybody? Somebody?  
😂😂😂 lmao RT No. Nil, Nein, Neej, Neaux RT Ladies are you guys participating in "No Shave November"? 
Live your life, fuck societies voice n opinion, don't tell people your problems they really don't care RT TEACH ME YOUR WAYS 
No sportsmanship Necole... smh RT never would RT Ladies are you guys participating in "No Shave November"? 
Way to be a team player 😳 RT Yes RT Ladies are you guys participating in "No Shave November"? 
Ladies are you guys participating in "No Shave November"? 
No dammit... if life gives u lemons u take them... free shit is cool RT when life gives you lemons... Build a lemon launcher 
You will be laughing all day sis... RT I would love to meet and be in presence for a day..see how he really is! 
No I got the best job in the world being a full time dad... RT are you still unemployed? 
Race? cool RT never want any trouble. Since we didn't get to play against each other figured we race and see who wins that 
Nah this is twitter not First 48 😳 RT u snitchin? Damn big dog! 
Cool i'll see you then little guy, come in peace or get beat up, your choice RT I will be down there this weekend.. 
Are you in town boss? RT we still got breakfast this week?? 
Child i see you 👀 RT Anybody know why never tweets me? I'm sad now ;( 
Headed to ihop RT where u at cunnie? 
Lmao... go buy it for your dude sis he'll propose... RT bye Chadwick...... Lol 
Don't disrespect Black Ops 2 dammit... it's not just a game it's a way of life RT 😒 oh go play your stupid video game..... 
Shut up it's a damn tweet Simple Simon RT that's your problem...you're worried about others....and their punishments 
Excuse me Karma, you got me and rightfully so but I have a whole list of people you missed.... 
please find me some competition... preferably those who developed the game... Estaban 85 (xBox) 
Epic kind sir fucking epic... RT TRILOGY IS OUT  
Black Ops 2 with this blasting in the background....  
Lmao... goodnight boss RT oh damnnnn! It's on bro 
I will gladly demolish you in Madden BK... RT you got it bro. We be playing madden night before, u good? 
See you sunday Brad #GodSpeed RT ha, Jeff's not a bad dude, just a cynic after dealing with years of BS promotions 
I'm off twitter for tonight... let me see what Black Ops 2 is about... goodnight and I love you... 
Yeah here they come in 3...2...1... RT WELL YOU GO AHEAD WITH UR BAD SELF GOT ANY FRIENDS FOR ME? 
I never lost the 1st one... RT HEY DO YOU THINK THAT U WILL MEET UR NEXT LOVE ON TWITTER? 
Brad some Jeff reporter is a douche RT Thanks bro. I'll bring the beer 
Jeff is a dick... little tiny one at that... it was planned? idiot RT dang Jeff we were just having fun!! 
Awesome stuff RT Looking forward to having you here. Please give us a DM. Happy to answer any questions. Thanks. 
Excuse me, I'm in need of pit passes or whatever's necessary so I can enjoy my first NASCAR experience.. 🙏 
They sell pit passes? RT sitting higher allows you to see more, pit passes are the way to go, right by the action. 
Going to my first NASCAR race Sunday, do I get tickets from ticketmaster? I don't want nosebleed seats, what's equivalent to end zone seats 
Can someone go with me to the Homestead Motor Speedway this Sunday? Don't think my kids would enjoy NASCAR... gotta see race... 
That's the spirit Brad... does he race n Homestead Sunday RT so what do you think about your boy getting fined 25k 
They didn't want to play... helping them with homework now RT Well, who won the game, you or the kids? 
Girl i see yo sexy ass 👍 RT dis fella neva replies ta mah fine ass. imma break his Black Ops disc. 
You and the rest of the twitterverse RT Bro I think is secretly in love with me 
dude are you busy? People are loving your kicks, not sure where to direct them to see your line. 
Fluently RT do you speak spanish? 
Getting ready to play Black Ops 2 with my kids online RT What are you doing Chad? 
You're not a gamer, you're a camper so camp out at midnight RT A true gamer goes to the midnight release. #n00b 
Whenever you ready camper!!!! RT n00b 
"The Future Is Black"  
What is dudes name from "Despicable Me"  
MC Such n Such RT : if u were a rapper what would ur name be? 
The word "boy" was a termed used to degrade those of color (michael from Good Times voice) RT Stop playing crazy boy 
Take them here.. RT ; igot two 6yr old twin girls .. do youu wanna have them for a week ?!  
Both are good QB's.. wouldn't matter i'd be open RT yoo chad who would u rather be your quarter back ? Sanchez or Tenow? 
She dumped me for some other guy in 2002, here ask her RT how come your not w your baby mama? 
We went shopping round 1, we are eating, round 2 starts in 30 minutes RT thought u was takin the kids shoppin?? 
Precious... don't make light ya mentions up RT I'm convinced is a late queen.. 
Lmao #dead 😂 RT upt doesnt matter now!!!! you tweeted me back :) 
Which wrist sis? RT i should just accept the fact that will never tweet me back. Think i'll slit my wrist now 
Okay my day is complete and tweeted me back... I've officially made it big time... NASCAR bitches 🚗🚗🚗 
Holy shit you tweeted me back 😳 thanks I love you man RT thanks bro I respect the hell out of you for doing the same. 
Typical hater... RT typical materialistic guy. 
I don't it's watching me 👀 RT I thought you don't watch espn? 
Kind sir you rock... I love you for not being a politically correct robot... 
120 pair i think... RT how many pairs of louboutins you own? 
Brad Keselowski dropping curse words like a mofo on ESPN with passion... 👍 
Those are my kids... RT who do the 👫 stand for?? 
I only wear H&M/UrbanOutfitters/AmericanAparrell, shoes are a different story RT LOL you are a real cool dude, don't change ;) 
Are you serious? RT : You shop at H&M? 
Touch your nose 👃RT _ He never answers, but Chad how are you re-constructiong yourself! 
Me + 👫 + new H&M on Lincoln Road = awesomeness... 
In the car with the kids and we are jamming... Ultimate sing along song even if they don't know the words...  
Headed there now RT Yooooo what up my man. 
yoooo 
I wear Keds and Toms so why can't they wear em... RT he bet not have his baby in no damn keds! Lol 
My youngest daughter is greedy... Is it necessary to want every Jordan on the shelf and you can't even hoop 😳 
Living it... why worried about the next ninja? RT What is doing with his life now? 
Fellas she needs a friend... here come thousands of friends to choose from RT I'm single... Asking for a friend lol. 
Hi RT what's ur go to pick up line when ur talkin a girl 
*Gives erected finger back* RT you suck maaaan!! *gives you the finger/walk away* 
Yeah you need help or you got your guy n check? RT So I hear is giving out advice to ppl now in failing relationships? 
That's the point of the game, you've time for 1 or 2 good items RT 20 minutes is not enough for that mall 
Riding with the kids with our game faces on... Operation shop till you drop is in full effect upon arrival at Aventura (20 minute limit) 
Shit i'd help u but she getting me Black Ops at midnight, ain't messing that up RT Yo tell your ex wife to unblock me 
No dammit... I initiated this shit therefor i love and you accept... ok cool... peace RT I love you ;) 
Something ain't right... grasshopper upon further review you'll find the truth RT says she doesnt wanna be with anyone 
So why is she leaving kind sir? RT yes. No reason to doubt her. 
Lmao... play Zombies RT this girl I'm seeing is making me choose between her and Black Ops.... What gun should I use? 
Camp out in front of Game Stop at midnight to get me the new Black Ops tonight so I know it's real... 🍕 
Is it yours? 😁 RT "@ochocinco: I love life...". Wish i was with you chad but my girl dumped me n now we find out shes pregnant. 
I love life... 
The awkward moment when 🍕wants to FaceTime and I can't lie about my whereabouts... 😳 
I've no ETA yet... depends how fast the kids and I dominate the mall RT bout what time u hitting David's cafe?? 
Waiting on my kids to get to the house... gonna smash up Aventura Mall then catch a movie then smash up David's Cafe then mob on the beach 
I'm good boss, enjoy this time off being a full time papa RT chillin man can't sleep...how you holdin up?? 
I'm good boss, enjoy this time off being a full time papa RT chillin man can't sleep...how you holdin up?? 
Damn you up as well, what's up bruh RT RT Smooth workout this morning... anybody else up yet?...me smh 
Gonna go there for lunch at noon RT When r u going to meet baby Jacob? R u going to be at David's Cafe today? 
Beach bruh, walking along waves to recover, boxing/sparring on tuesday n thursdays RT beach workout? Boxing? Field? 
You coming to Miami? RT some games keep up. Naw headed out of town 
What you doing up bruh you just played a few hours ago RT “@ochocinco: Smooth workout this morning... anybody else up yet?” Me 
Smooth workout this morning... anybody else up yet? 
I play against 🍕 online in Fifa RT that would b the one thing we never did do together .... Guess imma play a lot of Xbox ! Lol 
Xbox kind sir... RT how do u deal w not having your partner with you when ur used to doing everything together? 
They won't, it would seem they made a mistake RT If Miami gave you a second chance would u join the Dolphins training camp again 
Stop her RT same thing here chad .. 3.5 year Relationship ending now .. She's moving out .Used to doing everything together 
Yeah, most stick to their guns feeling they're fine, i need a damn makeover 😔 RT do you think people can ever really change? 
Starbucks/McDonalds/DavidsCafe makes me 😃 RT does money buy happiness or just material things to mask emptiness felt inside? 
Romney lost...  
No she's gonna stand in line not me... RT yo dude you going to the midnight release of black ops tomorrow night? 
Low blow 😳 I'm not alone, xBox and Netflix RT Sensitive? I'm not the one crying on twitter sitting alone at home....😭🍆💦 
You're so sensitive dude, Romney lost get over it... RT Beat up the 🍕 delivery guy? Real fucking cool.... 
🏃 💨 No RT Yo come here! 
It's not me, whoever u follow sucks ass RT My entire twitter feed is just updates from do people still use twitter 
I'll beat you up and start the law suit process for you fucker... RT just stop 
💡 RT “@ochocinco: Cracks in Mr. Perfect... 🍕” Y the codes instead of texting her directly? Cause of the retraining order? 
To get your every thought and movement to the masses... RT please explain to me, the purpose of tweeting... 
Cracks in Mr. Perfect... 🍕 
Who fought? RT I wonder what thinks about the NASCAR fight? 
✌  
Well it's weird tweeting a set of lips RT Chad you tweet to insults but refuse to tweet me. I just don't get it! 
Cartoon RT Who is the most well known tattoo artist that you've been tattooed by? 
Well they are for me not for show n tell... RT y do u get so many tattoos? Ur too dark to even see them 
Alimony from 🍕 RT what Are you doin for money now? 
No RT I saw you in a movie one time. You were playing yourself but you got paid as an actor. So that doesn't count? 
He's a Mega Super Star, i'm Chad from Liberty City, big difference RT David Beckham has tattoos 
Shit it's a tattoo there as well 😳 RT Be a calf model. 
Same thing... all successful actors started out as kids, that's a skill that takes time to develop RT What about acting? 
Leverage? i have 36 tattoos and they are frowned upon in modeling 😳 RT not necessarily your celebrity will give you leverage 
You can only model if you start young RT ever thought about being a model? 
Next year and if not then life goes on... RT when you getting back on the football field? 
I'm stupid excited... did y'all see what I saw... can't wait for Tuesday 👀 
He got a new iPhone5 today, i don't even have his number, he went Hollywood RT Ayee tell Chauncy to call me fool 
👍 RT I feel u, everything happens for a reason, I kno u a good person & dats a #Fact..... Everybody else's opinion doesn't matter 
Life has been beautiful, stupid mistake was n eye opener, learning n moving on waiting on 🍕 RT nothin much, how u been ? 
Christian yes not the Pope RT you say you are a Christian right? i believe you, so why do you swear all the time? jw 
Oh snap Jodi what's good sis? RT CHAD I haven't talked to u in over 4 years! 
TO we can jump this dude... stop being nice that was rude as if his life is 💯 RT but God is good 
Shit my minutes kinda low but leave a voicemail, Metro be trippin RT shoot us a DM so we can chop it up. 
Those leather Crooks n Castle pants, need a 36 can't fine em anywhere, can i pay for next day 4 a pair RT what's good my G 
Excuse me... 
hello? Y'all busy? 
Crooks n Castle (spell check) have a twitter account? 
tell 🍕 grab that new Black Ops with turtle beach headsets for me on Tuesday... 
Richer than you? RT Hey you and Mike Brown have another thing in common now. 
Lmao... RT but there's a fine line between making a statement and being a dick and Philbin is flirting with it 
The Dolphins are talented as well duh RT Tom coughlin also has a VERY talented team 
Employment by then... RT man you in strinking distance of four million followers. What do you have planned for that milestone? 
Okay you're right RT they didn't turn the corner until he started having more fun with it. . 
It worked well for Tom Coughlin RT No nonsense does not win football games... 
Professional Bull Riding.. i own a few bucking bulls... great investment RT What's PBR? 
PBR/Porn/Realestate/ RT I won a really large sum of money, do you have any investment ideas? 
Philbin is a great coach establishing a no nonsense environment RT I dont get how a person like him gets a head coaching job. 
Use my dating site you'll find someone.. RT know of any nice guys for me to follow?Dating Sucks a big one! 
Every commercial n the Dolphin/Titan game my grandma flips to Tyler Perry sitcom "Meet The Browns" only 1 tv with high definition in here 😩 
So Philbin benched him for a fumble? Those do happen but bench your best weapon? RT he fumbled and coach pulled him out 
Why isn't Reggie Bush in? My grandma keep flipping the damn channels... 
Watching the Dolphin game... even with Titan early less due to turnovers Dolphins will win... Hartline/Bush/Bess 
My grandma don't play that shit, if i buy new stuff she'll get rid of it n want her old stuff back RT buy her some new ones! Lol 
I'm not hating but readjusting every 3 plays so i don't get stuck is annoying RT quit hating on your poor grandmother 
Why the hell my grandma still got this 1832 plastic over every piece of furniture, it's almost 2013, c'mon with that its about memories crap 
Trying to watch football at my grandma house, she won't turn on the AC and I keep getting stuck to the clear plastic over the furniture 😡 
I'm gonna streak the field at the 2 minute warning n jump in the huddle... RT lol holla when u come down here 
From RT Wonder if he will see my question on where I can get one of his pink watches. I want one for my birthday! 
Movie/Dinner night RT Any good spots y'all recommend see this week in the burgh ; anyone care to meet us out 
Don't know, i fell from the choir stands as a kid twisting my ankle n my grandma used that method 😳 RT How does the urine help 
Let me check Greyhound ticket prices... RT Big bruh come bless me !!!! 
Creative celebration passing out gifts RT I miss crazy end-zone dances. Especially when he had a huge Santa bag. 
Hartline is a deep threat... having a great year RT we need u back in Miami!!!! We need a deep threat like yourself 
There nothing short of the death penalty, awesome duo RT how lethal do you think You and would be 
Woe you gotta urinate in a bucket then warm it up in the microwave, put your ankle in there for 15 minutes u can play Monday 
Woe scream at me I'm coming anyway to Burgh... gonna heckle all game for no apparent reason 
Would like to fly to Pittsburgh tomorrow to watch play... is he healthy for Monday nights game? 
What game are you looking forward to watching today? Bengals/Giants for me... 
Child i should have a damn city to city seminar n give YALL the answer RT why👔 do sum powerful men cheats/stray?🐵♋ 
Easier written than done... if can do it then i can copy cat his formula RT I like your bio btw. 👍👌 
Child i'm with you when you right, 🍕 said that shit 2 RT Don't do that Chad , But let's just say Gods gift to the world Omg !!! 
Tell millions what happen *grabs popcorn* ok go 😳 RT I had a dream about last night .....#ShameOnMe ♥ 
Now you want to play tough... RT as if he were telling us what to do.  
Hello... I love you... 
Everything is back to normal except 🏈... I'm 100 RT just resting at home man. How's everything? 
She's on board but stealing my designs as her own RT u working on that clothing line right? Pizza not helping us lol 
What they do woe... RT what's up man?! 
Yeah, i slept the entire bus ride back from Orlando so i'm up RT you still up #vampin ? 
I'm still up... 
Finally back in Miami, all kids were accounted for, chaperon of the year award goes out to me, now Krispy Kreme doughnuts then to sleep... 
You know i never posted about mine... my instagram is ochocinco... RT You need instagram hon ! 
They are cutting up on the bus riding home... having a ball...  
Still going strong at Universal Studios, kids riding the "Hulk" for the 2nd time, I've eaten 3 churros n a huge turkey leg, what y'all doing 
Shit do you? obviously you're on when i'm on if you're asking... RT do you ever take a break from Twitter? 
I was forced to hold 11 to 13 book bags/purses while they ride Jurassic Park, trying to look cool at the same time while I wait is difficult 
Key to chaperoning is establishing dominance early, find the leader of the pack punk em, no other child will dare try u  
Thank you for clarification RT Disclaimer; Black folks call spankings beatings, incase anyone didn't know 
Still alive and well establishing dominance with the kids which I consider to be chaperon etiquette, beat one the rest know better 👊 
Damn phone is at 6% please tell me they have charging stations inside of the theme parks... 😡 
You meant that shit with a passion by adding vulgarity... thanks RT Fuck! is so damn fine!!!!!! 
Blame stays on the previous park to prevent confusion on who's at fault RT if they get lost twice then will it be your fault? 
False alarm... We are at Island of Adventures first for 5 hours then over to Universal Studios... kids may get lost twice now 😳 
If they don't make it back it's the parks fault RT and if one of them doesn't come back to the bus? Isn't it your fault? 
Finally at Universal Studios... message to kids as a chaperon... If you get lost just enjoy the park and meet at the bus when park closes ✌ 
26 thousand. 160GB ipod RT how many songs roughy you have on your iPhone/IPod brotha?! 
It's not you... it's me 😩 RT it's over. I don't wanna be with you anymore. You're ashamed of me😥 
#Epic  
Is it out today? On a road trip till tomorrow... RT Early morning with some Modern warfare 3!!! What want some? 
😂 #dead lmao RT I understand keeping your nails healthy but you got Thompson's water seal on dem bitches. #cmonman 
Nah Jacks was for the chicks, i played Get Like Me with quarters... RT did you ever play Jacks? 
Every friday, used to be my first date place when i met someone RT do u get manicures! Ur nails look really shiny!! 
Yall be cool man... RT Just met at Class trip! Thanks for taking a pic with me Chad!  
When i chaperone there are no rules... RT Can you put away your phone for 20 minutes and be a responsible chaperone? 
Y'all remember pixy sticks when you were little... I used to get mine from the candy ladies house in the hood #memories  
I guarantee I can beat any of you Yo-Yo'ing...  
The line to get in was so long i just kept walking? RT Have you checked out the new H&M on Lincoln? 
Men are gonna mess up from time to time it's life, but the day you find 1 willing to change instead of moving on u stop fishing. 
Ok i'm not equipped to answer this 😔 RT Well Let's Just Say That After 4 Years, I Found Out I Was Being Lied To And Cheated On 
Horrible? how bas is horrible then i can access your resolution RT Chad, Any Advice On How To Get Over A Horrible Breakup? 
Your avatar to say the least is an interesting still shot on how the food chain works but quite disturbing at the same time... 👍 
Dude you leave at 5am because of the 4 hour bus ride 💡RT why you up so early? ive never seen a field trip at 5 am 
Going to Universal Studios with Diva Arts Dance Studio as a chaperon with my daughter... there will be no rules at all... 
Up early to surprise my daughter on her field trip to Universal Studios, she think she's going with her dance class alone 😜 
Yeah on 62nd by Edison Senior High RT Did you really used to work at mcdonalds back in high school? 
I lost after 5 straight victories... gotta go to bed.. RT now that you have lost in FIFA get on 2k! 
You got lucky... last minute goal saved you RT GAVE THE L IN FIFA. He is not easy to deal with in this game! 
That'll be another victory for me in Fifa... out of millions of followers I can't get 1 worthy opponent... 
Well that's one victim down... anybody else? 
FIFA 13.... anybody? I'm online... send invite only... results will be an ass whooping regardless of your skill level... 
Vibe with me for 2 minutes  
Ok I'm out... gotta wash dishes and do laundry... Hit y'all up in a few hours... 
Nobody is bringing me in after my incident, next year boss RT What has been the excuse teams use for not even giving you a workout? 
Roddy White/Victor Cruz RT You gotta get back on the field ASAP. The league has no personality! 
Yeah Tagliabue did still RT did the nfl fine you for this even though u said the magic word  
Never will they be topped, especially the camera... RT had the best touchdown celebrations  
😳 That's impossible RT when did you realize you were becoming bigger than football? 
You play Madden? Rule is you're only as good as your last game RT You were really good Chad! Why throw yourself under the bus? 
I inducted myself in case i don't make it... RT lol lies.. U wore a 'HOF 20??' Jacket. U thought you were best. 
I was my best when my energy n focus was on football/talking shit/celebrating RT why do u beleive you lost focus? 
Finding ways to generate equivalent revenue on and off the field (double up) RT Why'd you lose focus 
Had 6/7 year run until i lost focus RT i think u were def top 5 if not the best for several years...don't sell yourself short 
I never got hurt 11 years straight... RT you ever had any serious injury that kept you away from sport? 
Child i was loving 1st so you need to catch up RT I love you soooo much! 😍😘😊 
No... I was happy just making it to the NFL RT do you think you were the best receiver in the league at any point in your career? 
I'm obsessed with you as a fan/supporter of my weirdness RT I don’t know why, but Im a bit obsessed with tweets … 
The eyes tell all... without uttering a word or reading body language 👀's tell all RT Please explain these repetitive eyes.. 
👀 
"Grown Boy" to a "Grown Man" 📝 RT You should write a book. Then you can add best selling author to your resume. 
Thank you boss... RT spring 2013! Almost done. 
Unreal body of work... grab it... RT did you hear the new ne-yo? Haven't been able to check it out need feedback 
Random.. Eagerly anticipating the release of any material from Anyone know release dates on his work? 
Let me think of a plan... 
Dude that happen to me in junior high RT how do I get a woman who says she loves me to leave a man who she is afraid of? 
It's only 1 stop on a dime/change direction at full speed RT I wonder if can still run crispy routs?? 
You'd need 9 lives to catch up 2 my life RT It's messed up when the whole world knows your unemployed. Just ask 
I don't know but i paid that parking ticket already... RT you got ESPN talkin dude what did you do now?? 
Just met another cool mate down here visiting from Australia...  
You can download them on your phone bruh, follow RT like workout videos of footwork when is the next one coming out? 
Just met and he actually bought me a cafe con leche...  
Huh? blasphemy... no need for a coach... Kobe's knowledge of the game alone is enough RT lakers fired mike brown your thoughts ? 
Chilling woe what's good RT yoooo sup big bruh 
Ok almost there boss thanks RT its cooling for ya  
I appreciate the offer but i enjoy being a blessing at times RT U always do things for every1 how bout i take u out. 
Dude i"ll be there in 5 minutes... order me a cafe con leche with sugar RT where u at broski?  
Damn spell check on this Metro PCS is atrocious RT peruse* ..kind sir 
So they opened a 2 story H&M on Lincoln Road... Definitely dipping in the shoe box so I can parooze such a beautiful place... 
I feel like following everybody... is there an automatic follow button to follow those following me... 
El Cantante soundtrack playing song "Que Lio" now i know it's gonna be a great day... 
Tell her send my damn keurig...RT Your wife is the only person who has ever replied to me. Can I get a Good Morning? 
I chose not to be the boring political correct robot RT Aren't you a professional why do you act/talk like that 
I really don't give 2 shits... not just any shits but little turtle head shits... RT officially unfollowed 
Jumping on 75 at 10 am... RT aight I ain't far 
Jeremy Scott adidas... RT I love the yellow bear shoes.. Where can I get a pair ???? 
I'm headed up there now, i'm in full struggle mode in the stupid ass kitchen... RT Jimmy's lol u wild 
Can't figure out this high tech pointless kitchen... what's the name of that breakfast spot on 7th ave we ate at RT what they do 
Stupid kitchen appliances... all these damn buttons n shit... 😡 
This isn't my week to cook... the schedule is still on the fridge n body is programmed to relax RT Why you so helpless?! LEARN! 
I can't even make my damn morning cafe con leche 😡 
I could sure use Peaches n Cream oatmeal with 2 boiled eggs with a glass of OJ.... shit Pucci 👀 
Starting my morning off right... setting the tone for the day... what was the 1st song programmed in your head...  
My follow button is broken RT reply to my tweeeeet. Why do u only follow 4 people 
yo I'm watching you in the movie Dysfunctional Friends... you kiss that lady for real or is that a camera trick? 
Awkward moment when my late night PB&J sandwich maker is no longer here... Fubar 😡 
I do... tonight seems to be a little rough for me... RT i thought you go to bed at 8? 
Get in the car n drive around... RT advise for getting a two year old to go to sleep since your doing easy fix tricks tonight? 
Stupid circuit breaker... how does the circuit breaker move all by itself... scared me for a minute... cold as hell in the garage 😁 
I think my power just went out? 
I'm going to bed... Everybody is acting Hollywood tonight... Fresh Prince of Bel-Air attitudes about my heated toilet n warm baby wipes 
What about warm baby wipes? I know y'all ain't acting brand new tonight? 
30 seconds n the microwave gives them the correct warmth for a 45 minute bowel movement RT they will catch a fire idiot 
I didn't know you swing that way... RT Tearing this 🍕 up ! In tribute to ✊ 
Nah i had to boo boo, i always use the warm toilet technique late at night RT You sit when you pee chad? 
Heated toilet seats are awesome... Put 4 wash clothes in the microwave for 30 seconds then place them on the toilet seat... #Heaven 
Damn tile is freezing... 😡 
Y'all still up? I have to pee pee but I don't feel like getting up...AC is on 65 degrees and its cold in the room... 😳 
Okay i'm out... ✌ RT go to sleep its wayyyyyyyy passed ur bedtime 
#VondasGang RT NW 5th ave and 10th st TOWNERS 4 LYFE!!!!! 
#VondasGang RT NW 5th ave and 10th st TOWNERS 4 LYFE!!!!! 
#DoubleSwerve RT 46th Street & 23rd Court #BrownSub 
😳 Child Please RT 66th and 15th. 
#Swerve RT 73rd and 10th 
#Swerve RT 68th and 14th ave 
Book hmm... But ladies fragrance is almost done RT U should write a book! Or come out w a fragrance!! I'd buy both! 
#SwerveRT 42st n 24 ave Brownsub checkin in 
I will fly to you and race as long as you record it... RT I got this... Hands down! But we can find out if u want! 
Sak Pase... RT 41st and 14ave & 30st and 10ave 
#Swerve RT 49th st and8th avecheckin in that was my st.. Dade County 
#Swerve RT whoop whoop shouts out to allapattah ..38th and 10th:) 
Lmao... no i'm in the 40's... the area i grew up in Allapattah RT Damn in ur 40's!! Soooo #sexy!! ❤❤ 
😳 You just joined twitter sis? RT ....IS THAT OCHOCINCO....dayum you have alot of followers 
Greg... 200 meters... you and me... Who wins? Be honest with yourself... 
I'm in the 40's now... slide through... RT show liberty city n**gas sum love then! 
Dude... Liberty City... dude i came from nothing... not going back... RT hope you don't be on 30:30 #Broke 
73 Donk.... No top... 85mph... Meek Mills "Traumatized" 
Lmao 😂 RT avi look like if you throw a penny at his abs it'll make a "ping" sound & bounce off and hit ya in the eye. 
when u're able to succeed consistently at any position over the years despite teams game planN specifically for you = Super Star 
That's the homie but i'd easily beat him up RT what do you think about starting to box? Would you box him? 
Turn Up.... RT what u know bout the goombay festival 
Unreal... ahead of the curve as a rookie mentally = immediate impact/success RT Pepe what you think of Andrew Luck? 
Yes watching that as well grasshopper... RT not watching colts vs jags? 
Man that young receiver Green from FSU something serious off the line of scrimmage... 
Fan? i'm a member RT didn't know you were a fan of They have been inspiring me for years. 
Listening to song "Tony Story pt.2 Can we just give him a damn gramophone award for this song... #SICK 
Adele's music is so powerful her EX deserves a grammy... RT what's an "Adele" type meaning??? 
Remember Musiq Soulchilds songs Poparatzi/You Be Alright/Just Friends/Love... those 4 right there were written with Adele type meaning... 
it's okay Ms Harbour it's a public forum there4 there are no limits/boundaries to questions which is the same 4 my answers. 
I sent my number, my minutes are low just keep calling it'll go through RT Im gonna dm u tho lets take this off twitter 
kind sir RT Wanted to talk with you about a business opportunity. Sponsorship in the social media sports space. 
That's Richly Unemployed and i don't swing that way so keep your fucks 2 yourself 👊 RT you're unemployed and single fuck you 
Yeah man just chilling at my grandma house... how are you? RT you good bro?? 
I killed on twitter using the 140 character limit RT lol like battle me?.....ok but have u done it before? 
Child ain't no telling... RT Why hasn't ever tweeted me back? 
Yes i've moved on with Pucci... RT have you accepted that its really over with Ev? 
👀 
Wish them farewell for me please... RT you're losing followers!!!!!!!!! 
I apologize fuckzoid... RT we prefer Caucasoid, silly negroid 
dude I was looking for your twitter and I apologize for using your ethnicity to find you but you fucking rock.. I want 2 battle 
Excuse my ignorance for having to use 1's ethnicity to describe this individual, but the caucasian "Battle Rapper" that's #1 what's his name 
He's playing phenomenal but a QB will win kind sir RT any chance Tillman can win MVP this year dude deserves it 
No but she's a superb talent, deserves more recognition RT you friends w/ Janelle? If so, put in a good word for a fan. 
Lupe Fiasco... B.O.B... Kendrick Lamar... Common... Mos Def... Janelle Monae... Wiz Kalifah... albums on shuffle enjoyn this traffic jam 😡 
Enjoy what most Floridians would consider as a cold front here n Miami, after experiencing real cold weather cities I'll just bundle up also 
You think he'll call me out the blue? RT Still cant believe you gave that guy in our class your phone number lol 
Shit i'm steering the ship RT Bless heart. He still hasn't given up on Evelyn. But I think that ship has sailed! 
Dude i'm right here man... i love you... RT Whatever happened to the artist formerly known as Ochocinco? 
I'm getting ready to dock and head back up top bruh RT ""alright I'm on the way bruh."" 
Grow down RT grow up. 
I'm on the water... RT ""Yo where you.?"" 
😳 my dear you must learn about this phenomenal form of cardio... RT What is Zumba? 
My classes are only $5... RT I would pay good money to take a Zumba class with !! That would be comedy!!! 
I've so much free time... women always complain their weight/size etc. Anybody want to come to my ZUMBA class... 
You almost got blocked... RT the only thing smart about that car is... Well. ... Nothing. 🚗😝 
Look don't disrespect my Smart Car ok... it's very reliable n great on gas RT I know that smurf car is not yours. 
Shit they're in her name and that's all i got to keep... RT Why you naming your cars after your ex? 
"Lady Evelyn" vs. "Lady Evelyn2.0 you'd choose to drive which first?   
Adam I'm here... 
Dude that'll be totally epic portions of awesomeness if you pulled that off... RT I'm goin to shove 🍕 down throat. 
🍕 RT Finish this sentence with one word: Everyone wants _______. 
Watching Espn in a loud environment... headline says Jimmy Johnson/Barry Switzer controversy... 140 character explanation please on issue? 
PePe bored... 😩 Smiling is the new crying...  
Why aren't they making the new iPods with more memory... all these fancy colors and it only stores 3 albums... 😡 
I still use my old iPod... was looking to upgrade but are the new iPods 160GB or should I stick with old faithful? 
You welcome RT Just skyping with What a character! Thank you for taking the time to chat with us  
That was cool RT #SportsMediaUF is now skyping a real live college class! #ReasonsWhyWeLove85  
Dude i can't figure it out, check ya DM n call my phone RT lol iight brah.. Skpe the name 
Hold on here i come RT Lol , the thirst is REAL out here. We just want a Skype call. #SportsMediaUF Respond back. 
My angels...  
Chapel is over...  
My daughter is leading the song in chapel at school, don't understand how she can sing and I can't! #MauryMoment  
Boo boo 💩 RT if your not full of yourself what are you full of 
Well 4get Thursday and holla at Friday, fuck Saturday she got that clap RT Thursday told me she just wants to be friends... 
Everybody starts off training, it's about being consistent RT I hope Bo get my abs like yours!!!! Training starts today!!! 
Oh S.H.I.T = Oh So Happy It's Thursday 
Funniest thing happen to me this morning... I woke up still loving all of you this morning... go out and make love to this Thursday... 
No... I really love y'all.. no bullshit... Goodnight 🙏 
Let me get off twitter and finish highlighting the classified section opportunities in "The Miami Herald" I love all of you... No bullshit. 
Just having fun Ms. Cheryl, love you... RT I think you have had the ladies after you tonight! You are such a good guy. 🙈🙉🙊 
Shit the Devil is lie... RT why r u so damn cocky?? U aint all that you know! 
Why are tweeting me multiple times as if i know you? gatorade or water? have several seats RT im out and about 
No i had a special 14 karat keurig... i'm gonna sue her for it 😡 RT what's your address I'll send your ass a Keurig 
You are the mermaid Daryl Hannah from the movie "Splash" RT what About me??? 
Are you channeling your inner Sharon Stone in your avi? "Basic Instinct RT im really starting to think ur a snobby ass 
No RT u say u see all tweets so make me a believer Mr Chad.. 
Hello 🐕 (that's my cougar emoji) RT Or Us Old Women :( 
But you're beautiful... no such thing as plain sis RT i agree with her. You never respond to is plain janes lol 
A quarter RT What do you use to shine your head? 
Everybody is attractive... who puts up their ugly picture as an avatar? RT only responds to attractive young women. 
No... i miss my damn keurig and my computer, I can't freaking upstream shit... RT do you miss Evelyn? 
I'm just playing sis... i love all... be blessed RT I still love you, even tho you’re mean to me … 😢 
No dip shit... clique is a group of 3 or more people... enjoy a urine popsicle and get out my mentions RT clique* 
At Bahama Breeze with RT what up 
Shit looking in the Want Ads... RT What you been doing ? 
The devil 👹 said no... RT I want me some !! Lord please make it happen 
Not sure which day child but... hello from Miami sis RT One of these days handsome self gonna tweet me back. 
#Boomerang 
Some people just click... 
Ronaldinho was really cool, his english isnt very good RT those ronaldinhos r sick 
I have his boots RT All those footballers don't matter as long as Thierry Henry isn't there. Soooo...?  
Double duh RT hey chad how bout Messi?!  
I want to meet then that would be everybody basically RT is there anyone cool you don't know 
Duh RT but do you know ....?  
Me and Falcao at Bal Harbour for lunch RT wake up... what time is it there?” you've met falcao?  
wake up... what time is it there? 
Orale.. RT whats up chad ? 
Pedro what's up my good friend... when is #ElClassico I'm coming... tell we must race again 
their match... I hate grammatical errors... carry on with our convo... 
When is there match i can get tickets for free... RT let's go watch Madrid play barca. On me! #halamadrid 
👀 
In a game RT can't invite you!!! 
I'm crashing your wedding for food only 😝 RT hey will you be the groom at my wedding. Sure You can sing at the wedding ? ☺ 
This weekend before i go to LA... RT You should meet up with us sometime at David's Cafe. 
Child Please RT ""About too go out here &amp; beat on my brother ass in the game Xbox360 that is."" 
Child i'm trying... changing my middle name to " Discipline" RT and you can do it!! New chad = better man!! #wesupport 
Dude what's up? how is the baby? how many months? 🍕 Is pregnant as well RT remember us?  
Can i sing at your wedding? RT hey speaking of weddings u wanna be one of my groomsmen? Wedding is next June. 
I'm right here at my new job (Working On Me) i'll invite you to my Chad 2.0 wedding RT sure will!! It's been a minute!! 
Can I please get a game of Fifa? Game invite only... 
Awesome, congrats tell Dre I said what's up... RT You are all in our wedding video chile!!  
Ask 🍕if they want to come... 😵 Nothing like good gospel/preaching/food RT what bout 🍕 
Chicken(baked or fried)/greens/Yams/Mac-N-Cheese/ RT You will have to let me us know some of your favorite foods are. 
I'm ready whenever you guys are 🙏 RT So Chad we will have that home cook meal and good fellowship for you. 
Most definitely... had to get the masses that messages RT We Chad we see your day started off good. 
If you don't know my gamer tag you don't know how to play anyway... RT gamer tag? 
I'm back in business online... would love to embarrass one helpless soul in Fifa 13 before I head out the house 
I don't play my followers online i destroy the competition RT you really be playin your followers online? Lol 
Wait let me put some minutes on my phone before you hit me... RT Got it, thanks! You'll be getting a call soon ^PC 
I will head that way after i see my grandma... if not today tomorrow for sure RT I'm in Miami Beach--is today good? Let me know. 
follow me so I can send you my number... would like to continue my domination of the human race in Fifa/Madden/MW3 
Damn I didn't even realize I was home in Miami that fast... missed my damn exit... Fubar 😡 
Grant you're in Miami? Let's do lunch and talk futbol... 
No red rings... soon as i try to get online that error comes up RT do you have the red lights on the console? 
My xBox says error with a code 80007340 not sure what it means, cant get online RT Waitin for to play me in FIFA.. 
I dropped the "E" i'm just on the GO now RT Room for a suitcase in a Prius? There's not enough room for Chad... or his Ego 
Asked a lot of questions on how we train for football, we traded a couple of our favorites RT how's CR7 out of the field? 
Don't talk about my Smart Car, i get pisstified 😡 RT You rollin in the smart car Does it actually have room for your suitcase 
We raced in Madrid... 30 meters but it was a tie... coach Mourinho wouldn't let us go again RT 1v1 with CR7...Who wins? 
We played already... i won by 4... i'm 2 quick 🏀 RT One on one in a game of ball. Who wins, you or ? 
I'm a tech thug... RT jail breaking? Well thats illegal mr ochocinco 
I jail broke my Metro n added apple software RT how does metro have emoji and how does voice recognition know which emoji to use? 
Flip me inside out you'd be mad as fuck... "Under Construction" RT u are jst so fine god bless u DAMN!!!!!!!!! 
I'm in Naples already... wonder how much longer until I reach Miami... 🚙💨 
Wearing the same voting outfit from yesterday, judge me 😟 RT what do you have on today? I want to see your outfit for today 
I'm using Voice recognition... don't you have a Metro PCS? RT you kno its not safe to tweet and drive sir! 
Next year kind sir, gotta fix me 1st RT you are the best route runner the NFL has ever seen! Please sign somewhere and come back! 
On the road... there's another vehicle about 6 football fields in front of me... RT morning big bro..waddup this am 
Awesome stuff huh RT no more pulling the wagon. the truth shall set u free. Great story thx for sharing 
GodSpeed 🙏 RT YOU have a BRAND and only YOU can increase YOUR value !!! Start redefining your BRAND !!! !!! Let's Go!!! 
Empty 🚗 RT In other words "put the Starbucks and phone dwn.!!"RT drive safe bro  
Never knew telling the truth could be such a relief... listen to song/story "Pull The Wagon" try not to cry... tweet me after 
yo I've 20 miles before I hit Bradenton... you there I'll jump off 75... 
First road trip starts off with a damn bumper to bumper traffic jam... This is why I always fly 😡  
Putting my suitcase in the car getting ready to hit 75 south in Tampa, driving to Miami solo dolo RT what up bro what's going on? 
I don't gamble but i'll race RT Tampa Bay Grand Prix opens at 11am. Ill buy. We can make bets later  
But you won't win... really i was born driving... my mom crazy RT stay in Tampa and go to St. Pete. You still owe me a race. 
Lunch on me dude, let's rock RT yo I'm flying from JFK to Miami ill be there in like three hours.. wanna chill on south beach? 
Can't believe I'm taking this road trip from Tampa to Miami by myself... 😢 
Choir member not a damn priest... RT No more cuss words, you're an Honorary Choir member now ;-) 
Thank you... RT that's good you better careful. We are praying travel mercies 
Day is awesome... preparing to drive back to Miami from Tampa... RT Chad how was your day. 
Yes but his english is very bad.. RT do you know Lio Messi personally? I don't think so  
Duet anybody... I know my part but need a partner in crime who can sing..  
But i know all the athletes so i want to chill with the critics RT Pay attention ocho, they said athlete!👍 
I would spend a day with Skip and Stephen A Smith RT If I could spend a day with any athlete. It would be . 
Duh... fucker just signed a six figure deal... waiting on my alimony to kick in RT were you really only with Evelyn for her money 
I working on shit until i get my damn keurig back... RT are u guys working things out please say yes 
Damn you... you should follow me closer you'd know shit.. RT Damn that...did u vote? ? 
She took my computer n my keurig shit 😡 RT Lol Evelyn lozada has me blocked tho :-/ I must've defended welppppppp 
😂😂 funny guy RT EASY Ocho! We ain't all accessible! 
Single? 3 million + accessible followers is far from single... RT I wonder if is sad he's single :( 
Are you referring to my meaningless banter as crap? RT Amazing how many people entertained by this crap! Including me! Smdh 
Anybody in Tampa want to road trip back to Miami with me? How long is the drive by the way? 
When i want to get from point A too point B fast as fuck... Yes it is RT a Lambo is a necessity? Come on bro 
Being able to afford the necessities in life not my wants... Act your wage = rich RT how do you define rich? 
I stay rich by refusing to wear/buy clothes RT How you saying you can't afford a shirt and now you're saying you're rich? 
No taxes... i'll figure out the rest during my 4 year term n office RT What would you do if you were elected president? 
Shit i'm already rich n alone... but who the fuck loves broke? RT would you rather be broke and loved or rich and alone ? 
Can't afford one... RT put your damn shirt on 
Richly Unemployed... RT ok, next challenge: please describe your swag in two words 
Unemployed RT describe your swag in one word! 
The words roll off the tongue so easy sis... applying the act of self discipline takes work RT self-discipline bruh 
Child i have years to go on this train RT It's been a week...glad you are still on the humility train with 
No no no... when i become discipline with 1 woman then i become what ladies want... RT are you a real life ladies man? 
Sis you got 305k tweets... my followers tell me i tweet to much... what do yours say? RT Hey 
🙏 RT Most run FROM it Ur running TO it! #proudtweetRT sis headed to LA in a few days. We got work to do 
The words to this song verbatim... 🍕  
sis headed to LA in a few days... we got work to do... #sponge 
Be honest... what artist today can pull this song off the exact same way Marvin did...  
Anybody familiar... real music...  
Your shoes... chicks love shoes... RT what about the easiest way for a dude to catch a girls attention? 
Come join me in Tampa with he figured it out... being a sponge is cool #noshame RT advice on how to stay faithful 
Be aggressive, walk up and take the number, establish dominance early RT Hell, what's your advice on trying to get a dude? 
What's his twitter so i can get yall back together in front of millions... RT Advice on a bad breakup? 
Shit yeah with a job... RT Could be any more sexy? Wtf 
What you bringing to the table, what's your credit score and can you cook? RT Meet me in my dm's ..lol 
My apologies either way the love is the same 👍 RT she said "don't look like you" not "don't like you" 
I don't care i love you and whoever else doesn't like me.. now kiss me RT And this is why most people don't look like you. 😉 
Lmao... I don't get fat from eating 🍕... so freaking funny 😂 RT how do you eat all that 🍕 and still look 😱 
That's the hard part most won't do 5am to 8am M thru F... RT so what is your gym routine? Wish I could get away with that!! 
Honestly McDonalds/Davids Cafe/Pollo Tropical/Bahama Breeze RT what does your normal diet consist of on any given day 
If you pay close attention to your surroundings u'll see a set of 👀 RT I wonder why tweets 🍕 all the time.. 👀 
I'm the drum major but i play all the instruments... RT soooo is in our band?? lol what instrument? #FAMU 
🍕 duh RT I always wonder who is the person behind the camera taking all the pictures of you doing what you do 
I can't sing Ms. Cheryl 😔 RT Are you excited to sing in the choir. I bet you have a really good voice. You"re very soft spoken 
Well i love you 😍 RT well, I love your tweets!! U are REAL!!!! Also, real sexy, but that's beside the point. ;) 
Welcome to club sis... RT you are breaking my heart 💔😔 
You follow to close #peace RT you tweet too much #Unfollowed 
I'm not a bum i'm "Richly Unemployed" big difference... I love you... RT get a job bum. 
Lmao at Mr. Brown reference 😂 RT if you think so.... Is your power out too? You must not have looked in the mirror Mr. Brown 
I look good though RT only my son would have a voting outfit.. Sorry you don't get my vote with that outfit so kindly sir 
You son of a batch of raw cookie dough i've never drank RT you never drank? Fuck kinda lie is that. 
Never smoked weed or drank alcohol but i'm a cigar connoisseur, that's my vice 😔 RT have you ever smoked weed chad 
Those aren't pajamas, those are "Call of Duty" lounge/game velour trousers RT boy do u have on pajama pants 
Artist put in so much work i'd never critique their body of work just support RT maybe you can become a music critic 
My voting outfit...  
Thoroughly enjoying Ne-Yo's new album R.E.D... Aerosmith album "Music from another Dimension" is also on point, when are they not though... 
I'll be back tonight compadre... RT all good, on the line to VOTE. Lets hang out! 
Yo... what's up Pupilo... i'm good how are you? RT Pupilo haven't see you and talk to you in a WHILE... What up? 
You do is a good friend and we're playing? RT ur really blocking someone for their personal political views? 
🍕 Is the oven warming... 👀 RT what's good brah, ya doing good? 🍕 
You meant that N word you added ER on the end R.I.P (mentions) RT Good, USA doesn't deserve a nigger president again. 
Straight up boss... be in LA next week... RT good morning big bruh..have a good one 
I have no filter please respect me n unfollow RT dude, have respect for your followers and stop cursing. Be respectful. 
You fuck off Stifler... you voted for Romney... i'm blocking you RT seriously fuck off... 
Shut up!!! RT It's going to be a lot closer then you think.... please dont rt me I don't want politcal shit on my twitter today.. 
I figured it was ok down here... RT I know it's illegal in North Carolina. Getting tweets saying not so much in Flawda. 
What states are those... RT It's only illegal in a few states 
it's not gonna be close is what I was trying to tweet... eating and typing... 
It's not gonna close anyway... RT Dont u know uploading your ballet online is illegal they will discredit your vote 
Start your day off right... 🙏 RT Today is Election day! Go out and vote from America's Choir.  
Someone update me on the Eagles/Saints game... almost to my hotel... 
Cool... again thank you and i appreciate this... RT ha ha it's ok. Your support effort and support is a blessing. 
Just one problem... i can't sing but i can lip sync and i've superb stage presence RT we are glad to have you. 
I love yall for this... my mom tweeted you earlier as well RT I will direct message with details. 
I'm an honorary member of Famu's Marching 100 and now... I'm on top of the world right now... 🙏 
That's awesome, what do i need to do? RT We will be making a special presentation to you soon! 
you have to tweet them and say hello... is their handle 
Yes i know, awesome stuff RT oh! U listen to them so much last week I thought I was in the choir too 
Not sure if i'll be able to join the chat, my Life Class with starts in a 20 min RT Live chat starts in 45 min. 
Mommie I'm talking to my favorite choir and I'm super hyped... 
I'm star struck... this is so cool... 
Near The Cross of course... RT what is 1 of your favorite songs? 
You saw all the albums? been a fan since grandma had me in church with flooded pants RT yes indeed that's alright 
Look at my timeline... i'm leaving to sing with RT man I don't have a clue what you're talking about. Lol 
Look I've every album you guys have ever released on my iPod..    
Is it in the form of a 🍕 RT and don't worry God has a blessing with your name on it. 
That's all i'm missing out on are meals, as far as me singing 😳 RT ha ha well we are from ms we do have good home cooking . 
Dude I'm in the choir now... we have to celebrate... cranberry juice on me... you grab the red bull from 7/11... 
Okay i'm unemployed but i don't need money just home made breakfast n dinner RT come on you will be welcomed. 
Let me join the choir, can't sing but i can fake it... love yall seriously RT thank you so much! We are about God's business 
😳 Swag? It's called quality time... smh RT Of Course ☺ hit me up when you land #fatherdaughtertimeswag 
I'm flying home tomorrow morning... how about Davids Cafe 😃 RT Earlier, duh 
Dude Drew... you name it i have it and can sing word for word at times... RT do u ever listen to normal music?? 
Where are we going on a school night! RT Lets go out tomorrow daddy. I have no school 
Mid day Starbucks/Lemon Loaf run... Dominican "Diamond Crown" to puff on listening to Tamela Mann's "Take Me To The King" on repeat again... 
Continuously walk by with multiple facial expressions each time RT is it acceptable for Costco samples to be a meal? 
Shit i'd let the people decide on everything since they know it all... RT why don't you run for President? 
Pizza Hut preferably... RT Do you eat Papa John's? 
Still in the oven... can't pull it out to early... won't be cooked thoroughly RT hey chad any 🍕 today? Lol 
Easy, strengthen the muscles around it you'll be fine... RT how do you live with a torn labrum? I can't do it 
Chris what's up man... RT I used to sing that song during stretches when we were at SMC. Sykes loved my voice! 
Listening to Outkast album -ATLiens- remember the song "Elevators (Me and You) super throw back... 
Shit me to so we're both fucked... RT I need relationship advice :/ 
Cool stuff 💯 RT If not every morning atleast once a week to start...could def see an #OCNN feature/segment during am drive 
Every morning? RT Wonder if would ever consider doing Morning Radio... That'd be very interesting.... 
Chilling bruh what's good... RT whats up lil homie 
👀 RT What's the point of tweeting it's not like he sees them RT 
Relax man, Laker/Heat game is a long time away, we are going, i already told you that.. RT can you follow me? 
I remember there are some far off worse RT serious fucking question, what do u do when ur stressed out  
Don't think you should Cheryl RT Do you think I should listen to this Chad? Is it going to make me sadder? I can't take that. 
Carmen listen to that song then tweet me back sis, trust me RT Hi! My problem is forgetting. Do u have a song for that? 
Having a problem forgiving someone.. download Mississippi Mass Choir's song "A Widows Love" after it's over tweet me your thoughts please 🙏 
Loving this intro... 🏈  #WR #iTunes #App #Football #AllPro #Workouts 
#Godspeed 
I'm hoping that is a large glass of apple juice Jen... RT It would be 100 x's better if you said hello to me :) 
I love you... ok how is your monday now? RT worst Monday ever 
How we feeling on this good monday... love and embrace mondays cause ya check wouldn't be the same on payday without them... 
Walk to McDonalds was long as hell from the hotel, was upset until I noticed the Krispy Kreme across the street.. Gainesville = Epic 
75/12/10 🔁 👀 goodnight 
Technically i'm still married, i put the wrong name on the divorce papers... RT if you aren't single, what are you then? 
I'm not single... RT Do u like single life? 
She took my damn computer i can't... RT when you gonna ustream again? 
My grandma RT what's your biggest fear? 
I have kids... here's my oldest RT do you ever wanna have kids? 
🍕 RT favorite thing to tweet? 
To soon n it'd be a distraction.. next year RT I thought for sure by now someone would've picked to play for them 
36 RT how many tattoos do you have? 
Gift/Curse at the same time RT how do you feel about ladies who know sports? attractive or turn off? 
To much sun RT why are you black as hell 
No sun RT why am I so white? 
My black ass fucked up... RT why r u not in the NFL anymore? 
Fraggle Rock n Small Wonder RT favorite childhood cartoon? 
Drive In theater RT do u prefer to go to the theatre or catch a movie on netflix? 
Romney''s 5 point plan will hurt you in the long run RT Any advice for a college kid? 
Toothpaste... RT how do you keep your teeth so white? 
I never benched, both labrums have been torn since 2003... band resistance only RT how much you bench? 
Here they come in 3, 2, 1... take your pick RT where to get a boyfriend lol #reallythough 
I can't sleep... anything in particular you guys would like to discuss... I open to any and all topics... 
You said it was important (there's ya motivation) RT cant find motivation for somethin very important.. any wisdom for me Chad 
You mean a Fagin... you read that Charles Dickens novel as well... RT your a fag 
It's finna rob... i wouldn't give you shit until you spelled it right in person RT yea im funna rob you 
I walked from Starbucks to my hotel, okay Gainesville is cool now that I know my way around, walking to the game tomorrow, walkers r welcome 
Lmao... I thought Cody's Original Roadhouse was Hooters... my bad... false alarm 
That ain't no damn Hooters... man where am I... 😳 
Damn Archer Rd. is long... passing a Hooters... the devil is a lie... keep walking PePe... 
That's pumper nickle satin blue black male... RT the price you pay for being a black male... 
Can't get a cab let alone a damn airboat ride in "The Swamp" I'm gone walk until Archer Road ends 🚶 
Walking around lost in Gainesville listening to song "B*tch don't kill my vibe" looking for 1 cab... where are the damn cabs 
I wrestled an alligator in the everglades that was attacking a baby snapping turtle RT you ever try wrestling chad. 
Freezing out here in the Ville... ❄ 
Forcing to sit outside at Starbucks while I smoke my cigar with Bruno Mars "Locked Out of Heaven" on repeat... I love life... 
🍕➕🚶= 👫 = 🚑 = 👶👶 = 🍼= 👯 = 🌇 RT what's going to happen when she moves back? 
I sent all 🍕 clothes n shoes RT I went in my closet and donated a ton of clothes! What have you done? Or plan on doing? 
What have u done 1st? RT You're always giving out Christian Louboutin pumps. NYC needs clothes, food, etc. Are you helping? 
I'm killing this Starbucks... 
😔 RT Looked like FUN..  -- 
Next year my brethren... new re-focused Chad will be better RT I miss energy on the football field n his dances 
Intense search for in Gainesville has begun with Cigar to ensue shortly upon arrival 
Hi... i love you... RT How in the hell do I get to respond to my tweets? #IsThisThingWorking 
Love you man hope all is well boss... RT still out here in Utah recovering my dude!! Love you!! 
My timeline would be boring with a bunch of Thank You's kind sir RT Why in the hell you responding to all the negative energy 
I would give a fuck... but see... the way my feelings are set up... RT I just unfollowed 
It's you're out of control, don't follow just check my timeline RT man u need a twitter limit per day, your out of control 
My iPod has played Tamela Mann's "Take Me To The King" 63 times in a row and it's refusing to play it again... 😡 damn 🍏 products... 
Yeah but ain't nothing like 🎮 ➕ ⚽ RT do u still love 🍕? 
Damn sis i haven't seen you since 1998... how are you RT hey Chad hope everything is well from your old SMC buddy!!! 
Stormy Weather/Cabin In The Sky RT what is your favorite movie? 
#Dead 😂 RT Can't believe those assholes at Peet's Coffee, kicked me out, because I tried to pay with my Starbucks card. 
Now you want to talk shit after i leave... i'm coming back... at Starbucks RT i called you out! Put ya cleats on 
👀 
Congrats man... RT my girl gave birth to our baby girl today....talk bout 100% 
Zoe meet both of you have phones equipped with follow buttons... may God bless you both 🙏 
Found here at UF practice...  
Okay i got you give me 5 minutes... RT bro I need help getting attention.... U got me? Lol 
"Black Guy" and home team  
Jeff Driskel and the Black Guy...  
Me and U of F head coach Will Muschamp...  
Entire U of F secondary... nobody wants to cover me...  
If you can listen to song "Locked out of Heaven" without dancing you have no pulse... 
Let's compare bank accounts regular ninja... 😬 RT Why is account still verified he a regular nigga like me know 
I got the doves 🐓 ready when you do... RT Im going to unfollow you if I see anymore pathetic tweets. 
Got to Gainesville pretty fast even though drove 50 mph all the way here... where is McDonalds at dammit 🍔🍟 
Lmao... Cmon Stifler... RT I know your a democrat, blah blah, I know my timeline is going to be flooded with political spam now 😡 
😩 RT Twitter, stop trying to get me to discover I'm uninterested in both football and labored metaphors. 
😡 RT Serious question, do u have the power to tweet and and tell them I want to meet them in Cincy tonight 
I'm not driving is... i'm jamming Barry White smoking my cigar RT I hope you not tweeting and driving!!! 
Well 🍕 was supposed to help me but... RT what ever happened to your clothing line? 
On the road, i'll come route you up, i'm open yee yee RT mannnn F all that, ima still throw it out there! U still in Miami tho 
Not playing this year big bruh, yall got it RT appreciate it, Lol and by who?U need to come workout so we can get to this ship 
I have to speak with the Gators football team.. if i've time after i will RT college! University of Florida :) 
Lmao 😂 #dead RT Romney is behind why youre not in the NFL. He didnt want anyone detracting his attention. #conspiracy 
😳 RT why are you the most influential sports person in social media? I just googled who you r and no answers were available 
Highschool? RT So how about coming to talk to a few of my telecom students while you are in gainesville? 
Bruh i'm good, still can't be covered... you look good out there boss... how you holding up RT wass good big dawg? 
R.I.P to your mentions/twitter/life etc. RT The girl tweeting is the reason id never date a black girl lol 
Child please get out my mentions ✌ RT 😂😂😂😂LMAO!!!! I said thank you and that's all you're going to get! 😉 
It was nice meeting you, good luck in school n god bless sis RT I just met you and I'm sad you didn't tweet me 😢 
That's it? Thank You 😡 girl i said i love you n i get a damn thank you? I ain't sorry no more shit. RT Thank You 
I'm sorry n i love you 😔 RT see you don't even know that this is a SERIOUS MATTER! Smh! Just apologize, now that is SIMPLE 
You are serious huh RT where and when did you PLEDGE? What chapter? Who is your DP/ADP? BECAUSE YOU ARE NOT AN AKA that's why 
look at my last tweet at "Simple Simon" who got her panties in a bunch over an obvious joke... 
So you that simple? RT ain't NEVER PLEDGED MY SORORITY! This boy done lost his mind! I'm bout to tweet this fool all day 
Wait Lizz you're an AKA also? RT Naww... you can't do that.. you have to earn the right to Skee Wee sir! 
Skee Wee... throws up pinky... damn right i'm on point... duh RT Chaddddd !!!! you behaving ? 
😡 RT man look here! I'm glad I saw this b4 I picked u up cuz u can't be smoking in no car with me. I'm trynna live Bruh. 
No judging but i have this thing for 🍕... RT Don't judge me but I have this thing for 😍 
Thanks RT you are simply the most interesting, sexy, real man I've seen. Thank u for not conforming to the world like so many do 
Listening to Gary Clark Jr. new album grabbing a lemon loaf and carmel macchiato from Dude is killer on the guitar... 
Yeah just let me put some minutes on my shit n i'll hit you... RT you still got my digits? 
Ok i'll text you when i'm close... RT yo black dude, hit my phone. I live in Gainesville! 
This chart will show you... RT Oh, what's the difference?  
Just grabbed two Arturo Fuente Rosado's for this road trip to Gainsville with  
This isn't Heaven but it's close enough while I'm still living 🙏  
They are Bully's Ms. Cheryl not Pit Bulls... RT Why did you decide to get Pitt Bulls? 
Yes... Timon and Pumba RT did you settle on names for your pups? 
Me n Reeves... He's the owner of Mamas Southern Soul Food in Tampa... great breakfast...  
I remember 😂 RT Was watchin sound fx of U recall when u told the trainer the only thing u took b4 the game was viagra 
In Tampa big bruh headed to Gainesville in 2 hours what's good.. RT where r u bother 
Yes i've an extremely large invisible fan base there RT why do you always go to Sinaloa? Cool with people's over there ? 
My responses are priceless n it's entertaining sis RT Why do you respond to insulting and ignorant tweets? 
I go back to Sinaloa Mexico end of November, i stop in Vegas before i head back home... RT when will you come to Vegas? 
Orale carnal... RT what's up vato? 
Child Ms. Clark i thank you but there's an air brush app i use... i'm sorry 😩 RT Lord you fine as hell 
I found southern soul food breakfast... Mamas breakfast on MLK blvd. and N Tampa st. was good... 
Your enthusiasm this morning is excellent... maintain that exuberance all day RT YOOOO FUCK U AND SOUL FOOD 
Your enthusiasm this morning is excellent... maintain that exuberance all day RT YOOOO FUCK U AND SOUL FOOD 
It's more so the way it's prepared kind sir.. RT what part of that breakfast is soul food? 
Is there a soul food type breakfast spot in Tampa where I can get grits n eggs... sausage n bacon and pancakes... 
Impossible... i'd have to start life over at 8 years old... can't flourish jumping in this late RT why not box professionally? 
Duh RT It's a video of squaring up with ? 
Of course... he puts out an insane number of punches each round RT Do you know who Paul Williams is? The boxer 
Unreal, extremely frustrating trying to hit him, i aim right below the neck area n just hope RT is mayweather faster in person 
8 years... RT How long have been boxing ? 
That's not funny my face hurts this morning... RT lmao beat that ass 
Yeah that was real, his camera messed up RT so wait a minute that 10 second video of you squarin up wit is real? 
Mayweather... RT who was the toughest guy to spar against? 
They don't allow it to be filmed... great work until i get hit 😩 RT do you have footage of you sparring against Cotto or Broner 
Headed to Gainesville at 1 o'clock boss... RT where u at today bro 
Was able to do 9 rounds with yesterday keeping my distance n using my jab was my only chance, my face hurts though still 😢 
I love you guys... Morning... 
Bingo... that's what i'm going with sis RT You hear that, Chad?! Timon & Pumba!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
😂 Lmao RT if your dogs are like mine just name them NO and LAY DOWN because at 7 months old that's all I can get out anyways 
Boring names... RT chico, and cash. #trillll 
Yes both boys... 1st n 2nd pick of the litter... RT are they both boys? 
Well what's the name you came up with? RT my dogs, I get to name them ☺ 
Can someone please help me name my two Bully pups from  Just tweet two boy names...  
Love that... only 1 shot left RT just be careful hitting that button... if you hit it to many times you'll forget who you are 
Hitting the reset button on life... it works on xBox... 🙏 
You would be the dummy who doesn't get the point... RT LOL selling ice cream now Smh 
Vibing with my homeboy  
If you're in Tampa do me a favor and slide to and scream at me for a minute... by 4 o'clock preferably... Slush n convo ✌ 
Waiting to get a haircut... lil dude asked for a picture... he didn't have a twitter account yet... but...  
Doing 10 rounds of sparring with 2night as he prepares 4 his fight n Dec. Great cardio for me as well  
Just met some cool folks... and  
I'm learning why the cage bird sings... the ability to find joy and contentment despite my circumstance... 
Everything good up there in heaven... keep on bookin from the skies... much love... 🙏 
The scolding session I'm going through... help needed please... 😔 
Tamela Mann album Best Days... song "Take me to the King" what was your 1st song of choice to set the tone for your day? 
When your way of words never align with your actions and you decide to change n do it the right way for once... 😔 
Throw back thursdays.. damn baby that's 14 years ago.. i'm wearing a Fubu jersey RT #tbt ✌  
Actions... 👀 
I'm trying to find iHop... RT Keep up the good work bruh...you hit ihop yet this morning? 
So much power in words... 
We were all born an original... no need to die a copy... haters/confused admirers just assure that awesomeness of originality n greatness 🙏 
Spoke to the ladies of deep discussions on ALL topics including my mistakes n where I'm headed from here 🙏  
Look at my baby girls headed out for Halloween... Bat Girl and Frankie Stein...  
I'm marching with yall from afar until my time on earth is up... 🙏 RT thanks for your continued support! 
Sis catch a movie/dinner or cheat your diet n watch LifeTime RT Do you have ideas for a solo date night? 
Hey you guys have a twitter... awesome... RT We'll be ready! “@ochocinco: Coming to get Famu band music for my ipod" 
Coming to get Famu band music for my ipod... RT that's my hometown. Holla at me when you get to FAMU bro. I'm a student here 
I'm out here whats good, headed to Famu next to c Dr White n Chip RT So I heard that was in Polk County yesterday 
Yo... you want me to order you some pizza... save me a slice... 🍕I always want the last slice nobody else wants... 
Child I would've sent a helicopter but the airspace isn't open for personal use... Glad you're safe... 🙏 
Of course, has been a good friend for years, why i always talk trash RT du keep in touch with any fans you meet? 
Shut up... i don't need you to cosign for my tweets fraggle rock,.. RT Great fucking tweet...... 
What I've learned in such a short period of time is amazing now that I've stopped acting like I fucking know it all... 
I'm good... think... i had damn near 7 jobs my entire career... #octopus RT how do you make money these days? 
😂 RT I still remember seeing hop out a silver Panamera n Miami with no shoes or shirt on looking like he stole it 
I'm trying this restaurant called "Columbia" in Ybor city with Hoping it is as good as 
I want my 🍕 back = bright day RT Hey just wants to brighten your day and say HEEEYYY BOO!!!! lol #HeyBooWed 
I wanted to be a Pizza Hut delivery boy... i don't 🍕 right now RT Where's your Halloween costume? 
Just grabbed a La Faraona Cigar... never had one before hoping its smooth...  
What's up boss you good? RT what up brother what's the story today 
Ybor... my apologies first time here... RT E Bar? Or Ybor? 
Cigars in E Bar City... so relaxing... hoping they can make a cafe con leche... 🙏 
Respond to a fool once you might change their life... respond to a fool twice you become a fool yourself... 
The mirror never shows us what other people see... 👀 
Finding a way to be comfortable even when I'm uncomfortable so I'm even keel at all times... 
Goodnight... 🙏 
child when I finish this work and re-invention of becoming a new and better me... 🍕 gone be in trouble... 
Sweetie there's another side that ain't pretty that needs work RT why do bad things happen to gd ppl chad? yu have a gd heart 
That's the game i was gonna choose, hoping it's in Miami RT courtside tickets to heat Lakers game?? 
Lmao 😂 RT Lol, you right. 
I'll send you my info, we won't go until it's a great matchup RT this is awesome ,just dunno how to get in contact with you 
Baby you don't even like basketball... only Lil Wayne and i took you to meet him RT Ohh..... 😑 
Rami I just found your twitter account... hope all is well... taking another fan to sit court side again... -Feet On The Wood- 
Anyone remember the guys twitter account that sat court side with me at the Heat game.. I sat him next to Lil Wayne n Drake, cool experience 
Done deal, remember i took that fan last year? RT I wanna sit court side with at a game one day! 
Would love to hear Amber Bullock/J. Hudson/Monica/ or any soulful voice sing Mississippi Mass Choir song "I Need Thee" in person right now.. 
Photo Shop sis RT Is Sooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooo Fine!!! OMG!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1 
Tithes n Offerings big bruh RT drove by a "God's Gym" today. Since when was there a fee to workout in that gym?? 
I almost hit the median jamming to new album... love this dude man... 
In search of Krispy Kreme on Florida Ave. hoping the "Hot Light" is on... gonna miss the damn tip off 😡 
Confused Admirer RT Hey ocho.. What's another word for hater? 
Raw and uncut no sugarcoating sis... RT I heard you spoke really well at AHS ....da youth these days need to hear the truth 
Lmao 😂 RT I swear chad could ask when the polls open up and would answer him... Lol 
Thanks guys... 🏀 RT 8pm/et on TNT RT What time is the Heat/Celtics game? 
What time is the Heat/Celtics game? 
Take as long as you need to take... 
Human physics... 
Late 80's suede Bally's -Rick Ross- 
Peace of mind...  
Balancing hunger and contentment... 🙏 
Saviors come in many forms... definitely ain't the guy on the right...  
Chilling with my homeboy T. in Central Florida...  
Will definitely check it out... RT nice to meet you! Thanks for advice....ck out 
In class... RT your quiet....what u doing? 
Hey... thank you RT sup? 
What good is a rubber band that doesn't stretch... 
A leader without a title... 
Unbelievable...  
Totally out of my comfort zone... 🙏 
Chill with your tweets... don't or mention anymore... 
Back to packing for the airport... my music isn't for all but...  
Discipline dude... C'mon discipline... the rest will take care of itself... focus... #TheBigPicture 
The hurricane, grab a slice of pizza, she'll calm down RT who's sandy boss? 
1 pair of shoes n shirt, i don't get an allowance anymore 😔 RT Looks like you did some shopping? What did you get? 
Yes but i prefer Sandy... RT you like Asian girls chad? 
Hey.... i have to be funny to keep from crying sometimes... RT Me n hes funny as hell  
I never match man.... RT Just saw and man does he not know how to match his clothes. 
Thanks and yes everyone is beautiful in their own way... RT no one is ugly....jus didnt expect that!😊 
Cute? babies are cute, was i ugly on TV... 😔 RT So is actually cute in person. Ran into him while leaving Davids. 
Literally bored out of my mind...  
you really gone make me wait till Tuesday for album... I've supported every artist n genre for years, Give me a break 
Only if you race me in the 40... check your dm boss RT Hey C, holla at the old pro, I want to talk to you about something. 
Every time i get on my computer my neighbor's WiFi for some reason is always trespassing into my damn house... Strong signal at that... 😁 
Packing my little suit case listening to all of Jazmine Sullivan and Chrisette Michele albums on shuffle... amazing music m voices 🆒 
It's not disciplined in the most important area which is causing me to lose RT Chad, do you think you have a disciplined mind? 
A disciplined mind... 
A weak mind... 
The little things... 
Not sure if people would come RT U should open ur own Zumba studio like our local Maine girl did...... 
Thanks but don't be fooled, the outside looks good, child i got work to do on the inside 😢 RT im sooo in love with your avatar 
#Actions <--- I still ain't got this simple fucking concept... 
Words ain't worked since Adam n Eve RT how do you win a woman over with words? I can't manage right now, Inspire me big bro? 
Richly Unemployed... 
Confused Lover... 
Narcissist... 
That awkward moment when you try to silently fart and it comes out like a machine gun.... 😳 
Goodnight 👣 in the sand 🙏 
My mirror says i'm winning each morning... unfollow SWV RT can you make your conversation private. This is why you r losing 
It's you're and i'm saving you the 💔 RT 😂 you think your funny! We are gonna have a talk about this, oh yes we are 
We both gone be jamming this then RT My boyfriend is gonna be perfect for the family and not only me.  
😂 #dead when you can pay for movie n dinner dates without my help you can date RT A few months or so 😂😂😂🙌 
Shit i don't have any minutes... RT why don't you guys talk about this over text/phone? 
Now we're on the same page RT Don't b like that my expectations are too high anyways, it'll be a while till he comes around 
Child Please try me n you'll be on your own... RT 21?!!!! 😂 no. I'm not waiting till I'm 21. that's insane. 
I love you baby but you're not 21 RT 😂 really dad? I'm thirsty. okay. she be ready when he comes around it's gonna be nice 
He beez non existent shit... sit down thirsty 🍷 RT #ToMyFutureBoyfriend where you beez at? 
I know a Sandy, when she's pissed just take cover RT Chad some words of encouragement for us about to be hit by Hurricane Sandy 
Can't sleep tonight... this solo shit blows like a zebra without stripes... RT Isn't it past your bedtime bruh? 
The sound system in my Smart Car awaits patiently 4 tuesday RT u just as frustrated as me that we cnt get album yet 
His album is dope as rhino droppings... awesome body of work RT what u think of the new Kendrick album? 
I know I have at least 1 follower that knows Ethel Waters... the movie "Cabin in the Sky" is awesome...  
Anybody saw "Stormy Weather" one of my favorite artist n songs...  
Late night workout jamming...  
Keep it up I'm gone you in front of the world since you want some attention... 
I found at my brother is happy his Dolphins won today...  
Back to be being bored... 😩 
Enjoy the snow in Utah RT Much love to and his homies for blessing me this week!  
Just dropped the big homie off at the airport, back 2 Utah he goes, he'll never forget these past 3 Miami days  
🙏 RT I'll have God put my mansion next to yours RT Don't trip good sir wait till u see what i have planned n Heaven 
Don't trip good sir wait till you see what i have planned in Heaven RT My crazy adventure with is beginning its end! 😔 
Rob Gronkowski just had the best touchdown celebration for the year regardless to what's done from this point on... #hilarious 
That's some cool shit 2 say... made my sunday... thanks.. love ya RT I could follow just and be content with life 
😱 🆒 💯 RT 😂 I mean come on now. you have to be really specific when your trying to have an emoji convo dad 
😂 #dead RT I don't know what means. Sad eating pizza? 
😔 🍕 RT How are you sir? 
😳 Ms Sparks knows football.. RT 1934 :) 
That's what i'm talking about RT Can't complain, Feeling good living better 😎🙌 
I miss those days RT I remember when use to tell the corner he was matched up with what he was gonna do to them each week 
Baby i love you, you doing okay in your world? RT 1934 
Watching multiple games at once with before he heads back 2 Utah Steelers/Skins Dolphins/Jets Patriots/Rams  
Really digging the Steelers uniforms... anyone know the exact year for these throwbacks? 
Well my wants aren't important but i'll trade whatever for my needs... RT Chad, how much would you trade to have what you want 
So close yet so far... 
If not now next life time 🙏 RT maybe it's irrational, but I have this picture painted that 1 day I'm going to meet 
Can't go wrong with the black guy... RT Jeremy Kerley or Rashad Jennings? 
We are at iHop now with my other brother RT showin my pal a good time this weekend... 
See how special you are... smile man life is short... RT I never thought of it that way haha have a good day man 
😬 RT pjs 😬😂😂😂 
You're the sperm that won RT could you tweet me something uplifting so I have a good day today? It'd mean a lot from you .. 
Shoe Game #NewBalance Call of Duty pj's RT Shoe Game #Y-3 yohji Yamamoto #Ochospiration   
💤 ✌ 😔 
🙏 RT they gonna be like "how In the hell"? when did this happen hahahaha 
green light bruh... I'm rocking solo... I'm hungry... lets go... fuck it 
I feel great Ms. Cheryl, 🔙🔛🔝🔜 RT How are you feeling? What is it that you need right now? 
Sis i need more than bishop Curry n prayer right now 🙏 RT ok goodnight! Hope to see u in church n the AM with bishop 
Sis he's going to club Dream with my homies, it's past my bed time 😴 RT hey chad where's what's next on the agenda lol 
Me and my big cuzz chilling tonight... Samari Rolle  
Norte Dame and Oklahoma game is very good... who are you rooting for and why? 
What time is the Irish/Sooner game... 
There's 1 promise i haven't kept, still working on it RT he stays true to his promises ! He's so humble 
Taking to CoCo's happy hour before we watch tonight's college game... The homies taking him to club Dream tonight... I got to sleep 
Thanks but was i not as sexy on tv? No high def RT Ooooh just saw and I have to say he's much sexier in person 
It's on 11th n collins RT What is going on in the Miami no more David's Cafe' ??? 
They are nice guys that never get f"ed over... duh RT why Jeter and Clooney? 
Channel your inner Derek Jeter/George Clooney n focus RT why is it nice guys always get shitted on and left behind. Fuck this 
We have infiltrated South Beach... jet skis... scooters... wet willies... cigars... cafe con leche's...  
Oh man this is going to be an awesome day... just picked up and is recovering from last night... turn up dammit 
It's been cut off... 
Has anyone seen my little brother 
dude where the hell are you... damn... 
In Overtown dude, be there later RT Yo where are you? I came all this way, and you ain't here!  
Yo basic ass... STFU... RT be flying guys in to kicc it with him that's GAY to me lol 
Cheryl it's really hot today with a light breeze... going 2 south beach after we watch kids 🏈 RT Is it a nice day there today? 
Headed to Jackson's in Overtown with to eat brunch then to Liberty City to watch a few Pop Warner games... 
Being knit picky on every small thing as if you're Mother Theresa all of a sudden.. 
I'm sleep by 8:30 each night, making an exception for to show him MIA RT when do you sleep? Or should I ask do you sleep 
Saw him RT Just an FYI I am going to tweet you each week about #TeddyBridgewater until you let me know you have seen him play 
Having a yard sale, all her stuff is going 4 $1 RT she took the dogs that's wrong! She can take the allowance but not the dog! 
No she took the dogs... RT yo you gotta dog?! I went by the pool and got scared! 
No rules, McDonalds, Dave n Busters RT Chad can I get a RT for a dude taking off work to watch 4 kids all day! I need to focus up 
Lol... RT Roger that! I'm chillin with the fish haaa...RT I'm on the east wing... lmao... 
He still wouldn't hear me... RT chad why are you tweeting him when you can just yell upstairs lol 
I'm on the east wing... lmao... RT Where the hell are you? I'm walkin round your house 
About time shit... shower up n stuff we're headed to eat in Overtown..RT haha yeah man I'm up. I got 4 hours tho haaha 
Painting.... RT other than sports whats your greatest talent? 
Like Bruno Mars band... but I can't sing RT Let's start a band. I'll be the drummer & you can be lead singer. 
I'll wait till it drops officially RT my niggas meek shit leaked just download it like everyone else 
Was able to hear one of songs inside a venue I took to last night, intro song was unreal, can't wait till it drops.... 
#ghoe ? RT Does even know what #ghoe is?? That would be crazy.. 
Smh at society 😔 RT wats good wit u owning a smart car u played in the NFL u should be driving a benz or something fresh 
How many Smart Cars? RT why are you not in Greensboro NC for #ghoe they trying to stunt out here... #phantoms everywhere 
He doesn't need rest, he just left 9 inches of snow in Utah, my guest r allowed 3 hours sleep max RT let the man rest! 
Are you up... proper etiquette when visiting Miami for the 1st time means only 3 hours of sleep is necessary... You're not in Utah 
Breakfast in Overtown in the morning at Jacksons, then to South Beach RT what's in store for tomorrow? 
Still moving strong past 12 a.m. Now at Gotta get some coffee he's wasted 😱  
All Star? you mean E-Harmony on steroids... that's basically what it is RT hey you gonna be in town for Allstar weekend ? 
I will send with my friends but i won't be able to come.. 😩 RT Aye bring him to KOD 😁😁😁😁 
Got out late... It's past my bed time but fuck it... got to show him what the #305 is about...  
That last slice of pizza 👀 
Damn Al Sharpton... RT Why chad never fly out black people ?? 
Funny shit... Had my homies take to Take 1 on 79th st. Don't think he'll be the same guy once he leaves Miami.. 
Taking to south beach after his abduction... 1st stop... Davids Cafe... 
bruh hit my phone... gotta bring through to meet everybody... 
welcome to Miami... 🌞 🌊 
Funny shit got kidnapped but they brought him back... no bull shit... ask him 
Just picked up from the airport.. 1st stop where it all started for me as a kid... #LibertyCity 
😡 RT It truly does piss me of how tweets at literally everyone &amp; their mom and never tweets at me. What the hell 
Bruh i'm 10 thousand my dude... much love RT What s been good with you 85, hope all is well in your in... 
F yeah 😎 RT Lets do this!! I brought my party pants... RT Dude you have no idea the fucking fun we're gonna have... 
Dude you have no idea the fucking fun we're gonna have... RT FINALLY made it!!!! Let this adventure begin! #Blessed 
I'm killing my brother in Madden and NBA2K13... Nothing else to play him in #shrugs 
Text me arrival time RT cool they fixed it so we don't have to change planes. We'll leave in 20, it's a 2 hour flight I think. 
I'm in the Pork n Games right here RT I ain't never seen Chad in the pork n beans or in Carol City.  
So what time you get here... RT yo dude. They working on the plane so I'm like an hour behind right now 😞 
I remember seeing live in Cincinnati right before Frankie Beverly n Maze performed and if angels had voices... 🙏 👼 she's one 
My goodness does anyone else have album "Live At House of Blues" her last song -He Loves Me- #Epic (have to see her live) 
Taking him all over miami, starting n Overtown n Liberty City RT What will you &amp; your friend be doing this weekend Chad? 
Switched up the pace a little bit jamming stuffing my face with this chicken and rice... Once I'm done ass whippings in NBA2K 
I'm laying in the bed i made... my time will come again RT don't you wish you could be playing in the NFL, Chad? 
Itunes still says pre-order man... pissing me off RT did u listen to the new album yet? 
I have that as well i smoosh your face in NHL RT Hey why dont you grow a pair and play NHL 13. #grassfairy 
Waiting on to land at 4... he's chilling with me till sunday RT what's good bruh? 
Just demolished another victim in Fifa 13... listening to album headed to grab Pollo Tropical for lunch... what y'all doing? 
what's your excuse this game 2- nill 
how's that ass whooping taste 
Lets go... RT you online? Lets play a game of FIFA quick 
I drive a matte black Smart Car, real shit sis RT u no damn well u dont drive no smart car!!  
Spending on fans is an exception RT your bill was a little higher when you took me + 200 other ppl to dinner/movie in LA 
A Smart Car... RT u don’t care for cellphones what’s about your cars? What you drive🚲? Or 🚙. 
That's a month or two worth of dinner/movie dates at the normal places i dine at... RT Wtf anyone gonna do w/ 400 tho? 
You rather a $500 phone with no money in ya pocket or a $100 phone with $400 in ya pocket? RT MetroPCS is not ballin' 
I've a Metro PCS, jail broke it so it says iPhone when i tweet RT how are u tweetin so much if you don't even have a cell phone? 
Equivalent to a mothers love... thank u 😘 RT No matter what, I looooove me some Good morning black on black sir 
Lmao... 😂 RT Oh thought that was my name 😕 RT When will sexy ass RT my little ass? ;) 
Depends if you want your ass whooped... ⚽ RT you wana play a quick game of fifa?:) 
I'm awesome RT Doing well big bro! Getting ready for Sweden soon! Gonna be cold up there! You good Fam!? 
John what's up? RT yoooo boss!!!! 
lmao... 
Cool, see you at 4 RT Sounds good bro, first stop ATL ✈ “@ochocinco: Oh shit there you are... Tootsies for dinner.. hurry up" 
Oh shit there you are... Tootsies for dinner.. hurry up RT hahah boarding my first flight right now homie! 
Yeah he gets in at 4:30... i forgot his damn twitter handle... 😬 RT did you really fly the guy from Utah out there? 
I'm home mom RT I swear I'm at the airport looking at headed to the Ville. He's very animated...it's gotta be him. 
My bed time is 8:30pm n i arise at 5:30am RT Get out the bed bruh...its too early. RT What's good boss... 
trying to download new album and it still says pre-order instead of buy... Please release mine expeditiously 😡 
What's good boss... RT What you over there doing bruh...lets drop a moab or something. 
I hate waking up to pee pee... if only the toilet was courteous enough to come to the edge of the bed 😫 
You lil fucker i don't even know about alcohol let alone weed pecker head RT don't act like you don't know about weed chad! 
10 bags of high grade? Weed is graded? like A to Z? RT found 10 bags of high grade in his apartment 
Are you serious or playing? no TV at starbucks... RT he got caught w weed again...#smdh 
He's awesome... duh RT what's with the honey badger? 
What's wrong with you shallow bodies of water... She's awesome RT taylor swift? when did you turn gay? 
Yes Taylor Swift shit... she has a song about our 3 day relationship "Stay Stay Stay" RT are you joking. Taylor swift? 
Listening to Taylor Swifts album... good stuff... just finished eating dinner at Bahama Breeze headed 2 Starbucks to top my awesome night 😁 
Lesbian alternatives to the phrase 'Cockblock' 1) Vagected 2) Clam jam 3) Clitorference, 4) Beaver impeder 5) Taco blocko 
Hi, i'm Chad 😃 RT don't you know I S/O almost everyday? & I get NO RETWEET OR NO REPLY! 😔 
Heaven RT If you can go to one place you haven't been to, where would it be? 
2 hours RT How long do you train in the mornings? 
Ms. Cheryl once i train at 5am there isn't much for me to do after 😬 RT Chad, what are you going to do today? 
yo what's good 
It was either watches or clothing... nobody wants 2 mismatch with me so watches it was RT what made you make watches? #85 
Watching the movie "Sarafina" before I head to bed... tweet y'all in the morning... -god willing- 🙏 
Stuttering "Child Please" RT haha ok ill be prepared to beat you anytime 
Ok well we'll play when i get off work 😩... wait nevermind but we'll play RT we played 2 matches one for each one 
You don't stand a chance in this new Fifa... who won the last game we played? RT hope youre training to beat me on this Fifa 
Yeah playing the computer is easy on beginner... Keep practicing n let me know when u ready 2 lose RT I'm loving this FIFA 
#Epic RT Learn more about the #InTheBreaks app series at   #Football #AllPro #Workouts 
Play this for your haters... don't ever change just repeat the hook... as followers I love n support all of you... 🙏  
Got that dope ___ and she's a fiend 👀 
Watch "Temple Grandin" then talk to me 👊 RT Claire Danes!? You sir just lost all credibility in who can act and who can't 
She's the best actress besides Julia Roberts n Clair Daines son of a batch of raw cookie dough RT Meryl Streep sucks 
"Clipped Wings" 
"One Step Closer" 
Dude 1st woman i saw with curves on the big screen... Jamie Lee Curtis in "True Lies" RT Susan Sarandon in Bull Durham . 
Diane Lane in the movie "Unfaithful" with Oliver Martinez/Richard Gere... RT Diane Lane beats them all! 
Remember Goldie in the movie "WildCats" please tell me you saw this.. RT not as fine Goldie Hawn 
How fine was Meryl Streep in the movie "Death Becomes Her" 😍 
Again for those offended, throughout the day there will be an occasional indulgence in the vernacular which you may not approve of... #sorry 
Please excuse the profanity but sometimes one must express thyself with guttural language, it's an art-form that is truly unappreciated... 
Everyone’s middle name should be "Motherfuckin"...Try it, no matter the name It has a ring to it... 
Nothing's more embarrassing than that pantsless walk to get more toilet paper... I felt like everyone in Walgreens was staring at me... 😳 
Just dropped my kids off, remember in kindergarten , anyone who had the 64 color pack with the sharpener ran that muthafuckin classroom! 
"Success isn't a result of spontaneous combustion... You must set yourself on fire." 
Nah but the black person always dies first in horror movies... RT i know you aint scared lol 
Man y'all up... I keep hearing noises in the living room... shit I ain't going out there... feel like a damn scary movie... 
It's not crazy what did you expect... childs play... RT defeats best out of 3, thats crazy lol 
how's that 2nd ass whooping... keep practicing then get back to me... Better luck 
how was that ass whooping? 
Estaban 85 what's yours RT whats your gamertag 
send me a game invite I'm ready 
That must be another Chad... put my last name so i know it's real RT #ImJustSayin #tatt  
I didn't care... From Dade County to bull riding was enough for me RT is 1.5 seconds good? 
I rode Deja Blu for 1.5 seconds RT have you ever rode a bucking bull?  
Dogs can't earn 6 figures... RT Why do you even own a bull? 
Hold up give me a few minutes i was washing dishes RT he hasnt showed........ 
2 years RT how long have you owned a bull? 
Anybody else from Liberty City own a real live bucking bull... my bull Seis Siete is in the finals... check out my last retweet... 💵 
Now if i could get a 3rd job i'd be set.. RT is the best investment in a follow I've ever made on twitter 
😳 Do ya homework... RT got crazy taste in music wtf is Kendrick Lamar 
You can not estimate the immensity of the fuck in which I do not give. ✌ RT Unfollowed brother 
Cigar and cafe con leche...  
We gotta link up one of these days and vibe man RT down in Lauderdale chillin Fam 
Judge me... this song is the 💩  
Bruh where you been at man... RT big bru wats gud 
Be home at 9:30 RT ocho!!!! Lets do this thing, tournament for a charity of your choice come on man!!!! 
Must i demolish you both ⚽ RT RT !!!! “@lucajustsaid: lets get a little FIFA tournament going 
Don't have any minutes but you can text me after 9pm #rolloverminutes RT ima be there this week dm your number G 
Yeah bruh where you at? i'm at my every day spot chilling coffee/cigar RT you in Mia G ? 
Unemployed bruh what's good... RT wat up nigga 
A little too high maintenance for me... I'm at Davids Cafe boss RT STK lobby bar chief!! #whaaaaaaa #noWayyyyy 
dude where are you? 
I rarely do shout outs or ask you guys to follow people but follow appreciate it awesome followers of mine 
Richly Unemployed day getting ready to do not a damn thing...  
#Fact yee yee RT You've never seen route running until you seen up close training in the offseason 
Friday, i'll dm my info RT you tell me when and I'm comin then!! Can we hit up David's Cafe? 
Utah? cmon son... i got ya flight bruh RT that Miami sunshine lookin better than this Utah snow right now, for real!!! 
Love you man... fuck it fly to Miami n chill with me #Tootsies RT just sharing that wisdom with me this morning!! #TwoTweets 
I never left the top dude, I'm winning without even winning #Think RT Keep your chin up and you'll be back on top in no time!!! 
The queen is the most powerful piece on the chess board, learn how 2 move her n u check mate every1 RT what's your next move bro? 
Lose all of it... don't be on the fence, fair weather fans/friends r fickle RT lost a lot of respect for my boy 
No I'm giving folks a chance to catch up... slap ya english teacher when you get some time... RT u feel off bro 
Dude that poem was ill right? epic RT Best poem iv ever heard was " As I look in your eyes " - 
Listen to the silence... 
Anyone else up? Working out at 5am is boring alone... 
Wow... Medal of Honor commercial looks nice... choices... new Call of Duty or Medal of Honor... shit or employment 
Thanks White guy RT It was really boring. Don't waste your time on it Black guy. 
I figured... i was standing up watching last weeks debate with popcorn RT Was a lot more subdued but still interesting... 
I'm sure the debate is good but there's no way Obama/Romney top last weeks debate... that shit was f-ing exciting across the board... 👊 
Recorded the debate... watching #MNF right now... will catch up on debate after game... RT No debate watching? 
Fixing oatmeal and eggs blasting one of if not thee best bands...  
He's standing on a stool, i spit for 10 straight minutes RT Are u shorter than wayne? Or is he standing on the bar stool? Lol 
Baby i am RAP dammit RT You've said it too many times with no proof, so I still believe Wayne beat you daddy. Sorry 😊 
Baby i killed Wayne in the booth RT dad you can't rap though. 😳 I can kill you in a rap battle  
Urban Outfitters/H&M/American Apparel/ RT Where you shop for clothes man? 
i'm downloading now, you heard my song with platinum shit RT You are late! but it's really really good 
Oh shit i'm downloading now... i'm sending you my demo RT iTunes should beready for you now 
Yes i'm happy my dear... RT You're gay. 
I have it all RT what u think of country music?  
Everybody is a thug now but my grown folk... when is the last time you actually listened to the words to Teena Marie's "Deja Vu" #realmusic 
bruh tell iTunes let me get your album now before I get upset... trying to get a jump on the masses.. lets colab... 
I have them on n app boss RT aye u got any footwork drills a young ambitious athlete like me can watch big bruh 
I have everything RT no George Benson?  
On my grown folk shit tonight before Monday Night Football...  
Vibing with and yes I rap now...  
Please mail them to me dude... RT Thanks for leaving all your Claire earrings in my car......@ochocinco  
Hi... I'm richly unemployed and I never match but I look good... available for family dinner or movie nights  
I can't believe I just lost twice... lucky goals at the end of regulation will require me to go back n make some defensive adjustments... 
Now playing who will experience the wrath as well... 
My first victim today is I will keep everyone abreast on his thrashing... 
Game invite on Fifa 13 please... Estaban 85... I will destroy anyone available regardless of your residing state or country... 
I know most of you are at work but is anyone home willing to play me in Fifa 13 online... even though you won't beat me at least try 😃 
Revenge... because karma is too damn slow... 😡 
Arguing like Edith and Archie... 
Just got a booty call from life... apparently it still wants to keep fucking me. 
I don't trust people that put the twist tie back on the bread... just spin it 
When u're in the shower and you hear loud thumps and you think, damn they're killing my family and I'll have to fight the attacker naked 😳 
My homegirl said “it's almost December I need a dude to keep me warm.” I said "NO" mofo you go buy a coat like the rest of us single folk! 
This shit is for the birds... 
Kids love snickers... RT what's the story behind your new picture? 
Say you will... 
Roses are red, my name is not Dave, this poem makes no sense, microwave... 
Did y'all see album cover "Jesus Piece" need your thoughts within the 140 character limit...  
Yeah and Toms and Louboutins 😳 what you wear? RT Chad, sweetie, does this mean you also wear Crocs? Say it isn't so! 
I don't want real gold... i wear Claires earrings damn sho ain't getting a real gold phone RT I would say Gold & Co. 
Anybody know what place/company did Meek Mill iPhone 5 all gold like this...  
One of my favorite songs and bands... I love these fuckers...  
Waiting to watch these games... RT WHAT'S UP FUCKER 
You should hear the stuff they didn't record... RT Those mic'd videos of are hilarious lmaooo ! 
That was 1 game, remember i put up 209 yards the next time we played RT what about Bodden from his days in Cleveland 
Back to back against Revis... a decade of route running was held n check 😩 RT what exactly were the two times in 10 years? 
How could you not... i signed your birth certificate.. RT Lol, You lucky I love you!! 
Can't be covered bruh, a proven fact except twice n 10 yrs RT you got to let me check you at the line is scrimmage tho! 
I birthed you, well participated RT I might have to teach you something, you can't walk around with me looking like that.. 
At Target... RT where did you find those call of duty pants? 
Bruh 1 on 1 to 11... i'll spot you 5 points... RT best avi ever! #Lmfao! 
American Apparel denim shirt/Call of Duty pants/Kilroys = ya daddy is fresh RT Daddy, what do you have on? 😳😖 
Dude don't listen to the haters... chicks love a well groomed lad... RT are pedicures MANLY? 
Yes... you don't have those Call of Duty pants? dude so comfortable... RT are those call of duty pajamas ?! lol 
I still keep my normal Sunday ritual of manicure/pedicure before a game even though I'm not playing.. Outfit on point  
My outfit is on point... Hold up RT I'm surprised there no pic of your good clothes. The people need to see! 
Good morning... I got on my good clothes to watch today's games... cooking hotdogs n pork n beans to eat... y'all up yet? 
dude you're dope... #SNL 
Les i'm open too man... how's life boss RT i'm up Chad... And i'm still open too 
Anybody still up... I just woke up to pee pee... 
Man I'm sleepy... Going to bed... wish I had oatmeal/eggs to eat before I go to sleep... grocery store tomorrow before the games come on... 
UM/FSU game is on point... 
Savior with an iphone in the mirror? 😳 RT Your AVI maybe misinterpreted to people thinking you think you are The Savior. 
Competing/Entertaining/Shit Talking... RT What do you miss most about football? 
Bruh i'm loving life my dude RT bro your weird… but entertaining… im bussin up right now ha 
Start off with Padron or Partagas... RT headed to a cigar bar bruh what kind of cigars u smoke? 
What ya credit looking like?💰RT be a doll and come over to #teamwhitegirl and marry me 😘😘 
Society usually does but i love all you fuckers literally 😜 RT what defines beautiful? 
Can I have your album early please... -The Black Guy- 
I'm home bruh in Miami watching the UM/FSU game... RT Where 
Damn homie 😳 RT Video: Q: Who is the hot ex-girlfriend Citi Private Pass commercial? A: Jocelyn Deboer...  
Sofia Vergara dammit... RT Halle berry or Angelina Jolie? 
The lady at the beginning of the Citi Bank commercial that dumps the guy at dinner because he's boring is beautiful... 😳 
She's in my phone... i have every artist n genre RT have you listened to Emeli Sande" ?  
Anything that's not rap is rainbow u closed minded pixie stick mixed with porcupine piss RT that was the gayest tweet 
Jamming Jessie J. album killing her song "Big White Room" folding these damn clothes... managed not to mix my colors n whites this time 😃 
Excuse me... back to music... I'm sitting here thinking about female artist listening to Charli Baltimore album "Cold As Ice" love her... 
Don't walk sis float with meaning RT Wish I could say the same! A day in stilettos is NOT #powertothefoot!!! #ouch #nobueno  
"The Power Is In My Feet" -Athletes Foot- 
Being so accessible has been bad 😩 RT you are just a good person that truly believes you are an equal to everyone. Great quality. 
Play Call of Duty and Fifa... RT Hey bruh how'd you deal with the breakup? Struggling getting past day #1. Any tips? 
Yes i wrote "Brand New" on his mixtape before the Carter 4... RT Don't u write Lil Wayne's rhymes too? 
Speaking of Adele i wrote "Set Fire To The Rain" look at the album credits... RT only one you missed is Adele. 
I paved the way for Trey Songz, Chris Brown n Tyrese by choosing to play football RT Didnt know could sing?? 
She's awesome.... think she should do a song with me...  
On repeat washing clothes at home waiting on my daughters to get here...  
Child no words needed just keep sAnging... RT I don't even have words. 
I'm your official marketing/promo person free of charge... you sing it ill make sure the masses hear it #TweetTeam 🙏 
I'm listening now... thank you RT here's the new single I just released. "The Name of Jesus"  
I can't sing but I'd love to stand there and lip sync with the choir... nobody would know the difference 🙏 
If you love gospel as I do and don't feel anything from before the 1 minute mark you're not human...  
Oh my goodness your voice in the video was amazing... thanks for the tears in this public place 😥 
I hear you have quite an impressive rendition of "For Every Mountain" care to bring me to tears with a link or video of it? 
Where can i find this RT If you've never heard sing For Every Mountain, u've never heard it right. Check her out. 
Ok cool RT its on a video camera, we didn't even have cell phones when we was at SMC but ill get it on my computer n tweet it 
Tweet it RT I got the funniest video ever of u lol we was at school on campus at SMC, u talking about how u like fat chicks, 
People stop confusing stage presence with vocal talent... C'mon 
Dumb shit she can sing live without help or aid... eat a urine popsicle RT Mariah is auto toned dumb ass 
I ran out of my character limit... Mo killed it at BET awards, tribute to Whitney was Epic RT why isn't Monica in there? 
Both of them are superb but i was referring to the best voices... RT sade, Alicia keys, Adele.. 
Music: Best voices... Christina Aguilera, Whitney Houston, Mariah Carey, Jennifer Hudson, Beyonce... dare to argue with those 😡 
The money I'd pay (not that much) to hear someone sing "For Every Mountain" live... over n over n over... 
I'm free and in shape... RT I'm thinking about running the Hill! Any takers? 
Epic... RT "I am different; not less." - Temple Grandin 
dude can you jump in this debate please? I love you man, they don't understand... 
Nobody can argue with this... Clair Danes is thee best in my eyes after her role in "Temple Grandin" ridiculously difficult part to play 😳 
Also Dicaprio... Johnny Depp... Sean Penn, i named my 2 favorites with difficult roles/range RT Christian Bale sir 
Random thought... the best 2 actors with the most range are Edward Norton n Daniel Day Lewis... if you disagree we'll argue dammit 😡 
Excuse me on my mistake I meant "Last of the Mohicans" not The Devils Rejects... Mr. Lewis didn't play in that movie... carry on.... 
Making it a Daniel Day Lewis day watching "The Crucible" "Gangs of New York" "The Devils Rejects" "There Will Be Blood" until UM/FSU play... 
Hey... it's Saturday and I love you guys... please excuse me for interrupting your timelines... 
I lost already.. they were closer to the ground that's all RT when they arnt looking just move the arrow to cheat back! 
Yes, i shouldn't lose to them, i'll establish dominance soon RT So just cause they're better than you means they're cheating? 
My kids are cheating playing Twister... they can reach each color and I'm struggling... 😩 
Ever tried playing "Twister" with kids? Don't... 😡 
Using this as evidence to kidnap/keep my kids...  
Watching Young Guns 2 with Emilio Estevez... classic movie... 
5 days 😳 RT Just read tl for like the past 5 days! Love his tweets ;-) 
It's easy to love folk when the sun is shining... so many duck and hide at that sight of clouds n rain... 
Well pick a side... like/dislike.. I'm not changing RT the more you open your mouth lately the less I am starting to like you! 
I never gave up in life... i stumbled... gave up... child please RT I give up!!! 😩😒😡 
It was a joke... catch up to speed with everyone else my dear RT want ADS for what? 
Playing Call of Duty bruh RT chilling on this madden u online? 
Shit looking through wants ads in the news paper, whats good RT what it do bra 
Hold up let put my robe n house shoes on... call let it ring once then call back RT bout to call u.. Go to the pay phone 
That's best dove i could find in my choice of emoji's... RT that's a damn cock not a dove!! 
"releases doves" 🐓 curtain closes... cue the organ 😪 RT you just lost a follower. #niceknowingyou 
Funny nobody gonna tweet or call my phone to check n see if I'm alive after not tweeting for 4 hours? Selfish mofo's... I could've been dead 
All love.. RT respect man..."Before every blessing there is a storm"...Ray told me that after my bro passed...remember that 
Nothing bruh keeping my head up, training and being a full time dad for the 1st time RT what's going on bro? 
I only had 250k followers back then but that stuff was hilarious RT that shit was hilarious 
How many of my followers were around when Lil Duval, Kevin Hart, Marlon Wayans and I all went at it with the joke session for hours 
😂 #dead RT I'm bout to go shut baby gap down RT Grab a Dickie fit from the USA flea market RT 
I'm on stage tonight at the Improv.. i'm the headliner RT I heard u gonna be doing stand up comedy soon 
Grab a Dickie fit from the USA flea market RT I'm headed to aventura. I need a outfit for tonite 
Meet me at Davids Cafe... RT leaving bal harbour 
that was me calling you yesterday... it was a weird number... was using the pay phone on 79th at the metro rail station.. 
yoooo where you at 
Kids napping/Kidnapping "S" duh RT I don't get it......? 
Judge: why'd you kidnap your kids... Me: sir it's a misunderstanding, my kids were napping, somehow the letter "S" was left out 
I don't have any rules... RT Why do ur kids want to stay with u longer 
See that's irresponsible on her part as a mother 4 not tweeting right? RT she hasn't tweeted in over a month lol 
I'm not wasting my damn minutes so i tweeted her instead... RT lmao why not just text her or even call Chad 
I told her via twitter in the previous tweet so i'm in the clear... RT you better tell the mama... 
I'm not bringing my kids back home... if there's an issue don't call the police my followers said it was ok, tweet them... 😬 
Is it still considered kidnapping if my kids rather stay with me instead of going home and I choose not to take them? 
Thanks for the clarification grasshopper... RT the brown M&M is a girl, the red one is the dancn one. 
You have another suggestion for my kids? RT party city is such a rip off and cheap material. 
No private school today 4 my daughters, going to get Halloween costumes at Party City, I want to be the dancn brown M&M from the commercial 
I feel great Ms. Cheryl... with my kids so i'm cool RT Are you feeling bad? What's wrong ? Love you! 
MW3 RT Chad I just got dumped after 3 years of being an amazing girl. Right before my tigers clicned the ALCS Any advice? 
#LoveThis Every bad situation will have something positive... Even a dead clock shows the correct time twice a day... 
Never assume everyone in the front row is a fan... 
Damn bruh that's messed up... RT Never trust a nigga who buys minutes for they phone 
You welcome... be blessed RT thanks for the love! Love you too, great guy!  
He wasn't looking... i almost knocked him out RT still don't know why you tried to take on Ray. 
I meant every word of it... RT watching your NFL sound FX 😂got me dying over here! 
Shit i'll catch up with you in heaven, not ready RT I've officially died and went to heaven, just saw #MarryMe 
I must've had my earphones... my umbrella works just fine RT I heard every storm runs out of rain. 
You good bruh cmon, don't know who u are in here RT Waiting for too finish eating too ask for a pic 
Rick Owens boss RT Givenchy, nice choice 
I got a long way to go sis... RT glad to see you back 
Just a little bit... i'm under construction without losing my edge RT Dude. You're glowing. Are your powers intensifying? 
Kept my word eating lunch with at David's Cafe...  
I'm acting my wage that's all... RT - idk why acting like he's broke. When he's actually far from it 
Hold up bruh... let me put some minutes on this phone... RT hit me.. 
Yeah RT Set fire to em big bruh! lol Lemme know when we u ready to do BAD BOYS movie remake this time with 2 Mike Lowreys! 
And I'll take yo chick wearing it, no bullshit... RT U Got A Skirt On In Ya Avi I Dont Respect U Brah! 
I guess you don't remember our clown sessions on twitter? RT about to clown on if i could go I would 
Where at? RT Well see tomorrow RT I got jokes for days cmon RT Only if u get on stage 
I got jokes for days cmon RT Only if u get on stage RT Yo hit my phone... need 2 tickets to your show.. 
Yo hit my phone... need 2 tickets to your show.. 
A new born 👶 RT Man you need a regular chick bruh somebody that don't even know your a professional athlete 
I don't get to play football RT either way it's illegal. That's what's wrong with America. u're famous you get to do what you want 
Flying and taxi-ing into the gate are totally different.. RT man they let you fly the plane 
😂 #dead RT that's 1 good looking flight attendant. I flew United last month and all they had were dinosaurs attending 
They allowed me to taxi my flight into the gate...  
My flight attendant caught me on twitter not paying attention  
I just landed as well, eating at Davids Cafe at noon RT hey, just landed in Miami...you around? We should get some brunch lol 
Poster or Cardboard cut out? RT Waking up next to ---- Damn... That's all I can & will say... *Deletes Tweet* 
Every bad situation will have something positive, even a dead clock shows the correct time twice a day, rock with me I'm human 🙏 
Thank you for not ditching me as a fan after my mistake, I'll be a better Chad as I keep working on me, I Love You... 
Some leave when your life is ruined n some come around to help you build it back up 👀 RT certain someone, WHO? 
When i tell you it ain't easy but a certain someone has become my SPINE RT I admire your strength and ability to prevail!! 
😳 RT "Surround yourself with people who love you enough to offend you with the truth, not what you want to hear" 
"In prosperity our friends know us... In adversity we know our friends" -Unknown- 
I blend in with everybody else... you wouldn't notice me either RT anyone recognize you?? 
See the #2 n 116th on the monitor RT You on the 2 train? i dont believe that. take a picture  
Back on the 2 train headed to 42nd street... now I'm excited to hear someone else sing and nobody is performing... 😡 
Z what's good sis... all is well, walking upside down, view is much cooler RT awwww hope all is well Easter Bunny 
My mom and enjoying this beautiful morning...  
My lil sis came to eat breakfast at Sylvia's... fellas she needs a boyfriend.. follow her  
Eating breakfast at Sylvia's with and  
My mom just asked me the same thing... not sure what she means but i'm normal RT Why are you so different? 
Gave her $20 but asked her to sing "For Every Mountain" before leaving RT did u give her some money for singer? 
I was on the 2 train headed to Harlem.. dude this ladies voice was unreal this a.m. RT what train were you on today? 
Just caught the train... a lady was singing n her voice was amazing... #Wow    
That was me that texted you... Yee Yee.. I'm open RT yooooo what it do bruh 
Boxing/Cycling/Sex... no particular order RT What's the 3 best workout advice you can give? 
Love you still RT Me & Chad Wish I could say he was sweet, but he wasn't. Only wanted a pic for my mom.  
Some 8 inch Giovanni's RT Aye what kind of rims u got on yo smart car? I'm searching for some for mines... 
To get the Lamborghini Aventador... can't have both anymore 😡 RT why did you sell your car to French Montana ? 
But i have no filter... wouldn't want anyone to get in trouble RT YES! It's what the people want! 
Ferrari? My Smart Car is faster backwards RT mistype on my part. Doing 120 in a ferrari made it difficult to text. 
Are sure you want me to take over your airways RT Come up to Funk Flex's show since you're in NY! 
In NY, what's up boss RT Char are you in Miami? 
My moma holding me up i'm ready RT Chad....@ochocinco You said breakfast not brunch! I'm LATE FUCKING wit you! 
Anybody want to be late for work and eat breakfast at Sylvia's in the morning? 
You used the "N" my albino m&m grasshopper 😳RT I thought you saw all tweets my nigga 
Mark i can't see everybody's tweets dude... RT Do i gotta tell you i love you to get a damn retweet #DAMN 
You put 1 to many emoji's... that's that runaway Casper get missing love RT 😍love you😂😭😂 
My avatar represents "Hope" as each day goes by the colors get brighter n brighter RT explain ur picture in 140 characters or less 
Child Please i said restaurant... #EpicFail Mcdonalds/iHop/DavidsCafe RT Starbucks ! Lol 
Prove it.. what's my favorite restaurant? RT I LOVE YOU! 
Vic i'm good man... hope all is well... love you dude RT yo what's good CJ ✌ 
Love ya... 😜 RT LOVE YOU. 
😡 RT People aren't enjoying your off-season, in-bar Riverdance? 😳 RT 💤 RT We got a game baby!!! 
💤 RT We got a game baby!!! 
It was either watches or clothes, very few take chances dressing so watches it was RT Why did you decide to make watches? 
They'll be online... ask for site boss RT another sick watch on your wrist. Are they available in stores yet? 
How are you guys doing? I fucking love all of you... excuse my language... 
Seeing all type of heavy hitters in NY... says no football no problem... NBC awaits 😳  
The words from tonight... words with meaning n power... he spoke softly but his message "Screamed"  
We might not see eye to eye all the time but... is rocking with me through the highs n the lows...  
Myself and enjoying a cigar at The Grand Havana...  
I love you 
Find someone that knows how to sew... good feeling to have legs to your table RT how do u mend a broken heart kind sir 
Me? Not perfect... you? RT you. 
😜 RT Swear I just saw walking on 5th ave but I could be crazy ..If so, he's beautiful 
"I May Not Be There Yet But I'm Closer Than I Was Yesterday" 
"If it means that much to you you'll make the necessary changes" -Some Black Guy- 
Fight for it... I am... 
I just fell out laughing... i love you to death... goodnight RT umm.. I mean *Daddy. that darn auto correct 😁 
Bruh? RT Merrrrr. 😘 Love you too bruh. 😏 
I love you but i gotta go... watching Broncos-Falcons.. mer mer RT 😂 yeah okay.. 
Well add the artist at the end of the tweet shit... almost grounded u RT It's a Rihanna song dad.. chillaxx 😒 
WTF... who is that subliminal message for... better be a song RT baby I love you I need you here with me Alll the tiiiiiime 
It's too lazy... this is why i need to proof read ya homework RT Man.. I'm to lazy. I'll show you...........someday 
Child please, twit pic it let me see.. RT I did my homework long time ago daddy.. ☺ No need to check, trust me. 
Why you hating... did you do your homework? Twit pic it so i can make go over it... RT so 1995 😒 
Well i can't stay at the bottom to long... i start climbing Monday RT Be careful with that climbing shit. It's dangerous. 
I went shopping for climbing gear sis... RT What did you do today? 
how's the weather in New York... can I visit... 
how's the weather in New York... can I visit... 
Mommie you confusing me... RT my bad you meant lad. I don't cougar 
You care to dance with a young lad... 
Lmao... suicidal... i been dead... RT Chad your worrying us.. You sound Suicidal/ #staystrong 
"It's gonna be a long climb" 
TD? Wow? RT wow... 
Would we have won it all or lost it all like ochocinco... -Big Sean- 
Peaceful as hell walking the beach this late... waves crashing is cool but having to use the light on the phone to see is killing my battery 
Hmm...  
Everybody good... 
Prayers for my Santa Monica Corsair teammate Steve Smith... hoping for the best #Panthers 🙏 
All I need is 5 seconds... I'll return the favor...  
Nothing but love for my followers...  
With my daughters all day today... don't know any of the cheers but I'm supporting home team today #LibertyCityWarriors  
Smiling is the new crying... don't ever stop smiling 😊 
It takes TWO to build an empire bruh... RT they cant keep a good man down! Build an empire 
Life isnt about waiting for the storm to pass... it's about learning to dance in the rain and I'm killing this two step... 
My line "CO85" i can send you one... RT What kind of watch do you wear? 
I love all of you...  
You ever threw a boomerang? Same concept... RT Why get a tattoo of Evelyn and then file for divorce weeks later? 
I changed my last name to a damn number... I never had it to begin with... RT Yu done lost it bruh!!! LoL! 
You can't play hard all ya life... A chick gone get you n that space RT u went out bad sukerrrrrrrrrrrrrr 
She's on my leg so i can have that sit down anytime... RT Do you ever see yourself having a sit down with your wife 
My little brother  
My daughters have abandoned me n went to cheer leading practice, early feast at seems to be the plan with 
They are falling asleep already... what is it with kids when they get in vehicles they fall straight to sleep...  
Try being a QB under duress with Clay Matthews on your ass playing Madden, now imagine n real life RT terrible decision maker 
Extremely talented, rocket arm n accurate when given ample time to throw... RT your unfiltered opinion of jay cutler...go! 
It's intermission at Disney on Ice... out of all the different scenes I only knew the songs to "The Little Mermaid" I was singing everythang 
That awkward moment when my daughter ask "daddy why you not at work" n I don't know how to answer it appropriately... enjoy Disney baby 😳 
Being that I've no consent to post pictures with thee other kids heres my mini me Moca....  
Riding on the school bus for the 1st time since highschool... can't make a video since all the kids are spread out with seat belts on... 
Yeah let me make 1 with the kids hold up... RT give us 1 million plus people that love you a video 
Yes, i have no rules and all the kids will end up on the ice.. RT Are you sure its a good idea for you to be a chaperone? 
Beautiful morning headed to Disney on Ice with my daughters class... being the chaperon for the class should be fun... What y'all doing? 
They just killed it on NFL Network with that "Beast" segment.... 
Love ya bruh... you got 2 let the QB know before the snap u'll be open RT U a fool wit that ye ye RT Ye ye ye.. 
I'm rooting for individuals boss, just want to see a good game... RT Who you got in the game bruh 
Chicago and Green Bay.... who y'all rocking with? 
Fuck no... It's gone stay right where I put with the other 43 tattoos RT now do you regret getting that tattoo of evelyn? 
Love u too Ms. Cheryl, sorry 4 letting you down RT Keep your head up Chad. Your true friends & fans support you. Love to you. 
Make sure it's not lighting n thundering RT u have requested prayer, and I'm going to make sure u get mine. 
Always... ye ye ye RT you open? 
Ye ye ye... 
Once i took my shades off... yeah RT do you see the light? 
Oh snap they miss me... cool stuff RT RT Omar, i'm still open...» Open and missed. 
Omar, i'm still open... RT RT Not being greedy but i need a little overtime when you pray for me... 
Not being greedy but i need a little overtime when you pray for me... RT Praying for you. 
You need 9 lives to catch up... ain't nothing changed... RT Employed RT What we feeling like today? 
I've no choice but to be good sis... RT you good? 
What we feeling like today? 
Sis you know nothing about that real old school music... RT You're too young to know about that... LOL :-) 
The Whispers "Try It Again" RT what's one of your favorite old school jams? 
No but the Stop sign is clear as day... RT do u believe in star signs? 
Workout-Pray-Call of Duty-Pray-Train-Tweet-Kids RT CHAD I NEED UR HELP!! IM MISERABLE HOW CAN I REMAIN POSITIVE LIKE U? 
I wish all of you would come to court with me this morning... damn butterflies... 
Chad fucked up not Eve... RT I feel sorry for Evelyn has really destroyed his name and life. Keep yo head up bruh 
I never block... I can see you RT Chad why did u block me! That's not very friendly! I thought u were a friendly guy? 
Don't feel bad... I'm the sperm that won out of millions RT I feel bad for seems like he really going thru it.! 
Send me my damn "Donkey of the Year" certificate or plaque... RT What Up Bro 
Yo... 
What does "normal" mean? RT do u believe its harder for women to date athletes or athletes to date "normal" women 
That's what they say grasshopper... RT yessir, do u think good things come to those who wait? 
Hey Ms. Sheila hope all is well... tell everyone at 19 i said hello and i love them... RT Always. :) 
Anybody else up this early? 
I made that bed, i got to lay in it... RT Its a shame you have to learn a hard lesson so publicly, you're in my prayers. 
Chilling with for the entire day... he really picked me up from the airport... this is cool shit  
I'll DM you my flight n arrival time... look forward to chilling tomorrow RT absolutely what time? And Miami or Ft Lauderdale? 
Can you pick me up from the airport in the morning? RT it's my boys birthday today, have fun in Vegas I'll hit you up tomorrow 
In Vegas boss... we can hang tomorrow RT yoo huge fan... I'm in Miami on vacation would be an honor to chill with you... 
Up for adoption... family with good credit preferably...  
#LibertyCity  
Central was losing to Booker T. 19-3 at halftime... Now winning 30-26 with 5:09 left in the 4th... 
Who in the hell is #4 for Miami Central Rockets... just scored a 60 yard td to put them ahead of Booker T. with 5:09 left n the game #Wow 
You mean Math.... it's cool RT Do you like meth? 
Straight up RT Smart car Saturday like   
Like a box of Crayola's kind sir RT Who the fuck wears green pants #chunt #subtweet 
Headed to watch Booker T. Washington vs. Central Rockets at Sun Life with n top 2 schools besides Jackson... 
Destroying my older brother in Madden13... why do I waste my time... 
Prayers for Tulane safety Devon Walker.... hoping for the best... 
Lmao RT You know how good it looks for me to have a black friend? Its the 21st century we gotta make this a public friendship. 
Some friend you are RT When you text me you blow up my fucking phone, twitter allows me to deal with your responses when I want 
Why do you tweet me when you can text my phone... pixie-stick face RT well played that was actually funny....... 
Watch your mouth, I just dipped n Oreo in milk n held it there until the bubbles stopped... RT Yo fucker you alive 
Best collegiate receiver ever... RT dont remember but i do miss those FSU peter warrick days! 
What years were the Hurricanes-Gators-Noles unbeatable regardless to who they played until they faced each other? 
Watching Texas A&M n Florida.... seems one sided thus far with the Aggies being the aggressor... seems a bit odd but refreshing I guess... 
Atheist i'm assuming? RT how can you follow something that simply isn't there? It is just not logical. Bible = fairy tale. 
The 3rd person is God... u can't see him but i'm following RT Why does it say you're following 3 but it only lists two? 
One from line C.O.85... ask when they drop RT What kind of watch is that in your profile pic?! 
We will qualify regardless... few adjustments that's all RT what do you think about US losing to Jamaica yesterdsay? 
AC-DC song "For Those About To Rock" has brought a slight change in my daughters body language... she'll be into Rock n Roll in no time... 
Killing my daughter ears with what I consider great music if she'd just embrace this soundtrack...  
I love you man, I took the rear view mirrors out my cars... no need to look back anymore RT waddup Johnson? You good? 
Easy answer RT what motivates you to get out of bed every morning?  
I keep "For Every Mountain" on repeat... RT So what Gospel songs have u been listening to lately.. 
Curtain closes.... doves released... moment of silence... you'll be missed RT unfollowing you. 
I buy and support each n every artist regardless of genre... RT is there any music you don't like? 
Forcing to listen to Disturbed album "Asylum" as we drive to the beach... the guitar solo in Ashes to Ashes = Epic 
Rocking with my daughter all day today... lunch... movies... shopping... south beach to people watch  
Enjoyed hearing Northwestern n Norland marching bands being the football game was one sides in favor of the Bulls... going to bed ✌ 
Damn my bad... appreciate the correction sis RT Lol Booker T. Vs. Central Tomorrow & The West Vs. Norland Tonight 
Going to watch high school football tonight with my kids... Miami Northwestern and Central are playing... what are y'all doing tonight? 
Okay that's a low blow... RT whatcha doing? I'm going to the bank right now to cash my check 
Lmao...they say moma is always right RT don't hate ... We still got a few more hours to put in to catch up to ur bank account 
Let me host the Improv tuesday RT I was gone ask u what u got going on this Sunday. Prob watch a few games.. U down? 
I bet y'all think y'all all that because y'all working and shit huh? 
awesome commercial... 
Sit yo ass down n embrace tutoring n math dammit... RT Sick.. stomach hurts. Ain't got no time for math tutoring.. gtfoh. 
All this false confidence by non-gamers is amusing RT run the madden I'll hit all u niggas! 
I'm ready lets go RT Another nigga quittin on me #Madden13King  
Don't post my baby pictures or no TV... RT Ground me. I have a ton more to share with your 3.5+ my 15.4. So yeah (: 
Okay you're grounded for the weekend... RT Me papa. Just a whittle baby.. #tbt  
I die a lot because i run-n-gun... quick twitch is on point enough to maintain 30 kills a game RT 30 kills 45 deaths 
I average 30 kills a game though #AnyMap no camping RT CJ you can't see me on Call of Duty! You would get dominated! Haha 
Wow RT Super throwback  
The Fifa players outside the USA are too good... I think it's all they do RT U said it right, in the States only !!! 
I'm the best in the states easily... consistently beating so called gamers RT How confident are you in your abilities in FIFA? 
You STFU and enjoy a urine popsicle RT STFU! U still rich! 
Imagine being me the past 3 weeks... you should be smiling soon after about your life... RT I'm sad today. :( 
The part i created for ME while u try n please the crowd RT & Have you lost your mind? #whatpartofthegameisthat 
You're suppose to pretend you're broke... Act your wage u'll stay rich RT Why does act like he's so broke? 
Just hearing about the death of Griselda Blanco from my compadre in Sinaloa, Mexico... 
You're buying i'm unemployed... RT Absolutely lunch is on me when we get back to Miami. 
special surprise.... 
The band ain't playing not coming RT I feel like has some free time on his hands, so he should come to a FAMU game 
Everything is good stateside my friend... muxh love mate... RT hope all is well man! Sending some support from Australia... 
Pretty cool is sufficient... RT There is no words to describe the shoes.  
Urban Outfitters is where i get all my clothes... RT where do you find these funny ass shirts??? lol 
dude you're 1 minute late... 
Breakfast...  
Yo.... 11am... my favorite place... 
Been out here since 5am... Awesome watching the sun come out...  
Love you Micky... enjoy France, see you stateside soon RT good morning from the beautiful So of France. 
Finishing up working out on beach n group of Dolphins are playing close n shallow water RT wuz going on man 
Beautiful morning... anybody else up? 
McDonalds-Bahama Breeze-Davids Cafe-Jacksons/Peoples restaurant in Overtown RT What does your diet consist of? 
Cleeks? You mean cleats big bruh RT Man gotta send me these cleeks 
They couldn't accommodate 1k people on short notice... RT Sup with the crab house tonite? 
Great nap... what's the beat with y'all? 
Man these people online on Madden13 are horrible.. I'm 24-0 and continuously haven't found 1 person that can score over 7 points.. 
I'm still open... 
Drew i'm training n chilling n training RT how r u my black brother 
Listening to Buena Vista Social Club.... they should perform in Miami... 
I love you RT Have a good lunch my dear friend. Enjoy the rest of your day. I think of you every day. Wishing you the best. 
this is my tattoo artist in Cincy does some amazing work 
Having lunch with the legend at David's Cafe....  
34 of my tatts were done by The other 10 by a friend in Cincy, 4got his twitter RT who does your tattoo work? 
Archangel Saint Michael... RT What's the image on your ribcage? 
Did u enjoy the meal? RT Was at Davids Cafe didnt see ya even got the special hope your doing good. 
🚥 Simon says stop at the red light RT I'm still searching for with his sexy ass. God please show me the way!! 
I'll never change... I'll take the chances nobody else will... 1 life.. Shit live it RT Thank for always keeping it 100 
What He or She really means...  
Urban Outfitters... love their stuff RT Sirrrr I'm looking for those jean shorts in your avi! Where'd you get them? 
Feeling great this morning... Anybody free to dine at #TheCrabHouse tonight? I got room for 1 thousand people? 
Damn mirror never lies no matter what... 
I never had it to begin with, i march to the beat of my own drum, F public opinion... RT you've officially lost it my man 
Well who driving you or me..... RT Ride or Die 
Put ya rain boots on baby... ya son loves ya... RT rainy all day thunderstorms 2nite & 2moro feeling remnants of latest hurricane. 
I dont give a flying pretzel in skittle rainbow hell what she filed for... RT I thought she filed for divorce tho? 
Divorce? Child please... that's my WIFE RT I really want to know why tatted Evelyn's face on his leg post divorce 
What's the weather like in NY? RT yo my King 
Moma... 
I made Quaker Oats peaches-n-cream oatmeal... 3 packs and orange juice RT where did you go for dinner yesterday? 
We are good friends... i frequent Mexico a lot... RT the president of Mexico follows You #TheBlackMexican 
Saki how are you.. hope all is well in Japan... RT of course I luv U 
That i do kind sir... who do you support? RT nothing but love for you. Even though you support Obama. 
So y'all acting funny on twitter today? Party to hard yesterday to love my black ass back... 
I love you if you love me... 
Wheels up.... ✈... Goodnight... 
Just saw the homie  
Never seen an all chrome Mercedes S63... followers do you like this... Y/N  
Locked and loaded with in Miami still working...  
I'm sure there are some good things going on in the show kind sir RT Hard knocks is boring without crazy antics 
Lmao... that was funny RT We're WHITE PPl ... but we'll figure out SOUL FOOD 4 YOU 
I don't have a team, it's just me by myself and plenty of people literally HATE me... u'll see after I tweet you... 
Some1 in Dade or Broward County will have soul food on their menu tomorrow, don't hesitate to invite me via twitter, I won't hesitate 2 eat 
Not trying to intrude on anyone's family function tomorrow but I was serious about coming to chill and grab a bite to eat, it's a holiday... 
what's good sis... enjoy ya Sunday... 
NO... RT Damn i tweet u everyday damn just say hi to me!!. 
I'm black, 34, unemployed, still training, made a mistake, apologized n I still look good RT Idk what to think about 
Good eyes but why you tweeting n driving? RT Crusin' on the 95! #Miami #Boss #Lambo  
What about mangos mixed with salt n vinegar cut up in a ziploc bag RT Try them pickled eggs with hot Cheetos 
Anybody still up... an hour past my bed time but I can't seem to fall asleep... I'm available to shoot the shit for 5 minutes 
Who puts on shoes when they hear the ice cream truck, u run out the house as u are RT why are you not wearing shoes? 
In Liberty City hitching a ride on the ice cream truck... 2 pickle eggs/hot sausage/Chek-strawberry soda...  
I did... wasn't pretty... eye opening talk... I'll be fine RT You should have one of those "talks" with Denzel again ocho... 
Lol... No chance my good friend RT Always a plate in Boston for you, I owe you one. Madden n FIFA Beating waiting for you too 
Anybody gotta an extra plate for me if they're having a feast on Monday... 
Always... Straight like dat RT Keep grinding classmate 
Lmao... RT chad each of us got 2 legs. thats 7.6 million at ur table 
3.8 million LEGS n my 1 table... no way i'm falling with yall holding me up RT stay strong ocho. You got 3.8 million of us 
Nothing but love my dude... RT I love you chad. You'll always be my favorite 
How we feeling this morning? A little love from the "Black Guy" enjoy ya Saturday I was just thinking bout y'all... 
Don't feel bad, my black ass messed up, I made the bed now I gotta lay n it RT I actually feel bad for Idk why tho 
Don't feel bad, my black ass messed up, I made the bed now I gotta lay n it RT I actually feel bad for Idk why tho 
I got to start life over and create a new one... RT why did you delete your bio? 
That awkward moment when you realize you're not on Madden13 and have to create yourself... 
My phone was off... Metro PCS be on some bullshit... RT why havent you been tweeting lately !!! 
Damn so y'all can't speak? 
Just kidnapped my youngest daughters... headed to cheer leading practice at Charles Hadley Park #LibertyCityWarriors  
˙˙˙noʎ əʌol ı ¿pooƃ llɐ'ʎ ˙˙˙uıɐƃɐ əɔuo əɔuɐlɐq ʇɐɥʇ puıɟ ɐʇʇoƃ ˙˙˙ɥƃnoɹ əq uɐɔ uʍop əpısdn əɟıl 
Took my daughter to meet yesterday... the look on her face and the tears were priceless...  
I haven't had to tread water in a long time... special thank you to my fans...family...friends for keeping me afloat... 
I'm appalled at such a stereotypical statement lil Lucifer...RT you're black you don't know a damn thing about Rock n Roll 
Another spelling/grammatical error in my previous tweet... "pour" 
What channel... they are showing kayaking on NBC RT Mexico vs. Brazil Olympic soccer Gold medal match is on tv right now. 
My kids won't wake up... would like to poor a bucket of cold water on them as a surprise... does if take the mattress long to dry? 
Yes i had fun... but my hands/head/eyes need to be in unison when i transition... too slow RT but did ya have fun? Enjoy? 
Back in the saddle for the 1st time tonight... never been so damn nervous... after 12 years the butterflies still arrive... gotta calm down 
I'm out it's 3 o'clock... headed to "Sun Life" a little early... the joy of adding flavor/color to a plain canvas... #ClaudeMonet 
Joe and i are friends.. he has sent me music on numerous occassions RT You should listen to another great guitarist 
I still have it, i play for real including tenor sax n a lil piano RT were you ever a fan of Guitar Hero?  
I have every genre of music there is and can talk about groups/artist/rappesr/bands etc. RT you listen to any Rush? 
Dont 4get "Eruption" by Van Halen RT I think you hit the nail on the head with Pink Floyd's Comfortably Numb what a Great song 
Yellow Ledbetter by "Pearl Jam" is playing right now in my ipod RT You can't leave out Orion by Metallica .... Great solo 
Also Pink Floyd's "Comfortably Numb" #Epic RT another great solo is the one Jimmy Page plays on "Stairway to Heaven" live 
I have that.. try song "Limelight" by Rush RT Best guitar solo is "Holy Wars...the Punishment Due" by Megadeth 
I'm all ears/eyes for that matter RT I can name several solo's from Stevie Ray Vaughn, That Kill Free Bird, but it is BADASS tho 
Love that solo but nothing like "Free Bird" madam RT Greatest solo is Eric Clapton on While My Guitar Gently Weeps 
Greatest solo is Lynyrd Skynyrd song "Free Bird" RT John Petrucci. He plays for Dream Theater. The guy solos like no other. 
Chip how do you determine best guitarist with so many different styles and genres? Is it based on personal preference? 
Coco Montoya? he's better than Mayer? RT pure guitarist? Coco Montoya. Mayer is fantastic, though. 
All year long with a mouth full of golds every Sunday RT Will you be rocking some more black nail polish Sir? 
John Mayer'ss 5 song album "The Complete 2012 Performances Collection is awesome... Is it safe to say he's the best guitarist out? 
Getting a mani/pedi listening to Esperanza Spalding new album "Radio Music Society" really excited about 2 nights body of work at Sun Life.. 
just a FYI I see everything y'all are saying even if you don't my name... carry on with your day... 
#MonaLisa RT The media, including myself, is exploitive. figured out how to control his own image, coverage. 
˙˙˙ʇıɥs ʞlɐʇ ˙˙˙ʇuəʇsısuoɔ ˙˙˙əlqɐʇunoɔɔɐ əq 
Some don't succeed due to the many options we have when things get hard... if ur only option was 2 eat or die... I bet you'd become a chef.. 
Bolt getting ready to run right now? Dammit what channel... 
Vibing at the house watching Japan vs. USA RT what's good big bruh . 
I dine at the one on 11th n Collins now grasshopper RT What r your thoughts on David's cafe closing.. Go dolphins! 
Lmao RT how is that whole marriage thing working out? My funeral is scheduled for 9/1/12... Your invited to come! Lol 
Like playing me in Fifa... RT Japan is really good! This will be tough to win! 
I'm off on Saturday... definitely coming to check you out boss... 
You can't tell me you wouldn't enjoy this in your house fellas...  
Love my dude.. be solid/technique sound #preseason RT good luck tomorrow bro... 
Throw back... mouth full of golds... RT #tbt 2006, when i first met  
Meet me at McDonalds on University... my treat RT dinner on chad when we hit Mia tonight... 
At the crib resting up... what da lick read... RT Black guy waddup 
Straight like that.... RT Go hard in Mia homie! 
I say even out the blocks 1st 20 to 30 meters... once Bolt opens up its ova RT who is faster bolt or chris johnson... 
7 gear DSG gearbox... driving today to clear my head before tomorrows game... RT how many gears that Bugatti got? 
Put it in 5th gear.... 
People look for a perfect relationship/marriage... all I want is a cheeseburger that looks like the ones on the commercials... 
Dottie Peoples... song "He's an on time God" #repeat 
Finally a bad day at work... dammit... 
Stupid Focused... 
"I will get the last laugh" 
"I don't wake up early because I love the mornings... I wake up early because I love winning at LIFE in general... 
I kno that black guy RT Meet tall, dark, n handsome. Welcome to the ZICO family, Chocolate 1 liter +  
No panic attack quite like trying to press "End Call" when you make an accidental call or sending an "Inappropriate" message to wrong person 
One not does simply.... you read the top line wrong... 
As our grandmothers have always said the man upstairs makes no mistakes... congrats.... 
Would love your feed back on how to improve as a news source... what other content would be interesting to the masses.. 
Really digging 
For those who corrected my grammatical errors earlier...  
This is how... RT how did u know she was the one?  
Come to Miami without knowing it you won't be able to order a simple meal... RT How did you learn Spanish so fast 
What time? RT U going watch #bolt run? 
It's only because it's our off day... RT I love the fact that is tweeting again. 
Dammit I just had a had grammatical error... I hate when that happens and it sticks out like a sore thumb in a perfectly good fucking tweet 
Relaxing n the players lounge at Dolphin facility watching "Braveheart" meetings not till 7:15 n coaches through me out the staff meeting 😂 
Already in place with and once i'm done playing RT will u ever try acting? 
Ok here you go... #DM RT i'd be fine with a DM lol 
Smooth as cat.. like George Clooney in a sense... his demeanor RT what was is like playing with Tom Brady?? 
Run across "The White House" lawn to see how far i can get RT what's one thing you haven't tried yet, that you would like to 
That's easy and RT Favorite comedian? 
I dont give a flying pretzel in skittle rainbow hell RT favorite cussword? 
money-skype-pictures via phone RT with you and your wife being very busy individuals, what keeps yal relationship flowing? 
I miss the fans but i have something special for them week 5... yes i will score RT do you miss Cincy? 
Ricky Bobby I'm on fire scene... RT If the NFL ever let you fully express yourself in the end zone again what would you do? 
Cincy = #'s system NE= Arabic Mia= West Coast RT hows the play book with the dolphins compared to Cincy and NE? 
None... I've mastered the West Coast offense, playing fast, consistency is key 4 me RT most challenging aspect of Miami offense? 
I'm assuming 6 feet under... "till death do us part" RT what are your plans after marriage? 
When i lost my virginity at 22... RT what's the proudest moment of your life 
People talk to me please... I've 5 hours to kill,. I only tweet once a day during the week... so now is a good time for Q&A.... 
Good thing you guys didn't go to KOD with me, I tried sneaking out since Eve is out of town, shit didn't work 
It's fun when you make your own rules... but.. RT make married life seem like fun but..... 
Listening to Thelonius Monk Quartet with John Coltrane song "Blue Monk" live at Carnegie Hall... waiting on meetings to start at 7pm 😳 
Lol my ass, u going to an Expo but no strip club for me? yo ugly ass RT Best laugh today!!! LOL!!! Getting ready for the Expo 
I'm playing bruh... RT I'm one of your biggest fans and I was just speaking my mind Ocho damn it want that serious bra 
Damn it's just the strip club, u're out of town RT Send me # we need to chat ASAP! SMH #HeAintAboutThatLife! 
1st married fight with Eve, didn't tell I was going to KOD but she saw a tweet with my name in it 4 coming #busted 
Yeag screw you dex RT screw you dex 😔 
My deepest condolences and prayers for the Reid family and Eagle nation... may God give you all strength. chest up.. head up... prayed up 
Not sure why I've the urge to practice and we just had our scrimmage yesterday... I can rest and recover when I get to Heaven... #MonaLisa 
Just warming up... #MW3  
Yes... 50 years to go with yo ugly ass RT Happy 1 month anniversary to the black guy!  
Let me know if you guys can go out tonight after your significant others proof reads the form... #AlwaysOpen 
headed to King of Diamonds.. I use this to get out the house... Eve signed mine already  
Straight like that... RT 100. #movie 
Evening off tonight... I haven't left work... killing in Fifa then killed and in ping pong... 
Bruh I'm sliding with you to King of Diamonds tonight... 
That was a warm up RT I can't wait to see ur next interview, I got to put a diaper on first, almost pissed myself last time! 
Dolphins are the only other species besides humans who can recognize & admire themselves in the mirror... Don't let your mirror fool you... 
Almost complete... the product will be in demand once again... 
Success comes after your passion has been identified... are you searching or just complaining about how things should be...h 
I know it's crazy watching film but the eye in the sky don't lie... I'm always open... "The Black Guy" 
I was reminiscent of Salvador Dali today... RT picasso or van gogh? 
Prodigious body of work displayed while painting today... 
Humble... yet confident, focused with a purpose at the same time keeping it edgy to allow myself room to breath..staying true to who I am... 
Unbelievable what the and other employees have done with Follow my news network... different and refreshing... 
Diamonds deserve diamonds... bricks deserve bricks... you get what you put into it... 
˙˙˙ʎɐpoʇ ʎɐp qɹədns 
Attention to detail and consistency... don't have to try to be great... you already are... you got the system... do your work scheme wise... 
Attack with good eyes... patience... violent hands... 
Fuck basketball, i'll beat yo ass up literally RT U played me, Yes! Embarrassed me, No! I beat u in front of Coach Lewis! 
I played you in basketball 1 on 1 and embarrassed you... you to little and you can't shoot... 
Ha RT I'm here n SB w/ur boy I'm up here MJ Flight School w/my son. U need 2 b here 2 work on ur bball skills! 
Never been into hazing... will be taking them 2 Tootsies RT do you have any tricks up your sleeve in store for the rookie wrs? 
Marketing.... RT If you could compete in any Olympic sport what would it be? 
Yes... best receiver to come out of Miami Northwestern Highschool... was unreal RT "snoop" that played at FSU? 
I used to flip off old pissy bed mattresses as a kid with Marvin "Snoop" Minnis n Scott Projects RT how about gymnastics bruh? 
Seems difficult... i can swim but i'd tire at some point... RT How long do u think u could stay afloat in a water polo match 
Dead last... I'd look good out the blocks... after 20 meters i'm done RT how you think you would do in the 100m dash? #USA 
Louboutin "Rantus" red pony hair...  
Not a chance by what i'm seeing on TV... RT you think you could compete in volleyball? 
Enjoying all the different Olympic events and competition but when is the damn track n field gonna air... 
Wow... watching USA vs Germany volleyball match... German player Boumë is 6"11 and USA player Stanley serve is vicious #FastPace 
The wife jamming.... RT #NowPlaying - #GFID Miami shit! 
Goodmorning... from breakfast...  
If you're not Following on twitter then you're missing out on FREE Training and Diet advice daily! #MP 
A day of rest... a day to become sponge like mentally... massage... ice tub... music #GFID "can't wait to laugh last... 
Straight bananas RT your thoughts on "Sixteen" I believe it is #6 on cd? Please weigh in bruh....#masterpiece 
Beautiful morning, listening to new album #GFID... if you're a fan of music in general you gotta hear this body of work #Epic 
Sitting here staring at iTunes waiting on new album "God Forgives I Don't" 2 download... WTF are they waiting for.. pecker heads 
Awesome RT lol u nd my mom. Yall old  
Anybody else still collect these or am I the only odd ball...  
would like to relax at your establishment with Evelyn tonight... can I pay the DJ to play #GFID all night... 
Much respect for the hackers who infiltrated my email and twitter along with changing my passwords.. great work guys... love "The Black Guy" 
allow my pre-ordered "God Forgives I Don't" album to download I don't feel like waiting shit  
Don't get annoyed play soft music... it calms everything RT 100....watching this patient BP go up and getting annoyed.. 
What yall feeling like today... everybody 100... tighten up if you not, I know few folks who didn't wake up this morning... 
I feel like the world's against me at times... i know i'm crazy as fuck but I love my odds against the masses... 
I thoroughly enjoy these early morning surprise NFL Drug Tests... nothing compares to pissing excellence at 6 am for the higher ups... 
Damn you ask to go then I tweet n say yes then you tell me NO... WTF... RT tomorrow won't work bud. Thursday might. 
Let's go to dinner tomorrow RT Kinda bummed didn't tweet back. Wanted to have lunch with him while n Miami 
One Step Closer... 
You can't argue with science... 
Just in case...  
Loving all of you from afar as followers... 
Back to back... make it snow ball 
Paint boy paint.... 
Beautiful morning... 
Precise... 
Detail... 
#VanGogh 
I'll get the last laugh.... 
Fucking exquisite day... 
Re-establish my artwork... 
#Picasso 
I love this shit.... 
Locked and loaded... 
Everybody is awesome to me... it's your preference.. The "Happy" community is powerful RT what's your thoughts on "🌈 Marriage"? 
Shit what's yours? RT what are your thoughts on interracial gay marriage 
What are you talking about... I'm referring to the guys tweet... Pay attention RT Damn you don't believe in God chad? #sad 
What if they don't believe in God kind sir? RT marriage was created by God for a man and woman! #mythoughts 
Even i'm not crazy enough to say that and i have no filter on twitter RT there's nothing wrong with saying the word gay 
You're misunderstanding... i'm saying Happy in place of the G word RT what would be your definition of a happy marriage? 
I'm exotic duh... RT Maybe I'm out of the loop, why does everyone dislike so much?? 
Tonight's topic... what are your thoughts on 🌈 "Happy Marriage" 140 characters... #Go 
Let's get it started... 3rd one... happy marriage.. #Go RT Yup, so whats the topic for tonight? Politics, abortion, gay marriage? 
Leaving grandma house headed home... anybody still up? 
Zzzzzzz RT Ready for training! 
Oh snap Thierry Henry with the nice pass... 
What channel... just got to my grandma house... are we winning RT thoughts on this Chelsea vs MLS All star game? 
Lmao RT i always send random tweets to chad johnson hoping he will cuss me out or something haha 
Old enough to beat you up... RT Flipping off the camera? How old are you? 
That's awesome RT I think more people dislike you than people dislike George bush all you do is get in the end zone 
That's my watch line boss... release date is late september RT What brand of watches are those Chad? 
That's for anybody who doesn't like me RT any reason you're flipping off the camera in that picture in david's cafe. 
Chilling with at David's Cafe...  
Busta Rhymes been on the weights.... i'm stuck at 220... 
Of course... RT Did you marry on the 4th of July so you won't forget your anniversary? 
Just went to the shop... Right head light went out... i got a citation RT what happened to the smart car? 
Driving it 2 camp manana RT Don't be confused home squeeze.. Let's admire that Bugatti around Miami . 
You rocking with me till wheels fall off or what...  
"The Black Guy" 
Confused admiration... 
I'm lost in my own city.... missed an exit maybe two but why am I on Killian Parkway... 
Tell that to Chase or Citi Bank... 😜 RT have you realized how stupid it was to change your name for a jersey? 
I'm "The Black Guy" I have no rating system but i'm rich n awesome in bed RT would you say your over rated or under rated 
Don't thinks it's cheating in "Hollywood" too many big fish in that world... RT she admitted to cheating on guy from twilight 
New Topic... wait... what she do? RT FINALLY a woman admitting to adultery---► Kristen Stewart 
Shit it's on Eve tab i'm ready RT but aye if u wanna double date me and girl are down! On your tab bruh bruh! 
What up sis... almost 300k tweets... i see you RT Say 
Okay just checking... send her my apologies RT Nah big bruh i got my lady already! My jersey is retired! lol 
Text me the address RT come to house 
Devin are you single yo.... I have about 1.7 million women that want to holla... I'm paying for y'all 1st date as well 
Yeah... they have a lot of employees but never enough registers open... RT yeah target is quality 
I feel you Tim but i changed the topic due to a lot of tension... you loke Target? RT not right man 
Lmao RT didn’t you hear? Men are more likely to get more woman if they have a 40% discount at target. I love target. 
Where you at... I'm coming to pick you up so we can chill... RT connect with these NUTZ!!!! 
That's my goal which is why i TRY to connect with most of u RT Lol but why do i feel like i know personally! 
So my new topic isn't working? How about Target or Walmart "crickets" RT Nice try... 
Well.... anyone been to Pottery Barn or Crate N Barrel lately... 😁 #GO 
My last 2 topics have been to much, sorry.. RT u need 2 stop this!Last night sent me over the edge now u wanna discuss this? 
My topics need to change... 😔 RT who cares about those children (students), other children were hurt! Solid logic. 
Straight like that... good luck this year... RT not at all in anyway 
Cool, it's a few of you on twitter... DM how you feel... I'm curious RT word right lol 
Give them no more to talk about grasshopper... RT yeah I ended up deleting it it almost immediately after I sent it. 
Good luck this year... do not comment on this public forum boss... RT negative 
I'm asking the question you answer RT was it fair for the kids and their parents to have to go through what they went through? 
Do you think the penalties Penn State has to deal with are fair? Especially for current players n schools recruiting process... #curious 
Holy shit, follow him people RT I will give away the new nexus tablet from google once I reach 20k just need a few more ;) 
Well i know she mad as fuck because i'm frugal n cheap than a mothafucka RT hope you know your wife only married you for your $ 
Straight up... RT fosho bro work the field g! All work no play. #GrindNoWax 
Camp start tomorrow bruh i'll C yall in the offseason #purple RT come out you gone have a Ball 
😳 who hacked Eve twitter? RT Instead of paid dinners, we should take a group of couples to tootsies! #LetMeSwitchUpTheGame 
As I look over decisions I've made throughout life... Whether wrong or right I'm absolutely winning right now... #EL 
I'm headed to Tootsies, come join me for lunch and eye grazing... 
Light work done with Reggie Bush, Davone Bess, B. Hartline, Tannehill, Matt Moore, R. Carlos, J. Pruitt, nobody wants 2 go to Tootsies e eat 
did you see Angela Bassett at the BET awards... as God is my witness if that wasn't exotic it doesn't exist. (does holy ghost) 
Just pulling up to have 1 last light throwing session with the fellas before we turn this shit all the way up... 
Connect them for us... you have millions attention RT Study history, connect the dots. Everything is hidden in plain sight. 
I didn't know, my followers know why now RT just seeing if u knew haha.The system is fckd up, but I'm sure u knew that already 
Who's exotic? RT For me, if u connect with someone of another race, great! But "looking for an exotic woman" bothers me 
Ground breaking... RT every white girl I know who dates a black man usually gets cheated on... 
Please enlighten my followers on your reasoning as to why? RT u knew the govt set up the shooting in Colorado didn't u? 
You can't control something that's easily accessible any and everywhere RT Where do you stand on gun control? 
Awesome... I wonder who dominates n bed? RT While we're still on topic, how do you feel about white male/black female relationships 
Do you think their concerns were answered? RT Why apologize? It's a real topic that I think concerns many Black women. 
Beautiful morning... my apologies for last nights topic... it seems my timeline as continued to discuss it into this morning... 😳 
Opened a can of worms tonight... so many different opinions... I have to go to bed... I love you until tomorrow nights topic #GO 
I retweeted your specific reasons... good luck with defending your beliefs... R.I.P to your mentions 
I'm sure many will comment on this sis... RT I think black guys should "stick" w/ their black women AFTER they make it big 
Ask her what she means RT and there it is! black women think they own us RT We should be 1st choice 
Speak ya mind... RT blk men who date outside their race are to fly to be contained to one race. We have options unlike sum 
U playing with fire RT black women make it hard to deal with them. Their expectations are higher than what any man can reach. 
Be careful RT ill sum it up nd say most of wmen in differnt races r mre nto blck guys nd go abve nd out their way 2 shw interst 
She has spoken RT We should be 1st choice QT So black guys should only date black women 
So black men date outside their race because of "Self Hate" dammit i need a bigger platform for this discussion RT self hate 
They'll tell you #GO RT Only ppl that have an obvious problem with my interracial relationship are black females. Not sure why 
Drop ya weight/trust ya feet RT i just got out of football practice & im having trouble stopping on a dime any advice? 
Okay... your statement has been made... RT this is how I feel about interracial dating  
Lmao... joe i love you man RT Interracial farm animal dating ... your thoughts?. Talk to me #TheLoveDoctor 
What's the reason.. millions of eyes are on your words RT lol i can help with the answer to that one lol 
Nice, love it RT my man is white so obviously I'm open, I had to fish in different waters to find love 4 yrs in and we're good 
Okay Patrick i see you... love it RT Don't know myself, but I do really get into black women 
You know i ask myself this all the time... u want the answer RT Why do so many black men date outside their race? 
How do you feel about interracial dating and if it bothers you for whatever reason why... 140 characters... talk to me #GO 
I'm home fighting for the damn remote RT yoooo, don't need a shout out, just a little love bro, where the hell are you.? 
Anybody still up... I want to shoot the shit with you... 
Not a f-ing chance, including the season... RT think you can hold down when camp starts? 
I just got home... FIFA.... No f*cking excuses... 
My circle is small... everything within that circumference as small as it maybe will forever be blessed... 
No other way... Rock with me... RT I rocks he be keeping it 1000!!! 
Thee quickest... RT was watching your workout on youtube. Damn you gotta have some of the quickest feet in the game! 
Yes i'm officially famous RT "Child Please" = A nice way of telling someone to F off. 
Okay cool RT and I remember Beating you too. Check friends matchups, we still have games pending for the Cup... 
yeah I remember beating you... 
I'm waiting on you as well... don't be scared... 
Just finished sparring, leaving the beach now RT im on fifa rt now. What u wanna do? Or are you just gonna talk a big game? 
I'm trying to go at least 10 rounds today... not so concerned with hitting my opponent today... how long can I go without being touched... 
Lamborghini type of weather... why not.... 
#MonaLisa  
Nah i spar at South Florida on the beach... RT come to my gym and spar at 2 
Smooth as route running session with and Matt Moore.. 2 hour break before sparring at 2 o'clock 
"The Black Guy" is up preparing for a light throwing session with Good morning from the dark side... 
Excited to train with my teammates in the morning.... its not how hard you work but how fast you can recover... turn up... 
Anybody free for a quick Fifa match before I head to bed... it seems Osi is running from a simple challenge... 
Yes in junior high... i forged my moms signature for a field trip... RT have u ever even been suspended? 
I'll hire you RT I'm already in enough trouble for Tweeting about certain relations with 
Suspended for cursing... grow a pair balls you pussy... RT ur an idiot... This is how u get ur ass suspended. 
Aaron try it... 
dammit you guys passed me in followers... Fuck... 
Whenever y'all ready to get your ass whooped... Run-N-Gun  
This is why RT why the f*** did you pick reebok over adidas? #stupid   
Who? RT I would have spent my money, money & used Broussard Sources to get Trish Stratus...Thirst was OCEANIC 
Toms-Reebok-Louboutins RT What's your favorite brand of sneakers? 
5 employees so far... RT Hey how many people work at or do you just run it all? 
Straight like dat... RT What bro how you been ?? WSHH, loved my latest joint,  
No I don't use Nair kind sir... RT do you use the "N" a lot? Or at all? 
Well the sex schedule on my refrigerator helps as well RT Your way to staying out of trouble is twitter 
How many nerves you got left so i can keep count RT you know I love you chad... But you get my nerves sometimes 
I was 4 at birth WTF... RT 4 inches RT So went back to "Johnson". What number is that? 
That's what my name means actually RT The Black Guy Oh Shit lmfao 
Whats left of it... thanks RT .@ochocinco congrats on getting your Johnson back 
Johnson isn't a number but translation = Oh Shit RT Hold on What number is "Johnson" and in what language? 
Wonder how many folks went to work pissed because it's Monday, would you be upset if your check was a lil short at end of the week? Take off 
Lmao... I love ya... 😜 RT STILL LIL WAYNE STILL ODD FUTURE... I'm not WOOT WOOT about justin okay? chilaxxxx 
Man the 405 is ridiculous... only highway with 10 lanes n still backed up RT what's up boss. The 405 freeway is missing you. 
Sit yo ass down... 1st Lil Wayne, then Odd Future now this... RT ❤ someone's got me liking Justin now  
I love you but...  
Beautiful workout... headed to grab a box of Krispy Kreme doughnuts... my homeboy just text me n said the "Hot Light" is on... 
Call my phone i got minutes now RT yooooooo cunnieeeeeeeeeeeeeee 
Hey... Love you to death... RT "Johnson" "Ochocinco" "Johnson" always my "Chaddie". What's in a name? Love ya to death!!! 
Yes sir 
"The Black Guy" RT Yo, the world needs to know what to call you now. Chad Johnson or Chad Ochocinco? 
That's some funny shit... RT #thingsboyssayafterrejection  
Many dreams have been brought to your door step... usually disguised as things or situations you'd rather not deal with... 
#MonaLisa 
Turning my haters into fans... this is bullshit... 
Can't wait to use these paint brushes... regardless of the canvas it's gonna be a work of art...   
Listening to Jill Scott album "The Light of the Sun" headed to eat at iHop for breakfast... what are y'all doing? 
Hmu? Go to bed RT swag on the max , I know. Hmu & I'll give you a couple of lessons! have some father daughter time 👍 
WTF... Lmao RT I'm bored. Can't sleep. &amp; Turnt Up! 
Girl it's past 11 oclock RT DADDY!!!!!! 
In due time bruh RT now that sound like a fight I need 
Straight like dat... RT that's wats up bra.. I'm GO Bring it Home dis Time #NOdaysOFF 
Manny Pac Man RT So who do y'all want to see me fight 
Man checking ya pulse big bruh.. handle ya business over there in London RT Wats Up Bra 
wake up yooooo 
Ok bet RT he is in London about to fight in the Olympics 
Where is Rasheed Warren at bruh? RT I made short work out of it again 
I was on the plane but my followers kept me updated... Let's spar shit.. RT did you see my fight last night big bro 
Anytime boss... Salute RT thanks for taking the time to speak with us Chad. You are a gentleman. #connectTHEdots 
No but it's exciting opening them RT You don't think fortune cookie sayings are fun? 
Got back yesterday with my DB checklist... RT Chillin man. Back in Ft. Laudy. Ready to jump this thing off. U back yet? 
No fun 😡 RT Master Sens Sai says play by the rules n keep Merton out of your life. u have a new lease on life. Make most of it 
What's up boss... RT What's up cuzzin? 
Just spoke with n David Edelstein on a conference call about David's Cafe, my apologies for not knowing everything b4 tweeting 
Use Drano... RT stop clogging up my twitter feed bro 
They both take my money so it's even... RT Who is worse to get in trouble with? Evelyn or the commish? 
No but he'll send me a text message if i'm out if line RT Does your "Dad"ever respond to your tweets?? 
Thanks for stating the obvious dip shit RT lol He's not your father RT Dad you and Ernie Els look alike. 
Master Sen Sai just saying hello... look forward to upcoming appeals with you and Merton Hanks this season... I love you 
Dad you and Ernie Els look alike... 
SMH.. You'll learn RT now your being ridiculous. You beat me with an MLS team i will retire from the league. Forever. 
20k RT what was the original rent? 
I'll use a MLS team n win RT Ok. Uve been warned. I made Cruz cut his game off twice. My Barca boys play no games 
Child please... Let's go RT i hear ur good at fifa. Fyi im ranked no. 3 in the world. Whenever your ready man 
Vibing RT wyd big bro 
Billionaire David Edelstein who owns property raised rent to 60k a month RT is David's cafe closing? 
No sir... I must check them out boss RT PUPILO have you heard and 
Headed to what's left of my beloved David's Cafe puffing on a Partagas (Cuban) listening Andrea Bocelli's "Besame Mucho" on repeat... 
They don't stand a chance... RT My nigga gonna have locked up twice next year. 
Nah... I'm gonna leave us tied 1-1 so i feel good about myself the rest of the day RT lost the connection another one 
Scratch my previous tweet about I just lost the damn rematch game... 
Proud to announce I've finally beaten in Fifa12 after 5 fucking games... I'm freaking happy as a dragon fly during mating season 
No i didn't get it RT arent you receiving my invitations? 
Okay i'm ready to destroy u... I promise i won't lose to you a fourth time #TurnUp RT ok tell me when you are ready 
Good game... Good luck next time RT played fifa with ;great games men..ur pretty good.. 
Give me a minute i'm playing somebody RT are you ready to beat me for the first time? 
Epic fail trying to play MW3 with Eve...any takers want to play me in Fifa... the world knows my gamer tag... Invites only I'm ready 
Playing MW3 on split screen with and she sucks... I'm 27-2 and she's 1-17... Smh 
Awesome followers of mine don't be mean to She has a right to her own opinion on the Prius... be positive please 
If you judging off the car he's driving you're losing, the best men are the ones you can't see -grandma-RT haha we'll see! 
Sitting at my computer looking over listening to 3 Kings thinking to myself... I'm on to something special here... 
Trust me you'd holla if the right person pulled up... RT I'm sorry but a Prius will Never be an attractive car. 
You know the phone number to that little gaming booth, want to call b4 i drive up there RT check out aventura mall 
Bingo.... How do i get them... I'm back in Miami now RT it was  
Anyone remember the twitter account I retweeted that had the pic of the all gold 360 controller and all chrome 360 one... 
Shit i'm rocking with you #NoIdols it is... continued success... turn up RT #NoIdols , best rap music all year. 
What's in 10 days? I got 3 million supporters waiting RT 10 days away. 
Cool RT kill em my ni**a we will get r cardio n after the season. hittin the rd wit my lil bro check his music #TDE 
Yeah bruh camp start in 4 days... i gotta make up a years worth of work... I'm turnt up RT everything good with you? 
Ok let me know boss, enjoy RT not yet. I don't know really. I'm on vacations off to the world 
We can't line up... I'm in Miami now.. RT sitting at home with my gloves on...2day is cardio day im excited..... 
Pedro is in Miami? Tell him to call me if so, is in the states? 
Dude this is bull droppings RT My wife has 20 episodes on the DVR, I'm not gonna lie, it worries me a little. 
Sergio are you in Miami? Call me... 
Do women actually watch this show... Eve says it's interesting and it's become somewhat of an addiction to watch... Is this true? 
Just waking up and I'm quite disturbed to find watching an episode of "Snapped" it's okay to watch but why take notes... 
I stopped him in his tracks... RT it was hilarious yo but ray said he didn't feel you on that hit lol Smh 
Told him i was open RT Watching sound off on YouTube he screamed at coach bill from the patriots lol BILL BILL 
Its run by n his army RT you do ocnn report by yourself, love the journalistic integrity ya bring to the media 
Guest rooms and i have kids remember RT why do you have 9 beds? 
I just slept 5 hours on the plane... I have 9 beds at home... RT do u ever sleep? Do you even own a bed? 
Listening to new album "The One" waiting on these bags... want to spice up your iPod you gotta have to hear this... great music 
Yes... each week starting in september... RT you got a fight coming up 
Landed safely with my daughter and the "WIFE" headed straight to LA Fitness then the boxing gym... y'all up? 
Peace... love... and recycled condoms... 
I don't smoke "M" so i don't have a stand... now cigars we can debate all day... RT whats your stand on Medical Marijuana? 
Once this plane takes off i will Fraggle Rock RT Go to bed dude 
Blasian RT Are you black or Asian? 
300-Troy-Braveheart-Gladiator RT trying to think of a good movie to watch any suggestions ? 
No best movie ever Booty Talk #23 RT i just saw the dark night rises...have you seen it? if not see it...best movie ever 
Red eye flight back to MIA with n Looking forward to flying tonight's aircraft since I have my pilots license 
Tweeting right now RT Kevin Garnett is donating money to the kids who lost their parents in Colorado. What are you doing? 
Week 1 in Houston RT when the show comin out, 
Whipped? No she just loves my Johnson duh... RT man, Evelyn got you whipped! 
Yeah it is actually, cool shit RT so while u are waiting on the paperwork, is last name currently ochocinco legally 
Evelyn was tripping about marrying a number... a number spelled wrong at that, she is a hater RT y did u change name back 
Have to wait till C Johnson paper is processed RT why isn't your jersey in the pro shop yet #needit 
Lmao RT give me updates on the tom hanks movie 
Please give me updates on Adrien Broner fight... hotel only has HBO2... movie with Tom Hanks 
Fuck you #noethicsneeded RT your an idiot #codeofethics 
What channel? I'm in a hotel RT Hey you watching Broner vs Escobedo starting now??? Hope its a good fight 
Hell I don't know, i made it up... didn't say it had to make sense RT how do you smell like shit without hate? 
I'm assuming you've never had a snickers... RT you are the finest, sexeist piece of chocalate Ive ever seen. 
I love it... hate is no different than cologne, without you'd smell like shit RT you thrive on the hate don't you 
How the hell... porn industry is a billion dollar business RT You'll be bankrupt by the time you're 50 
Trust me i'll get it to sell outRT 70,000....they only fill abut 40,000 of those though 
How many seats r n "Sun Life" made dvd's for each fan with our "Flash Mob" routine after touchdowns during home games.. Can't fine everybody 
No... i star in my first big motion picture with RT Any more reality TV shows in your future? 
Child i'm sitting up high... ain't no air down there... C'mon RT I fucks with on the low 
No only for celebrating after touchdowns RT dont you get fined by the league for saying ridiculous things on Twitter? 
Not just any moron... a successful handsome moron... rich... bipolar... narccisstic... weird moron RT you are a moron. 
I could RT when you retire, would dad put u in charge of the NFLs PR? U could take the league to a whole new level.. 
Whatever you feel I feel the same way RT - Speaking of the Paterno statue, do you think they should take it down 
I would've said Paterno statue, that was a random tweet RT Probably thought you were referencing Paterno's statue 
What the hell are you talking about? What statue? RT "But the statute represents dishonesty! 
If my tweets are all they have to worry about that's a good thing... 
I apologize 4 that RT To me is the only celebrity to tweet what they feel an not give a damn what other people think 
Fuck what critics say... a statue has never been erected in honor of a critic... 
Success comes in many forms... Sometimes you never see it... you have to listen...  
Been a long time since bread n heated syrup sandwiches... 
I do... from Claires... and i can afford the lab itself... RT Fuck niggas wear #LabMADE diamonds 
July 26th... 
5 more days... 
I dont give a flying pretzel in skittle rainbow hell what your problem is right now RT I'm Soooo Mad With 😢 
Anyone can be cool... but amazing takes practice... 
Think happy thoughts... move the ball with your imagination RT Wooooooosahhhh  
I rarely use twitter for promotional use but i need all of you to follow 
The 6 AFC and NFC Acronyms That Will Save Any NFL Player From Getting Into Trouble by  
Micky do I sign my contract before or after football season... 
Child please RT Yup! He forced me! RT did I miss it, did u get married already? 
Did you know as embryos the first human part to develop is our anus... So in a way all human beings start off as assholes... 
Anybody else have the "Clapper" installed in their bedroom? The fact that it doubles as a strobe light during sex is phenomemal... 
It was awesome... where you at? RT how was dinner last night bruh 
Evelyn... my goodness, so healthy and curvy... RT Me & #Fun #BevHills #GreatNight :)  
Make him your personally boy toy RT went on a date tonight. He drove n I paid. Now I'm stuck cause I'm 10yrs older than he 
Wonder if anybody met at dinner tonight and are having sex right now... do I get credit for matchmaking + scoring in the same night? 
A special thank you to and for making tonight awesome... I've 200 new friends and contacts 
Totally awesome dinner tonight... I thank all 200 of you for allowing me to dine amongst your greatness... I love you fuckers n goodnight... 
She coming RT Meeting for dinner but SOMEBODY is taking forever. Hopefully he brings my boo with him 
Wait for me dammit... RT So me & actually got into this restaurant waiting on I'm excited. 
Get her pregnant RT My wife always asks "will u rub my back"...what do I do to get her to ask "will u rub my front"? 
Dude holla at a girl, if she rejects you let me know when i get there RT Waiting for to come thru for dinner! 
So appropriate RT Dolphin City... I see what you did there. Nice, Chad. Very nice. 
Tonight's venue for dinner is called "Delfini Citti" anyone know what it means in Italian? 
Same amount i'd spend in the club with an entourage RT how much you planning on spending? Some people gonna drink a lot! 
Awesome, find a boyfriend RT Waiting to have dinner with 😃🍝 #italian Delfini Città  
First 200 people at "Delfini Citta" 8635 wilshire blvd in Beverly Hills... dinner isn't until 9 so be patient and mingle amongst one another 
Sneak peak RT U get that workout in today with Coach C   
Hate to disturb timelines but did anyone listen to new album... unbelievable body of work especially song "No Introduction" #memories 
Love RT Following will instantly make you like him 10X more. Example of how media can control how you view someone 
yall two convo got me in tears RT “@1natashanicole: no he didnt” well he should have 
At 5pm, venue for tonight's dinner in Beverly Hills will be announced... dress appropriately... I'm hooking up single fans as we drink n eat 
1st we figure out why you got dumped, then we get u a man RT I got dumped about 2 weeks ago can u hook me up with a nice guy? 
I hate looking at someone's bio and seeing they've an instagram... going to it and the shit is private... what's the fucking point people 
Take your pick... 🚙 🚗 🚕... I'll even throw in some ⛽ and a dude to date 🚶RT can you buy me a new car ? 
You're kind sir RT Chad: pay your bills on time. Tim: get RT'd by Chad, even if he's mocking u. Your both welcome 
I'm black... how do i get good credit? RT How do I become cool? I'm white... 
No i don't.. I was just on the toilet and hadn't tweeted for 30 miutes RT you stay on twitter all day lol 
Rarely go out but when i do i drink juice n alcohol glasses (so i fit n) RT how do u go out when u don't drink like everyone else 
Good job... i rarely make grammatical errors RT accepting, not excepting. And no, you can't blame that one on autocorrect!! 
I thank you for excepting my weird ways... RT You keep my twitter feed interesting, and for that I thank you. 
I did it at Sylvias in Harlem RT You mad fake Why u ain't have it in NY? I would've came to see u and 
Hoping the 200 fans that make it to dinner tonight are all single, I can play matchmaker throughout the night what if everybody gets laid 😃 
Nooo, she has to wait RT Eve needs one of the blinged out limited edition ones.. 
Oh it's still the same 911 RT DM me your # bro. Lost your number. New phone. 
For fans/followers not wife RT I need my pink watch asap!! #Trendy RT It's official! They're on the way #Timepieces 
Good news for those who love #affordable watches RT It's official! They're on the way! #Timepieces 
I have a voice now RT Before twitter, the only info I knew of u was from big media, and I thought u were a douche. #changedmymind 
Lmao 😂 RT Never tweeting a celeb again my twitter is blowin up. Thanks Chad for the #Car and the #followers 
You know it's special if I'm taking LA fans to eat in Beverly Hills RT send me a flight so I can make dinner 
Yes i am, here you go 🚗💨 RT Heard you're the nicest guy in the NFL...can I have a car? 
60k is to much RT Davids Cafe is closing after 30 years due to inability to afford increases n rent. How do u feel about this 
Funny his camera crew won't post our fade from yesterday.. RT what happened with you and 
I'm christian RT Who the fuck is Chad? Better stand for Catholic Hoes Are Dumb. RT Chad ❤ 
He's right next to me, we eating RT you still keep in touch with ? 
Spell Ass Whooping... RT I been playing words with friends all damn day 
Lmao... RT lol fa da money I'm running like a Snotty Nose!! 
how about this..if you beat me in a race I'll beat you up (literally) and take your 1st game check still #TurnUp 
I love your confidence.. Child Please RT Ocho I would smoke u like a box of Kools and give u 5 yards!!! #believedat 
you don't get off fast enough to win, your strength is your top end speed, we're only racing 30 yards, I'd win duh 
Wait a minute.. what i miss? RT I know, I feel the same... HeHe!! Hola loca!!! 💋💋💋 RT Chad ❤ 
Nobody wants to fight, u want to race? 1st game checks RT Dm me your number bro broke my phone lost your number 
Drink at home maybe? RT Why are all black NFL players kept gettin arrested? how can we stop that shit? 
False... I'm christian i just tend to curse n backslide every now n then RT Tim Tebow is the only christian in the nfl #fact 
Look at her timeline, doesn't talk to fans, she won't reply RT I'm mad never tried hooking me up with 
Have all DB's on Final Cut Pro on mac, prepared for everybody RT how are you prepping on go against revis? 
I was an avid gamer ranking #8 in the world RT Your tweets makes me smile everyday. What did you do before Twitter? 
Doesn't matter i'm already open... RT so who are you wanting to be the dolphins starting qb? 
Never drank bruh, ask my moma she'll tell u RT did you used to drink n stopped or u never taken a drink 
No it's red bull/cranberry juice... separate cup of OJ to fit in when I'm out RT 's drink of choice is twitter 
never ask someone (ME) who has never drank alcohol for their opinion, football, video games, soccer n porn are my expertise... 
I don't drink, I'm just the sober idiot with a dumb opinion RT whoa, what?! "too low for #athletes?". WHAT MAKES YOU SO SPECIAL? 
R.I.P Ms. Redfield... 🙏 
My prayers and condolences to the victims and their families in Aurora, Colorado affected by this terrible tragedy... 
Will tweet venue at 5 giving all a fair chance RT how will we know what time for dinner? If u tell us at noon how will u pick 
That was fun RT I live in LA and I can verify Chad invited 100 fans to a free movie at The Grove a few years back. 
Yeah, done it in LA before bruh RT hey Chad are you REALLY gonna inviting 100 of your LA fans to dinner tomorrow? 
I need 100 of my LA folks prepared to go to dinner tomorrow... please dress appropriately since we're dining in Beverly Hills... #staytune 
Great eye, have 2 transitioning in sand RT your steppin outside your framework on them routes on the beach. Givin away the break 
I'm out here turnt up still.... Line it up... we all cut from the same cloth... just took different paths.. 
Mofo's think i be playing #lineitup Camera stopped recording RT What happened to vs  

Well shit that's where i get my tricks from #shrug RT hahaha u still watch porn? Even tho u just got married? 
That awkward moment when you take your computer to the Apple Store to get help and soon as they turn it on PORN pops up first 😳 
And you wonder why i got out the car and walked on the highway RT This 405 highway is the WORST!!!!!!!!!!!! OMG!!!!! 😱 
Watch twitter tomorrow around noon and i'll tweet the venue, gotta to make it fair for all RT time and place? 
That good wood will do that too ya... Let me think RT no. Just 1 jerk off that I can't seem to shake. What would u recommend I do? 
You know i'm not leaving LA without taking at least 200 folks out to eat... RT but me dinner, I'm broke 
Limbo? You in love with 2 dudes huh? RT ....Chad, I've been in limbo for a while when it comes to relationships. Any advice ? 
I'm here till Sunday RT I'm in the air! No texts since the other day. When do u leave? 
Mommie why you stalking my tweets RT why r u in the jungle? Don't let dusk find you in the jungle 
I'm in LA, i hit you when i got here, i'm in the Jungles off Coliseum come through RT Yo Where u homie? 
My favorite pair i own RT just saw ur wedding pic in a magazine those are some loud ass shoes  
Loving this married shit... Eve just gave me 2 coupons to use whenever I'm ready...  
I'm on LA time, I'm free now? It's early RT what time are you available tomorrow and I call you so we can go through the details 
Would you be mad if i launched without the intro video? I could send u the link now? RT where is your dating site already! 😁 
This a "Bully" RT fair enough, but what's a "Bully"  
I put 4k away so i could buy a"Bully" gave 500 to the homie, got 150 left RT don't u have like a 5k allowance? What do you buy 
Enjoying this day off in LA balling at that mall, I spent 150 dollars... on 1 item... I feel powerful RT wyd CJ 
Dammit I spent my allowance... 
I can't walk without you... Turn up...  
Only a select few...  
Turn Up... Walk with me... No red carpet ... #Louboutin  
Pulled up... Turn up.... 
Camp starts on the 26th.. scream at me in Miami RT I'm in London for the Olympics. But after I'm coming to Miami for a min. 
Hey Mo where you at? RT hey if you need real track work look me up I got you. Don't be scared of GREATNESS!!!! 
I just saw your tweet... I'm on slauson leaving Starbucks headed to Slauson T's.... pull up... I'm out here 
No football work today... 16 110's 10 50's RT how was coach c workout today 
Work outs over... Turn up... Urban Outfitters flow... 
They gotta see me on sight, I only get down on Sundays 4 cardio RT and didnt lock either? 
He's scared... certain people know i can squab which is why he won't line it up.. RT What happened with the fade vs ? 
not only will we talk about releases and techniques you'll be able to see it, solo, against man to man, etc. great teaching tool 
I have an app for that, ask RT fitzgerald was on the tube talking about his release moves and secrets wassup with yours 
Damn that's right... I've a few roles under my belt RT also saw you on The League, thought you did pretty good big man. 
I will record a monologue, I'm locked in on this upcoming season, once I establish funduction again I'm ready 
Yes i forgot about that as well... RT you can act saw you on blue mountain state! 
Yes you are right... Ive been on the big screen, i need a bigger role now RT U can act! Saw u on American reunion. 
Yes RT Hmmm...how to respond...RT I'm ready for a leading role, I can't act but I can fill the theaters easily 
I'm ready for a leading role... I can't act but I can fill the theaters easily... 
Orale carnal... RT Buenos días carbon 
"Funny but not funny but funny"  
I did my homework on you after the 1st tweet.. I'm 2 steps ahead of you RT YouTube me 
Great excuse not to get embarrassed, I'm 7 years in RT naw u don't want this I been doing it to long u stick to football 
We can spar... I get back sunday RT oh ok I was training at 5th street gym n south beach 
South Florida Boxing Gym.. RT where u was training at 
That sleep with directors stuff is true? RT Yeah, how do you think those roles are earned....remember its HollyWOOD. 
It's a million hot girls, I'm sure Ms Fox has acting skills, roles are earned RT people go see Megan Fox because she is smoking hot 
Be nice RT it's all about the money .....Megan Fox is a terrible actress but people go see her cuz of who she is. 
So who's the best? RT Ability to attract the masses. Acting ability is one thing, putting butts n seats, sadly, is a whole other 
At what point can an actor/actress command 20 million a movie... is it his/her acting skills or the ability to attract the masses 2 theaters 
Oh hold up... Justin dude, tweet her back... RT never tweeted me :( 
Well what about the chicks... Nevermind... RT EXACTLY!  
I scored 1,476,458 points in Get this game for free & try to beat my score (username: ‘ochocinco’)  
Nice RT this is Victoria secret sire Gottiline sureno Beast Will be in atomic dogg mag next addition  
Vote for for their yearly Supplement awards --> 
 #TEAMMP 
Check this throw back Bengal receivers: Peter Warrick-Kelly Washington-TJ Houshmanzadeh and our coach Hue Jackson  
They are breed called "Bully" RT what kind of dogs are those in the picture which the man is holding??? 
My bad, where Makini RT Chad I will beat your ass!! I gave you my twitter when I saw you coming out of the serving spoon! 
At times yes RT I know ur busier than me...do u have ur Twitter hooked up to a Mic so u can just speak ur tweets? 
Edgerrin James has those 2 Neopolitan Mastiffs sis RT what happened to the big as dogs you had in Cincy? 
Enough to keep me out of trouble... RT man how many tweets do u send a day? 
I can't have people coming to my house seeing a Maltese, standard Yorkie, 2 tea cup Yorkies n a Pomeranian, I need my own dogs to chill with 
These 5 dogs count as 1 n they are Eve's not mine RT y'all already have 5 dogs  
You don't have a choice RT That would be 7 no way RT what u think about 2 of these at home  
Thanks, i'm not black, i'm pumper nickle satin blue RT is a very attractive black man. 
Thanks, i'm not black, i'm pumper nickle satin blue RT is a very attractive black man. 
what do you think about 2 of these at home...  
Dude that looks like a "Bear" i want two that will watch me play XBox n chill RT  
Holy shit that's awesome RT Getlowbullies  
On sunday after i take a few fades with these folks i'm looking for RT c-dub when u heading back Miami 
His color is cool RT Dooney, out of Gottiline LayLow and Nicole Simpson!!  
Beautiful... RT 116 LBS 26 inch head. Show dog winner. Puppy of Aries. Biggest head award.  
I need 2 puppies Ant... RT 110lbs 25inch head 18inches tall  
Wait they are? RT Pit's are illegal in all of Dade Co., not that you give a damn just FYI. 
Anybody know where I can find a "Bully Pitbull" Gotti line preferably out here in LA... seriously looking for one to take back to Miami 
Yeah bruh RT Is this tanedra from SMC RT Tanedra you got a twitter? Lil Insane still ride bikes RT 
I'll stick to Roscoes boss RT you gotta take to Kate Mantilini in Beverly Hills, Best restaurant in LA! 
Tanedra you got a twitter? Lil Insane still ride bikes RT I think he moved out of LA.. I will ask Makini if she knows... 
Looking for a friend of mine in LA that went to SMC with me, he had the "puzzle piece" paint job and his name was "Lil Insane" need help? 
I read my mentions... i am the entertainment i don't follow for it... RT doesn't your timeline get boring? 
#Salute RT If had a #twitter school I would enroll, he understands the energy of the tool #BeLimitless 
Awesome RT what's up man?“@Steven_Wofford: How about you get your QB to say what's up” 
If you're not busy this evening would like to go a few rounds at a gym of your choice please, need a good cardio workout 
That's how it should be.. fun and exciting big bruh... RT This Fool Makes Marriage Look Like Disneyland!!!! 
Yeah that's my 1 cousin on my daddy side RT Are you and related??.. 
Please let's spar when i get back RT u don't have anything on and me in the ring.  
Order it on  RT is your wife's book sold in South Africa ☹ Cc 
No just friends RT r yall married yet 
Beautiful big bruh RT waddup 85! how's LA treating you and Ms. Johnson 
Out the hotel early headed to with Eve... it's gonna be a great day today 
Larry I'm in town.... are you free 
Certain sponsors wont allow me RT the line of Condoms you were talking back in '07. Young athletes been waiting on those. 
Doing my 71 Caprice matte RT u matte blackin everything i see bra. Watches, your cars, dnt tell me u gonna matte black a VERT too. 
Of course, small n big faces sis for women... RT Will u have a line of watches for women 
Thought of and created by Chad "Cheap" Johnson RT Makeup E. By Evelyn   
Claire's all day  
I spend 40 bucks, 2 packs of gold studs, black and cubic z stones RT how much u spend on a pair of earrings? 
I get mine from Claires RT what store sells black stud earrings 
I'm more of a Roscoes/M&M's type guy, u n Eve can do SoHo house RT I'm up too how about lunch you and Ev SoHo House.. My guest ☺ 
Not even 8 o'clock in LA and I'm wide awake ready to work with making Evelyn get dressed 3 hours ahead of time so i'm not late 
I've Matte Black watches, hasn't been done yet RT $100-200. I always wanted a sick watch but niggas ain't rolling in it 
As a fan/follower what would appropriate/affordable price be RT what price range are watches going to be? 
I'm in LA not home, sorry RT Let me try this again. Wake your ass up I'm at the front door wit my boxing gloves on. 
Headed 2 bed, few celebs have yet to respond to particular followers so I'll wait until they do before I continue, it all starts with #hello 
Megan this is my friend, can you say hello please RT 
Oh snap another match... I'm legit now RT Hahahahahahahaha we got tweeting us #bfflz #FinsUp 
Sis can you can say hello to the homie ---> RT 
Mike dude, say hello to Ms. Cherelle... don't let me down boss RT hahaha 
Gianna can you sat hello to my friend Mr. Nisivoccia pleaseRT hook it up 
Holy shit she spoke... I'm a real match maker RT hiiiii 
He'll say hello before 8 o'clock i promise RT !!! Please please please :) 
I don't know Katy personally i doubt she responds buddy RT 
Ri my homie Adam says hello... everything starts with a hello RT 
Melanie can you say hello to my friend Mr Nguyen RT get it ocho 
If you're interested in someone that's on twitter... a friend or even celebrity just tweet their name and watch me get y'all talking.. GO 
Ask i'm excited as fuck about them... RT When does your watch line come out? 
Anybody single looking for a consistent partner while no holidays are near? I'm here to hook you up... 
The smallest decisions can change your life forever... sometimes that change Is good... sometimes it's bad.. 
Lmao.... RT lmao i can't even reply. 
Preseason i'm slapping u in pre-game RT Dude you can't fight! i bet your wife box and run better routes then you. Duh! 
Dude i'll whoop your ass... RT where is He still has a chance to catch a ball on me. Its been about 7 years now. 
what's up dude 
Mommie i made it already, walking was much easier, Wilshire exit is closed due to construction RT try Sepulveda next time 
I know is pissed she still on the 405 freeway... shit I had a massage appointment at my hotel I was not gonna miss... 
"Walking off the 405"  
Back on the 405 again and we're at a stand still... and yes I'm getting out to walk again but this time I'm recording it for proof, hold up 
me please RT "Obviously" my arse... #subtweet 
Obviously you don't workout much, their shakes are great for recovery... RT Nobody likes #SimplyWholesome like that... 
Simply Wholesome flow with the homies... great workout with 
Listening to and out my peripheral I see Evelyn dancing, this mofo has no rhythm to be puerto rican... 
I'm ready to go train and Evelyn is holding me up.. Rule #1 never allow your other half to join you unless they get dressed ahead of time 😡 
Nothing like starting the day with a little confrontation to get the blood flowing... now time to go eat at with Eve 
You're a waste of sperm... RT fuck you! let me know when you do cause I can't tell you receivers apart dez TO you Dwayne who cares 
Fuck you Remy (from Higher Learning) RT another day another black athlete arrested.. I'm sure your next 
Is that a lace front 😳 RT Ppl with Lil dicks say stuff like this RT marry me again so I know it's real 
marry me again so I know it's real... 
Here till Sunday bruh RT Lmao I feel that! Well how long you in LA? Wanna lace you up with some product from our line.. 
I just be talking, i don't go to clubs homie, i use club money to spoil my followers RT You took it easy again last night bro 
Holy shit Stacy i haven't seen you in years... when n where is it? RT U missed Bari askin U2 come N2 NFLN. 
Laying low, training n the a.m. RT whats trappin, see u moving around LA with that G Pass... haaa.... whats poppin tonight hommie 
Just waking up from a nap, Evelyn comes in town and interrupts my normal tweeting hours, no reason to be off twitter this long, what I miss? 
I farted on the sidelines during a preseason game RT what's the dirtiest thing you've ever done during a game? 
No... but i have been fined numerous times for reckless on field behavior throughout my career RT you ever been arrested? 
Twitter jail is as far as it'll go for me.. RT 27 nfl stars how been arrested, dont be next 
WTF... just got to my hotel n i'm unaware of this news RT Are you next Ocho? Another NFL player arrested today. 
At my hotel, Evelyn still on the 405, I hopped out at Santa Monica n walked down the exit ramp, took a left on Sepulveda, right on Wilshire. 
What's the point of 6 damn lanes on the 405 freeway if everybody is still at a stand still... I got out the car and let Evelyn drive... 
Just seen my homeboy at "Simply Wholesome" we go back since 1997 when I lived in LA  
That awkward moment when you look at your wife and realize you out kicked your coverage... 😳 
It seems they've changed the name from Simply Wholesome to Aerobics Market Health Food Restaurant.... 
Felt a little sloppy today, working the kinks out though... headed to grab a protein shake from "Simply Wholesome" on slauson... Y'all good? 
If the shoe fits wear it Ugly Dora... RT Word? RT I love a woman that's a little crazy... see what I did there... 
I love a woman that's a little crazy... see what I did there... 
The question is what have I learned since there are no instructions RT ...if life had instructions ...what would you learn? 
At times I wish LIFE itself came with instructions... learning from mistakes as been very eventful but.. what if... 
I'll be in the Jungles i'll walk over around 6 RT we practice from 5-7:30! 
What time yall practice bruh RT come watch Dorsey high practice ! 
Beautiful day in LA today, headed to train with (Pucci) gets in town at noon, definitely painting the town this week 
Turn Up... RT Rest up tonight. Tomorrow come ready to work!  
Sleep with angels twitter... For if I rise tomorrow... Trust I'll be on here... I love all of you... Goodnight n may my God bless you all... 
Good seeing so many friends of mine today throughout the Los Angeles area, locked n loaded for a good week of training with 
I support any and every artist regardless of the genre of music... I RT everyone's stuff and will support you as well homie 
Make your music n 3.5 million folks will hear it RT Well I'm a young singer trying to live my dream, need some help though. 
I'm not from the East Side but my #Ricky is up... Turn Up... #purple 
Lmao RT Add 1 more mill 👀 RT Now now, don't be embarrassed only a few million can see this RT 
Now now, don't be embarrassed only a few million can see this RT dad stop saying that! I don't get grounded 
It's cool, i'm a producer if you need me... RT Lmao, I'm sorry man. It's not like that! 
Ok big bruh... i'm out here... Turn up... RT lmao....i see you my nigga...ill hit you sat for the location.. 
Hey Chad... I'm Chad and is my daughter... she's grounded now RT Lmao! 
West LA Community College RT Sup big bruh, where u gunno train tomorrow ??? 
I train during the week boss... taking fades on Sundays for cardio RT im free on wednesday so let me know where i need 2 be.... 
I'm here for 2 weeks, I'm taking fades but everybody busy RT you came to the hood without getn at me..#nickersongardens 
Girl who is this Chad character and why would he call you? Don't get grounded lil girl RT Dead if calls. 🙏 
Love you too Ms. Cheryl, Eve is in Miami RT Drive safe Chad & you and Ev have a good night. Love you both! 
Finally leaving #NickersonGardens driving to eat at the Grand Lux Cafe.. hope everybody is having a great Sunday, can't wait to train mañana 
Straight up... RT Before you leave Cali you have to get a pick in front of the #WATTSTOWERS 
Making my rounds seeing all my folks when I lived in LA... making my way to #JordanDowns riding up century 1998 memories 
Excelente haber compartido con mis amigos Mexicanos del la Zona Este de Los Angeles... 
On the East Side visiting some of the Mexican homies... Nobody wants to take a damn picture for twitter.. everybody face n head is tatted up 
What's good on the East Side homie... I'm in a 87 Cutlass coming up on 107th n Wilmington with my lil homies... #purple 
You making jokes i'm dead ass serious bout going from the shoulders. I'm in LA for 2 weeks, put ya new Ferrari up I beat ya ass 
I'm out here... fading all ya homies Turn Up RT don't need that issue , PULL UP NIGGA ! 
I'm in the park on 27th n Halldale... If I'm not there I'm in the 3rd building on King/Coliseum.. I'm not hard to find Lil homie 
I'm in LA... No need to keep talking over twitter... bring ya homies and ya camera crew and line it up... 
I been fighting all my life Color Purple style, i'd win easy RT Who y'all got winnin if and square up?! 
Oh shit i'm gone fuck u up RT RT line up... I'm taking all fades.. - you wanna end up inna bush too lil nigga 
WTF... I do own a Smart Car RT how come we don't see you driving in nice cars like other nfl players? 
It's not funny... it's getting me from point A to point B RT Lmfaaaooo just seen on the bus 
Stay on twitter RT alot of players have been arrested, what's your secret? 
I'm at Slauson Swap Meet looking for a fade with the homies...  
line up... I'm taking all fades... 
I can't pull up cause i'm on the bus... give me a minute. I'm passing Leimert Park RT lol Pull up 
I'm on the 210 Metro Bus headed down Crenshaw sight seeing getting ready to squab some fools up... This is my training for today... 
Well meet me at Slauson T's in 6 minutes and 6 seconds foo... line it up RT off top. 
I'm walking down Rosecrans right now, my car ran out of gas... Line it up... RT lmao runn it homie 
bruh where you at? I'm taking all fades... 1 on 1 or 5 on 5... We can turn up and Royal Rumble, yo homies vs my homies #lineup 
I heard you been doing push ups n shit... shoot me a fade... meet me on 27th n Halldale off Adams... 
Bruh i don't have any I.D. but shit let's go... RT My idol ochocinco is in LA Let's party hard... Who coming? 
It's sold out at "Grey Stone" 
The world has no clue big bruh RT I see you back to your roots with Coach C.. That means its showtime again 
Bruh you got 2 pick me up... Evelyn stole my I.D. so i couldn't get in the club RT DM me your # bro...i'll get you set up.. 
Anybody know how much a table at "Grey Stone" is tonight? It's some what handicapped being my table consist of water-red bull-cran juice... 
I do? That's not possible RT Still can't believe has got more followers than the NFL; good job, Chad! 
It's really bad when she's pissed, no bullshit RT if you got arrested, jail would be a a lot more fun than facing Evelyn. 
I'm a menace to society... check my record.. Starbucks-Red Bull-name change RT why is everyone expecting you to get arrested 
Lmao RT I'm surprised you haven't been arrested yet. Everyone else is doing it n you're usually a trend setter 
I ran from the cops that's why... #Thug RT seems like is the only player not getting arrested this offseason. 
Man McDonalds is on Crenshaw RT come to the suburbs n eat some burgers and food with your boy! And get that ass beat in madden 
In LA training... off today though boss what's up RT Pupilo what up? Where you at? 
Lmao... I'm crying... RT do black people have nipple hair? 
That was TO not me... RT I think it's about time you do some driveway pushups for the paparazzi again! #Classic 
Gonna ask Chip to send to me RT Well all you need now is Volume 8, our current CD, and you'll be good to go. 😊 
Why my kids like u more than me is hurtful 😪 RT The "Johnson" crew - They make me smile :) #lovethem  
Don't trip i got em sis... RT One of us has to put the track names on #M100 playlist.  
They're on my iPod RT wonder how feels about this upcoming season without the #Marching100  
What's up hoe... RT tweet me back bitch 
Same reason i just blocked u, being nosey RT sooo... What's your reason for blocking from your page? 
I'm rolling 2 to 5 today.... i'm the best skater in LA RT WORLD ON WHEELS? u in my hood Ocho? 
I was always at 7 to 7 back in the days RT what you know about "World on Wheels" lol.. 7 to 7 use 2 go up sick! 
Obviously i left out "LET" figure it out shit RT They'll me skate? RT Wonder if they'll me skate at World On Wheels 
Wonder if they'll me skate at "World On Wheels" even though they're not open this early.. I choreographed most of the routines in movie ATL 
Continue to build that "Empire" bruh... piece by piece #Salute RT my nigga #MMG 
Come to the Spoon RT at moms pad. Dons 
Where you at, going to Serving Spoon RT I got some funny ass footage of u at my pad when u was entering the league bro classic 
yo check out Debarge song "Time Will Reveal" one of the 1st songs I wrote before I quit writing for artist in the industry... 
11th n Collins RT We came all the way to South Beach and you are not even here! Where's the spot you always eat at? 
I look 20.. I just choose not to club so i use I.D. excuse RT Listen, im pretty sure they can tell by the looks how old u r 👀 
I haven't been anywhere except to train... i lost my I.D. can't go out to any clubs RT u in LA and didnt call? Smh! 
😭 RT Did she really have the audacity to tell me she need help raising her kid.. In the words of CHILD PLEASE 
What? Amir Khan is awesome... damn... Garcia is as well RT You see Amir Khan get knocked out by Danny Garcia? 
come pick me up... your phone is going to voicemail... 
tell Speedy I'm looking for him.... make him get a twitter, I found 4 people from SMC days (1998) 
Thanks boss, you in LA? RT congrats on the marriage bro. Do it big, do it long. One time til graveyard 
I just dm'ed my number 
Okay Corsair we out here #SMC RT Right Here, Chad!! I only saw U after most classes were over around practice time, lol! 
Enjoy life... test drive a car or two... maybe 3 shit... LIVE my child RT wow... Never thought about like that...Your so right. 
Men= Fed Ex-DHL-UPS different delivery systems 1 goal "your package" RT I get men say one thing n 6 months later does another 
1st 5 minutes of conversation let you know you won't b only 1 RT my generation of men don't see value they see quantity. Why? 
Oh snap Baker i ain't seen you since 1998/99 damn twitter is cool RT Cdub your boy Baker in the house SMC for life!!! 
Fuck ya husband but you're Shut The Front Door fine RT My first day as Mrs. Johnson - POOL PARTY  
I love you bruh I'm out here.... Turn Up... 
Yes I'm bored... Mini tour of the "Jungles"  
I'm gonna ride through the "Jungles" and re-enact all Denzel Washingtons parts in "Training Day" 
I'm bored now that I've already trained this morning... I'm watching a soccer match at Dorsey Highschool... I've no life at all 😢 
I can't find my I.D. to get in the club RT let's pop bottles tonight at playhouse! Lol it's one me. Haha 
Some things are better left alone... choose ya battles wisely... especially trying to change someone... you'll loose every time... 
That's 1 person where are the rest... RT where you at Corsair 
Where is everybody at in LA that went to Santa Monica City College with me... WTF... Y'all gotta be on twitter 1997-99 Extra yr= bad grades 
Yo I'm LA let's hit up the city... hurry the fuck up before I beat your ass... can't find anybody to fight, don't be that guy 
Lol RT U Sound Like A Bitch Talkin Bout U Getting A Pedi Wat Woman Would Want A Man That Gets Pedi's That Shit Is Unattractive 
I'm headed to Slauson Swap Meet to get some white t's... RT My office is on Slauson Ave. in Culver City 
Place is filled to the rim, getting these feet together, my brake system needs a lil tune up... What y'all doing today? 
Sitting here in Ladera getting these nails and feet done and I'm counseling on the importance of finding a guy, fellas help please 
I'm adding this to my favorites... RT If the Dos Equis man ripped off his mask, I think I'd be under there. 
I'm got my good church clothes on... Where's the party cuzzo... 
I'm got my good church clothes on... Where's the party cuzzo... 
Dude the door is open... RT Knock knock 
Let's go to La Petite Four... RT my man!!! Are you in LA!!!? Shit let's go grub!! 
Gerald is your number still the same? I'm in LA and i still got your math in my phone... RT real talk bruh 
Lil homie I'm out here LA... shoot me a fade... this is my 2nd time asking to go from the shoulders... 
Don't reinvent the wheel... remember what you did to get there... 
Just finished sand work at Playa Del Ray Beach with n I need a cold tub n a massage therapist please  
Thanks but that's makeup RT just walked in the Serving Spoon & he is fine as HELL IN PERSON! Goodness gracious! 
He's out now? RT yea 
Anthony Fail? #JohnDoe Bo RT bo 
Who? RT Chad there's an old friend trying to get in touch with you. 
Yeah details... 😳 RT Details please 😜 RT The dream I had w last nite... 👌😘 
1st time watching you on Fashion Police and you my dear are fucking brilliant... the 1 liners are phenomenal... u make the show 
Watching Fashion Police in my hotel... does Joan Rivers have a twitter? 
I want those 2... RT we have different ones also we expanded alot.  
"The Serving Spoon" and "Toast" RT Besides IHop where is your favorite place to eat in LA? 
I want the all gold but i'm n LA RT i want to let you know that we a crap load of new controllers even gold n chrome.... 
Yes sir, i have a chance to beat Ray Allen out... RT what's up. We are up here in France. Have u been practicing ur 3 pt shot? 
I can't be the only one up in LA... a little twitter hospitality would be nice... 
Yo I know you're sleep but i'm headed to Starz maybe First Kingz... this tweet has been approved by 
Jesse let's go to the strip club... Evelyn is in Miami RT At roscoes &amp; right in front in me !!! 
Anybody actually listen to Frank Ocean album... literally listen... shit was on rotation my entire 5 hour flight... dope album 
I know that black guy RT my brother just met #jealoustweet 😢  
Yes i got my streets confused... you serious? RT gower and sunset, the one we would go to after dancing with the stars. 
Where you at? 
And cahuenga? RT sunset? 
My little sister RT who's that bad chick on your profile pic 
Just landed in LA RT y u up? What I miss? 
Let's go which one... RT yes until 4am bruh 
Are they open this late... RT roscoes! 
Thanks.. RT Just got off a 5-hr flight sitting next to what a great guy (who really gets Twitter!)  
Not happy with your results from working out... Shit change your workout game... Follow for 
#dailyworkouttweets 
There we go.... Thank you sis... 
Oh shit happy birthday boss... house party... I don't party but I'm there, what's the dress code? Y'all gone have red bull? 
Bruh i'm ready, what's open tonight? RT can I do dinner or lunch with my homeboy? 
I get in at 9 oclock... What's good RT what's good bro? 
cuzzo I'm on the way to LA I need a ride, to cheap for car service... 
So many different restaurants, it's all on what you like RT in your opinion what's the best restaurant in Miami bro? 
What if folks don't come RT if I opened a restaurant then my rent would be high But ur income would be way higher 
He was smooth as hell, body language n they he talked, cool guy RT what is Mr. President Bill Clinton like? 
if I opened a restaurant then my rent would be high... this guy owns everything on the beach from what I understand 
On south beach, Lincoln Road, he owns W Hotel as well RT where's that? That mr edelstein can charge 60K a month to a cafe? 
Anyone know how to get in touch with David Edelstein... tell him not to raise David's Cafe rent to 60k a month... They're closing now.. WTF 
"Have you laughed today"  
Another solid 7 rounds in the book... Off to LA...   
I was taught to love all...  
Me beating you to a pulp wouldn't be fun... not being able to hit me will get frustrating RT we should spar, would be fun 
Last boxing workout this a.m. with Kevin Kelley before I leave for LA... wanted a red eye but the latest flights to LA are at 7 p.m. 
No... RT Do you see this tweet? 
I did that, very scary RT you ever think about stepping into a racecar, Pure adrenaline  
Yes... that's a Life or Death situation... 1 thing goes wrong you're done RT Does that include bull riding? 
Anything that gets the blood racing/flowing is definitely worth doing... 
Check the numbers... Moss n TO are in a class by themselves RT I think you are better then TO! 
I'm good but them fuckers are EPIC RT what's your thought if someone says randy moss or Terrell Owens is way better then you? 
Frank Ocean new joint and SelfMade2 RT what you been listening to lately boss? I been on this /meek kick lately 
Getting a massage from and tweeting RT What you into tonight bruh? 
No... love those fans too much to even attempt it, unless they say otherwise RT if you score against Cincy will you celebrate? 
Awesome, love you guys RT You betcha! We've always been a fan! 
Does this mean we are friends now? 
Anytime guys RT Well, we like to think all our seats are first class - Even More Space is where it's at! Thanks for the shout out! 
Who cares lil ugly Dora with long blond hair... RT SLEEPY & CRANKY!!!!!!!!! 
Bruh please let's work RT you need to hit up the track as well out here and get that track speed under you for the season. 
I never ride 1st class... Always Jet Blue seat 12 A or 11 A window seat/exit row RT first class ? 
I got married last wednesday and forgot to do yesterday drawing so i'm doing them at once RT how 2 people winning $1000? 
See you week 3 boss... RT Got some great work in today with some great WRs 
My goodness I feel good... headed to LA tomorrow to train with for 2 weeks to tighten my game up... #BackToMyRoots 
I got ya back... Every fucking week... July 26 till... 
Salute RT imma follow ur lead big bra...n congrats on ur marriage...prayers n blessings to u n the mrs 
Man is booming... Check out exclusive plus 2 people will win 1k a piece winners announced at midnight... 
big bruh you at 10k... I got another 10k coming within the next 2 hours hold tight... 
Can my followers get to 20k followers by midnight.... A simple follow for one of the NFL's best shouldn't be that hard 
Yall follow my lil homie "Jail House" just did 15 years Fed time RT In David's Cafe chilling with  
Each day is unpredictable... we operate in a weird/fun/unorthodox way which keeps everything fresh RT How's the new life brethen 
David's Cafe flow 15 deep after working out... oh and 
#Grinding  
Yo money must be long... cause i'm digging RT Shoot, put in front of me right now and he won't go back to Evelyn... 
It's halftime... me taking a break waiting to embarrass in 1 on 1's... 
Players don't charge for autographs.... 
Each person is different in the way they use social media... Can you be more specific on your meaning... 
Yeah you can find her on Rodeo somewhere RT Is going with you or staying in FL? 
Greedy RT Just had some AMAZING soul food!!! catfish, baked macaroni & cheese, candid yams, and green beans. #PeoplesMiami 
I get there tomorrow.. we got doorbells 2 ring RT "@ochocinco: wake up yo..." We been up round here bruh..what's the deal 
I get to LA tomorrow.. down there for 2 weeks RT "@ochocinco: wake up yo...."im up whats good 
wake up yo... 
wake up yo.... 
I'm headed to LA tomorrow... shoot me a fade... on camera off camera... whatever... 
Can we release my dating site now... A lot of single people and I believe the timing is perfect... no holidays anytime soon 
Who's gonna be the next 1k winner for simply following Announcing two winners for the past 2 Wednesdays drawings.. #goodluck 
Spend wisely RT Thanks I love you. Good luck on the season. Will always be a fan forever. No bull.  
No just field work with RT you sparring today? 
I don't know but check your bank account... you should be a thousandaire.. RT Why am I so tired? 
Would like my fashionable followers opinions RT The ESPYs: Fashion Offense and Defense Awards  
Was looking to use your venue to dine with some of my LA fans... I get to LA tomorrow... my apologies for the short notice 
Stays in motion... Turn Up... RT 3pm at Beach High! Object in motion! 
what time we rocking today... how easy they forget... oh the joy of making em remember... 
I love you Nikki RT Have 2 say I used to dislike U but Twitter has shown me how fabulous U R!! (Even if u aren't a Pat anymore) 
At times women hold "decent" to an unrealistic standard... good men may be right under our nose & you'll never know it sis... 
All men are decent, women chase the Alpha Male instead RT so hard to find a decent MAN now n days....smh....where r they? 
Better is an understatement... I have no choice but too succeed... RT fuck yea EL C! G! You better score this year 
Eddie i have Mexican flags at the north n south endzones at Sun Life, "The Invisible One" is watching me this yr RT if your high 
Well I almost had a threesome last night.... all I needed was 1 more person... well that's the issue every night.. 
I feel we are family and I can share my life with guys... hell that's what twitter is for to give you a side that's never been accessible... 
And you're that guy with someone else's Bentley in your avi... "want to get away" RT this nigga rides his own dick way 2 much 
Well duh, you ever seen me in person, yo ass would've married too shit... RT Evelyn really married you 
Yes i have spanish poems i used when i dated Roselyn Sanchez yrs ago,I messed up as all men do RT do you have poems in Spanish 
My poems are awesome... 
I don't think you understand what i mean... RT shouldn't it be "our" microwave now? 
Roses are red... my name is not Dave... this poem makes no sense... but i love your microwave... 
Her adams apple RT 😱😝😜 there is a place you can touch a woman that will drive her crazy. 
Be aggressive RT Instead of asking "where all the good men", I'm just waiting for one...any suggestions?  
Wait a minute (Kevin Hart voice) RT what if its not love your lookin for, just a hot chick for a 3some? 
But having relations since 1989 RT Why is everyone asking for relationship advice? He's been married for a week! 💍 
Dear single male followers she wants love --> RT I hope I find luv like yu did! Y'all so beautiful 
12 years? Yo luck can't be that damn bad hell.. RT Are you now the resident twitter match maker? I've been single about 12yrs... 
You super woman? 2 million single normal guys RT You're right. I'm not the average girl though... you have anyone in mind then? 
When you're ready? WTF... this ain't a movie, move the fuck on... RT Maybe when I'm ready, just wasted a yr with a douche. 
Never used it, need a dude? RT As a man do u think using "felt we've been growing apart" excuse to cheat? My x gave me that 
Aight... Leaving the gym RT I'm in the subs 
Where you at at Mommie or in Opa Locka? RT I'm at peace with my third eye open 
STFU... RT Seems people have a hard time saying nice positive uplifting things to each other it's always something bad 
I got work to do RT My nigga #'s & work ethic don't lie. Hate when people disrespect his game  
That is me... Pull up on the side RT are you tweeting and driving or is eve rocking the phantom? Just saw you pass me 
It's basically a camouflaged "Fuck You" nicely RT I think you need to explain to them exactly what "Child Please" means again 
I'm not an analyst so i can't comment but I support any n every player RT what do you think of all this dwight howard non sense? 
Headed to South Florida to train RT what's good bruh 
Child Please... RT Any nigga that says "child please" has to have sum sugar n tha tank 
I love everybody duh... RT why does hate me 👊😂 
Gym flow... head gear... 16oz Titles... mouthpiece... object in motion stays in motion... Let's go.., 
Thank you boss much love RT Congrats from, Blink n Twan n Uncle and the 41street family. Blessing to U and ur new Bride. 
V what's up sis, loving it, coming up on our 2 week anniversary soon... RT So like a week in big bruh....you loving marriage? 
I'm never irritated but i've got the greatest comebacks to any form of negativity RT are you a bit irritated today sir? 
So does your dad for not pulling out... RT you suck! 
I've made a couple of mistakes here and there... not always right... but I'm always real and that's how I'm able to sleep at night... 
Cry me a river who cares... Get in line with the rest of the folks who hate me RT Just lost a little respect for 
Shit didn't work like Brad Pitt n Jenn Aniston, I thought I was gonna bananas RT but not with the Pats. 
The ability to have fun and be productive at the same time... RT can you please define "funductive" for us? Thanks... 
Like a plume fool without getting in trouble, not like I ever have, just being funductive RT how u gonna act this year 
Show me numbers better besides TO/Moss RT name a receiver that played most of their career in the AFC north with those numbers 
When a gunman says he's gonna shoot, u don't question that, u listen... RT Interesting article on u written by ian rapoport. 
Horrible right... Literally RT I didn't no u had 11057 yards but only 67 td's hope u get a bunch with the fins 
Definitely, I'm ready RT Absolutely can u shoot the 3 RT I'm willing to sign with the Heat... 
I'm willing to sign with the Heat at the end of football season... what you think? 
Killing Michael Bublè song "A Song For You" with Chris Botti... 
Hold up let me ask... RT Why dont u become a multi sport athlete and sign with Heat as well? #HeatNation 
If a number 2 pencil is the most preferred pencil.... why is it still considered number 2? 
There isn't a more dangerous place than inside your comfort zone... 
I'm blocking you too RT and here is the picture of you sleep he posted  
Why you snitching? I'm gone block yo ass off her page RT lol did u ever see these tweets?  
No, i have to keep the leverage to go after her money RT Quick question do you plan to have kids with 
1st time in history the groom looked better than the bride RT & you guys look great  
Straight up... RT Good work today fellaz! Keep grinding!👌 
With n gonna be late 🏈 RT Excited about our shoot today for the "Ev & Ocho" show The set is FIRE 
If y'all need help finding a companion my services are available once I'm done at 11 am... 1st date I pay 4... 
Headed to workout with and Y'all be easy on this good wednesday... I'f you're feeling bad read over my timeline 
I have to train today, you don't participate in sexual acts before training, that's the problem RT and the problem is? 
It's about respect, what she did is considered spousal abuse in the state of Florida RT but, you’re not REALLY mad thou 
I'd appreciate if she asks for my services, been married 8 days n she's out of control RT What’s there to complain about? 
Feeling violated this morning... went to bed comfortable in my pajamas and i'm waking with the bottoms off... Eve didn't even ask... 
Yoooo, wake up.... 
Oh snap tell her whats up... We all gotta meet up at Roscoes RT Zandi said "what's up Chad". Smh hahaha 
Unfollow if you can't take jokes, what Espn gonna do RT Kiss my ass you petite asian penis.. #racist? Hey 
Is this really Los? RT Follow ya boy! Bout to set off my foundation! 
Anthony don't lie to me i'll beat you up... you're in the mob RT no idea what your talking about. 
Kiss my ass you petite asian penis.. RT you are so annoying on twitter. acting like anyone cares for Your problems 
Text me i'm near the phone RT Yooooooo 
Charlie Sheen RT if you could be one white person.. who would it be? 
Tomorrow we throw... remember I'm always open regardless of the coverage... black guy is your safety valve... 
No RT you ever gonna respond to me? 
Yes in Manhattan Beach RT u workin out at the "sand dunes park" while here boss..? 
Why does have 2 tea cup Yorkies, a Maltese, Pomeranian n a standard size Yorkie, gotta get out of here..  
Congrats to you as well big bruh... You just saved a beat down... 
Just got home from South Florida sitting in this home made cold tub... RT Yooo what's good 
bruh if doesn't tweet me back by 9:40 i'm holding you responsible, therefore you get his ass whopping.. 
Fellas please follow She's single and i'm willing to pay for travel and 1st date, 1 of you fuckers sweep her off her feet... 
Yoooo, send me some #V7 or I'll whoop your ass... 
I get to LA this friday, be there for 2 weeks... RT when are you coming back to l.a? 
I'm waiting to race Clyde Gates... RT you were the fastest... Before arrived to South Beach 
Aww man, ok RT said he wants to make peace. David's Cafe tomorrow morning on him. Bring 
I'd whoop too from the shoulders RT do you think you can take hes looking to spar someone 
Be blessed Justin RT LOL!!!!!!! Well played grasshopper, well played!!! 
How long have you been in the mob... 
It's not Halloween yet "Magic Mike" put on a shirt you pixie stick... RT Shhhhuuuuttt uppppp!!!!!! 
Smart decision... i'd whoop ass as well... RT Heading to 24 hour fitness with 
Dude i'll fuck you up... Literally RT On my way... 
Redirection of energy... takes 2 moves to get one... 
Please somebody... anybody RT someone please come whoop his ass 
Can I please whoop somebody's ass at Anybody, I just need you to sign a waiver so you can't sue me... 
What the hell took you so long dammit... when do we tell the world we're related? Welcome to twitter my good friend... 
Once you find your niche.... All hell should break lose once you're in your comfort zone... 
If you're gonna insult me at least be specific in size you son of a bitch RT Dude, you're being a dick 
Anybody remember when n were going back n forth... TV at its best... don't think that exchange will be topped 4 a while 
Watching "The Cycle" on MSNBC and S.E. Coup has innocent/naughty look at the same time... pretty impressive n she's not even trying... 
That's why u got a 💍$ RT Reason why I can't be home. Killed Costco n Bed Bath & Beyond My truck is full  
We out here "Turnt Up" in the sand...  
Just a little sample... and Chad Johnson  
It's easy training when you're always on balance.... try being off balance the entire workout... "route running in the sand" 
That damn book was good, especially the end, part 2 is coming RT ur wife's book was off the chain. Is she working on the next 1. 
How much more successful would you be if you weren't afraid... 
Don't limit your possibilities, anything is possible... RT I don't believe twitter is a place to find a serious relationship. 
Yeah you bring the water, turn up RT Headed to the beach to get some work in with and let's gooo! 
They say when you leave stuff behind it's because you have unfinished business... 
Yessss RT yesterday y'all cut grass, today cutting sand. Whats next. Running routes in water? 
Tighten up... headed to the beach to run sand routes with Today is his birthday, flood his timeline with your wishes please 
Turn up.... Happy birthday... 
No you didn't just go there about McDonalds? RT Finally a woman with class who has standards! 
Single tweet RT mcDonalds=turn off=dumped, Thats not a date its just rude,be a gentlemen and you'll get a lady 
Can you turn water into wine? There's your answer RT any advice? im trying to save someone who won't save them self? 
9 years ago to help my footwork and quick twitch muscles for bump-n-run RT when did u start boxing? 
Child please RT dude stop advertising for them ur just increasing child obesity  
Aight, South Florida Gym on south beach at 8 pm RT let's spar tomorrow 
Still working.... Fuck it... Turn Up  
Thanks boss, how are you? RT what's up son? Congrats on the marriage 
Aww shit you too? You need help? RT what a coincidence. I got dumped too! 
McDonalds, she ordered smiling n i knew, yeap thats the 1 RT where did u take Eve on the first date, not to Mcdonalds im sure! 
Start off with McDonalds, if she complain she ain't the one... RT bruh my date say where we going? 
That's a deal RT Week 10... Loser buys Pastelitos David's Cafe! 
Girl he's not okay or i wouldn't have tweeted it, now holla at him RT awww , you'll be okay boo 
Tweet him dammit i know you single, if not dump ya man anyway RT lmao... the most! 
Ladies my homeboy just got dumped... need some of you who are single to follow and cheer up NFL rookie I'll pay for 1st date 
Just finished on the field doing 1 on 1's with and = instagram  
Si RT Miami Beach High? 
You always reading my tweets... RT you always tweeting. 
I'd whoop your ass if we fought RT Been a busy few days down here in Miami... Twitter fam. How's everyone doing?? 
Memorial Field RT help me get outta the house!! I'll help paint! 
Getting out the house for a little bit to paint a little bit with 
I used the going to the bathroom excuse to get out of watching the movie... her slick ass paused it until I came out, this can't be life 😨 
Somebody shoot me, Eve is making me watch " Something Borrowed" I'm confused, 2 best friends are in love with the same guy? Kate Hudson = 👍 
ʇsəq əɥʇ sı əʌol uʍop əpısdn ˙˙˙uʍop əpısdn noʎ əʌol ı 
Never needed acceptance from outsiders... I'm the engineer... See that beat /\__/\__ I created it and I'm gone keep marching to it... 
In 2001, i lost track of that drive n hunger and it exposed me... RT When did you realize you wanted to be great at what you do? 
See you week 5 RT GM we miss u Cincinnat #realtalk. Lov ur relationship with the new wife...b easy today ;) much lov 
Love you to Ms Cheryl but she travels to much RT Good morning Chad. Have a good day. Eve is on her way home. Love you 
Sitting in the middle of the grass at Dolphin facility getting ready to paint? My good people how are on this fine morning? 
Ya only home shit i changed the locks.. RT Ha! My 2nd home.. :) RT Just saw at the airport! 
I tweet during sex.. not a big deal RT So live-tweeted his wedding this week. Tacky or new age romance? 
Nothing beats "The Gift of Gab" RT Most guys have a "go to" move that gets the woman every time. Whats urs? 
Shit I had a damn honeymoon all last season, don't need another 1 RT did you end up going on a short honeymoon? 
No, my mouth piece... (Conversation) once I got her mind the body was gonna follow RT are your hips what won over? 
My feet and hips grasshoppeeRT Do work!!! that's what separates you from the rest!!! 
Well i drank a Red Bull at my wedding reception RT When was the last time you had an adult beverage? 
Cardio in the mornings, sparring at noon and field work while everbody is clubing RT Why you wait until midnight to practice? 
I dm'ed you where RT Need location, should I bring my light up vest? RT Shit midnight bruh let's work... 
Shit midnight bruh let's work... RT shit that works.... Jus let me kno, I'm dwn here!!!! 
Here we go, 1st now this subliminal i like her tweet RT Me and isn't she fly as F?  
Gotta be careful bruh, NCAA has stupid rules... not sure if we can work RT I'm down at school bro. Hit me up 
Shit bruh i can use the help, shadowing off the press, u don't have to open up RT Dont leave me out, u need someone to cover? 
Everyone please wish Dolphin receiver coach a happy birthday please... 
I dm'ed the info RT always free for throwing a session. I'm coming from Palm Beach. Just need a location. 
I'll dm the location and my cell RT I'm ready to work my man! 
You free late tonight boss... I'll double my route load with 2 QB's RT Ready when you are..just need an address. 
Yes, i want to throw late around 12 pm RT I'm a free agent QB living in Broward, let me know if you wanna get some work in 
where are you 
Where are you? 
They aren't in town RT David Garrard? Matt Moore? Ryan Tannehill? 
Serious question... is there a QB available to throw tonight in the Miami/Broward area... 5 a.m. route running session, I'll pay 4 ur time 
With yo ugly self RT shouldn't of went 2 KAY JEWELERS RT Why the fuck yo ring ain't showing  
Dropping my body weight n trusting my ankles not 2 give out RT Saw u turn on a dime literally on a sports science show. Amazing 
Why the fuck yo ring ain't showing RT In some room at Essence #StrikeAStankPose  
Dude i been in Miami since 1978 RT What u do for fun now that u live in Miami? 
Really good, almost caused us to break up trying to figure it out RT Chad,what's Evelyn's book about? Honestly..have you read it? 
Yeah she's beautiful but uses all my good toilet tissue in 1 sitting RT is just BEAUTIFUL.  
You not answering your phone or text messages so... where is the new 2 ply Charmin toilet tissue I hid in my fucking trunk? 
Route running is an art... self expression... passion... the grass is the canvas... my feet the paint brush 
It takes 2 moves to get one in any sport... no matter what you do in life it always takes two moves to get one... 
Commitment is the act of refusal... 
An object in motion stays in motion... 
It's fun as hell, our only issue is the toilet seat RT Did you guys go to couples counseling and what are your views about it? 
Fuck yeah, i was pissed, how the hell she gone beat me to the lawyer... WTF... RT She make you sign a Pre-nup? 
She dumped me, went to Essence in New Orleans 4 her book signing RT how are you b your new wife doing this morning 
He doesn't hold but that fucker is strong, uses the Arm Bar to maintain leverage, looks like holding but it's not RT got ya... 
He uses "Arm Bar" RT u think darelle revis gets away with holding? I watch clips and in everyone he is grabbing after the 5yards 
That awkward moment when you realize you're wrong in a damn argument... but you keep arguing anyway trying to make wrong sound right... 
Goodnight... 
I part of the "Chain Gang" now sis how are you? RT buddy, how u been 
I'm the Blackie-Lama RT Why do people always come to you for such advice ? 
Which is why i'm never in trouble with the law RT what do you do when your not tweeting ? Hahaa your always on it 
It's always 1 person with no sense of humor.. dammit 😡 RT Seriously, don't mock our foundation.. Jeez 
"The Make A Wish Foundation" you want a miracle sis RT I'm single looking for a MAN wit good morals and respect... Any advice? 
Jamie Chung RT whose the hottest girl in hollywood 
Mila Kunis him: Friend with Benefits RT how can I see if my friend is open to a relationship without ruining the friendship? 
Lmao... good luck, shouldn't be hard after our short convo via twitter... RT right! U kno what they say. Lol 
Damn, well shit you can't go back now, won't be the same, find another Snickers... RT well I was already crossed over. 
I think you should date someone different this time... one that'll make u forget your ex #crossover RT he doesnt have one 
What's his twitter? RT The person I havs been with for over 2 years has told me hes not in love with me. 
Anybody online on this account? 
Okay what kind of you want and what size? RT dude how about some reeboks?!? 
Dude i'm sponsored by stop asking me about Kobe's shoes RT i know u will help me out sir #whatthekobe 
Oh that was my hologram bruh RT definitely was your twin then my dude. I was in Christiana, Delaware haha. 
Dude that was me just now... just left off the beach RT saw your twin in Urban Outfitters today. Talk about upset.... 
Now I only have 1 person to impress, anybody else have a 8 pack? of abs that is Follow for daily workouts #fitnessguruCoryG 
No but my jaw is fucked up... RT didn't wrestle anybody after the spar? 
I'm alive... 
Sparring with Kevin Kelley this afternoon... anybody remember his fight with Prince Naseem? I will try to emulate what the Prince didn't do 
I gotta get back in the ring this morning... I promise if I get hit to hard while sparring i'm gonna start wrestling a mofo n the ring 
Last minutes of "The Single Life"  
Pee pee butt RT home for less than 24 hours Getting hair/makeup done for interviews, then I'm back on a flight to New Orleans 
I'm establishing dominance early so she knows i run shit RT Don't let Evelyn boss you around. Your the man in this marriage 
Who turns on the light to pee at night when u wake up out your sleep, I aim, listen n hope the urine stream hits water 1st, I guess I missed 
Awesome, just had my 1st fight with Evelyn about the toilet seat, not that I left it up but I pee'd on it n she sat in it, it was dark shit 
Life is short... some of us think we have spare time... spare time equals spare change... who the hell uses the pay phone these days... 
It was a normal wedding n sang then it was a party... people dancing n drinking, awesome RT how was the wedding boss? 
Lmao... RT so have u heard all the talk about 50 shades of grey? Maybe you could play the role of Christian Grey! 
Hello 
Haha "@bomani_jones: Sat next to a woman returning from the wedding. Wearing an Evelyn tank top. Reading Evelyn's book. Yeah." 
Taking the family to a 5 star restaurant, Davids Cafe so I don't work out on an empty stomach, what yall doing? 
Back on #305 soil... headed to train and spar with Kevin Kelley... anyone in the Miami think they can throw from the shoulders? Let's fight 
Football season is the Honeymoon... i'm back training at midnight tonight RT is the honeymoon over? 
Not sure, usually gets people in high school or college... cigars is my only vice RT why don’t you DRINK bruh? 
Using fans as props so they get in trouble instead of me... RT You bringing back the touchdown celebration dances? 
Land on your feet by all means... RT falling in love you? 
What's going on my good people? 
To give without remembering... to receive without forgetting.... 
Thanks boss RT Congrats And , Over Here Suffering From My Alcohol Intake, Chad Them Shoes Were ILL 
Who the FUCK is Charles? using wrong name as a tactic was brilliant RT when the FUCK are you gonna respond to me Charles? 
These glasses? Thanks but i'll keep them RT stop tweeting and look for my sunglasses Damnitt!!!  
Use the rest of those 8 lives wisely... RT my cat was hit by a semi truck any advice for... my cat? 
I'm glad you enjoyed yourself, please excuse both sides of our families we party a little different, I love you n thanks 4 comn 
I can't V God isn't finished with me yet... RT you need to be stopped 
Shouldn't this be in February? "see what I did there" RT Today is National Fried Chicken Day! 
Out of 300 million sperm you're the 1 who won unless u're a twin RT can I get a few kind words from u sir...I need to cheer up 
I'm changing the definition of marriage sis n creating my own, Can't fail at what i create RT marriage looks good on you Chad 
Negative energy keeps the power on over here sis... RT Love how you deal with negativity! 
S-ee M-iracles I-n L-ife E-veryday Keep smiling you never know who'll fall in love with it...  
#This --> RT When a lover of God gets ready to dance, the earth draws back and the sky trembles - Rumi 
Forcing Eve to watch Federer and Djokovic semifinal match right now... Thoroughly enjoying the shift in power so far after the 4th... 
No baby but we do have to share the xBox now... total bullshit if you ask me... RT Soo marriage what's next? A baby carriage? 
I'm up, is anyone else up? 
Really turnt up to start training with Kevin "Flushing Flash" Kelley tomorrow in Miami, a weeks worth of 2 a days then 2 LA with 
Like a track meet... she's still running even as a Johnson RT how was the sex the first night as a married man? 
What's good boss RT weird guy 
Nice car in your avi... Hmm, been there before RT Ur so lucky u never know what this feels like  
Minutes before walking the aisle  
Loving the St. Martin style Junkanoo n Dancers  
Mr and Mrs. Johnson and  
Look at at the pool party with the dancers...  
˙ʇsəɹ əɥʇ ɥsıuoʇsɐ puɐ əldoəd əɯos ʎɟıʇɐɹƃ llıʍ ʇı ˙ƃuıɥʇ ʇɥƃıɹ əɥʇ op 
Mr. and Mrs. Johnson Day #1  
Appreciate it boss... RT congrats bruh 
Lol RT I'm watching Trading Places now... Imitation Of Life is on deck... Sarah Jane made want to fight her lol 
I have Stormy Weather, Cabin in the Sky, Green Pastures n Imitation of Life RT You should watch the movie too 
Listening to Lena Horne song "Stormy Weather" on repeat... one of my favorite songs and movies... nobody is up yet including Eve... smh 
She got Jack Ass the movie wasted, she won't respond RT um get off Twitter and go back to your wife!!!! Congrats too!!!! 
Okay I've been up since my usual 5am wake up time... entire wedding party/guest are still drunk I'm assuming since I'm the only one outside. 
Small issue,I'm the only person that didn't/doesn't drink alcohol n every 1 is wasted including my WIFE, can't relate 2 this shit, now what? 
I know y'all not sleeping.. I never announced today's 1k winner for simply following y'all still up or should I wait till mañana 
Here's a picture of Chad Johnson and  
F*ck that i can't believe i just got married... Turn up RT I can't believe your tweeting after you just got married 
She's right here having a ball with both families RT More importantly, how is Cheryl? 
That was funny, check my stats, i haven't been though RT don't be premature tonight. Act like you've been to the end zone before. 
I don't know you personally but you'll see that Chad Johnson fella all fucking year RT I miss you, the old you 
Well shit she's on outfit #4 and i'm stuck in this damn tux... RT 2 outfits is normal anything else is unnecessary 
Y'all still there? How many times is Eve gonna change outfits... Is this normal to have more than 1 outfit besides the wedding gown? 
Salute, lets work RT proud of u. I ll make sure that ur game is not just back. But the best in the league. That's a promise. Love 
I got my wife now it's time to get my game back... turn up I'm on the way to LA... football season is the honeymoon... 
Here we go.... Proverbs 18:22... I love you guys... If I do it right the 1st time I won't have to do it again... Turn up... 
Sandra i love you to death, yo fine ass 😳 RT You mean the fake wedding for and lame reality show? 
Baby you on twitter too? Funny stuff, have you seen Evelyn? Who looks better? Me huh? RT we out heree pops! 😁 
I guess you've never seen Eve mad... that'll be pushing it RT you won't pause and tweet before you kiss your bride though! 
Going through text messages, Marvin Lewis message is making me tear up a lil bit and I didn't even see the bride yet... 
Of course i'm wearing what i call "Personal Red Carpets" RT Can u give us hint as to what u r wearing? R u wearing Louboutins? 
I'm breathing like a pregnant lady in lamaze class right now... I was hoping continuing to tweet with y'all support would calm me down 😭 
What if is a runaway bride when I get out there and I'm stuck looking good all by myself... did I mention looking good? 
This is bull shit... I don't recall sending the butterflies in my stomach and invite... and why am I shaking like I'm in Alaska. 😳 #mandown 
Live tweeting from my wedding... should be a first I'm assuming, music is playing, can't see my guest right now but they're here... #nervous 
I just got word that is here n comfy in her seat at the wedding, in other news I look good than a mofo right now,#back2uBill 
I been tie'ing knots since i stopped wearing my "Roos" with the zipper RT u ready to tie that knot? 
I'm still turnt up, haven't seen Eve all day, some tradition bull shit, I'm on MW3 eating a PB&J waiting to walk down this aisle, y'all busy 
Must be a new follower, i curse like a sailor RT just couldnt resist saying holy shit, that dont even sound like you chief. smh 
Holy shit... appreciate that big bruh RT Respect to & Eve making them life long vows!! Beautiful Thing. 
Lmao, funny stuff RT congrats. remember, marri